“Bacon”
Mariam Nassiri
Duke University
ThE ALArm cLocK IS, To mANY high school students, a wailing
monstrosity whose purpose is to torture all who are sleep-deprived.
Those who believe this are misguided, and are simply viewing the situ-
ation from a twisted perspective. For when these imprudent early-risers
blearily rub their eyes each morning, and search in vain for whatever
is making that earsplitting noise, they are, without a doubt, annoyed.
Why?
It isn’t because the only thing they desire is to sleep a few extra
hours, as many would presume. no, these kids are groggy and irritable
because they are waking up to what they think will be another hor-
ribly boring day of school. If one of these foolish Sallys or Joes were,
say, sleeping comfortably on a Saturday morning, I could certainly see
something different happening. A beautiful breakfast of tantalizing vit-
tles—eggs, hash browns, and the like—would be ready and waiting for
them on their kitchen tables. But the scrumptious delight to outshine
them all would be a slab of bacon, piled proudly for the taking. It
2122
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
would be that wafting, wondrous bacon smell that would draw dear,
sweet Sally abruptly from her slumber—long before an alarm clock has
the chance to pierce the air.
Oh, bacon: what a marvelous, glorious thing! I live for those heart-
stoppingly good strips of succulence, so crispy and crunchy, so packed
with perfection. The thought of having a plate of bacon every day, per-
haps every school day, sends me into sheer waves of ecstasy!
To be sure, many others would also wax poetic about this lovely
breakfast food. But precious few would share this same zeal for learn-
ing. I, however, can smugly decree that I do regard both very highly. I
brightly waken every morning to the mellifluous joy that sounds from
my alarm clock, a huge smile plastered on my face, and the yearning
to learn in my heart.
When I board my school bus Monday through Friday, it is still pitch
black outside. Busmates will groan about how even the day has not
yet dragged itself out of bed; I only chuckle through their thirty-min-
ute rant fest as we chug down the freeway. Opting to be part of a far-
away Magnet school, after all, has its benefits. My peers may still not
look forward to waking up earlier, but when we are all together in
a classroom, we take on the “bacon mentality.” I have the opportu-
nity to choose from a wealth of diverse classes, and love arriving to
school each day with the prospect of having a new Spanish History
lesson—taught to me in Spanish, for a change. Teachers, driven by
the enthusiasm of their Magnet students, are inspired to create new
classes for advanced students, including those who have completed AP
Spanish Literature and are still eager to learn more, or those who want
to learn about a specific aspect of a subject—we now have a Middle
Eastern History class. not to be outdone, the post-AP exam period
of my English Language class included an intensive literature study,
where we laughed at good ol’ Yossarian in Catch-22, and developed a
strong attachment to Jay gatsby. I’d like to think that The Great Gatsby’s
pursuit of Daisy is not unlike my own pursuit of bacon. I’ve gobbled up
new knowledge rapidly, hankering after it like any elusive bacon strip,
and happily digesting any new bits of information.
But six classes a year are simply not enough to satisfy my hunger
for knowledge. Just as I eat bacon all three meals of the day (when pos-
sible), I attempt to learn all days of the week. rather than make another
trip to some lackluster movie theatre on the weekend, I dedicate my23
Chapter 3: Academic Passion
time to reading another good book, or reviewing Economics with my
friends. But high school is starting to smell like leftovers to me now; I
want fresh, new, crisp learning. I want not to read a textbook written by
a renowned professor: I want to hear him speak directly. I’m ready for
the university, and hunger for all the new opportunities waiting for me!
I’ve finished my breakfast, and now it’s time to get going to school.

“Beyond Plug-and-Chug Math”
Anonymous
MIT
I hAVE ALwAYS BEEN A mATh-ScIENcE girl. I sighed and sulked
through classes on US History and French in eager anticipation of the
formulas and applications I would be learning later in the day. I believe
there are many factors which attribute to my success, two being my
fascination and persistence.
When I was seven I once asked what math was good for and why
I should learn it. The answer I received simply does not do math jus-
tice, “One day when you’re in line at the grocery store the cashier will
give you too little change and you’ll be glad you learned this.” now
in calculus I see the application of all these once foreign symbols, for-
mulas, and letters. I am often amazed by the calculations I am able to
do using the cumulative information acquired from nearly 12 years of
education, such as how to maximize the volume of a box given a cer-
tain surface area. Math is not just plug and chug as many view it but
it requires creativity and thinking out of the box to solve the problems
encountered in the real world. Beauty lies in its simplicity and in the
fact that proofs and observations are what brought the golden rectangle
from ancient greece, Pascal’s triangle, and the Pythagorean Theorem as
well as a host of other theorems, equations, and postulates. Math has
made the impossible possible and the once long and tedious, simple
and quick. The genius of it is amazing as well as the fact that any per-
son is capable of applying and discovering it. I draw graphs and try to
make shapes from functions for fun, count to 10 to calm down, and
save money at the store, too. For all of these reasons and many more, I
am fascinated by math. I wasn’t always good at math, contrary to what students in my class-
es might say. When I first showed interest in math in the 5th grade my
parents laughed; middle school was even worse. Incoming 6th graders
were given a test on the second day of school and depending on their
scores were placed into a high or low speed math class. I was put in
the slow speed math and missed a lot of class my first year, as a result
my grade drifted from a B to a C to a C-, then I got help. I knew I liked
math and I didn’t want to do bad in it so I bought books and hired
my older brother to help me. I eventually made it to a B+. Later, in the
summer after my junior year, I took a course that covered nearly a year
of Calculus. I was told that if I decided to take Calculus AB, I would be
bored, so I went for a challenge. My strongest subject began to take up
most of my time. I had to read review books, go online for help, and
stay in during nutrition and lunch for extra instruction. It was hard,
but my dedication paid off and I earned an A. This persistence and
drive also help me excel in math.

“A Different Kind of love”
Oana Emilia Butnareanu
Stanford University
whEN I wAS FoUr YEArS oLd, I fell in love. It was not a transient
love-one that stayed by my side during the good times and vanished
during the bad-but rather a love so deep that few would understand.
It was not the love for a person, but the love for a language. It was the
love for Spanish.
Having been born and raised behind the Iron Curtain, in a country
where Western influence was limited and the official and only language
was romanian, I was on my own. Everyone around me, especially my
family, had trouble understanding what could possibly draw me to
such a foreign and, in their opinion, unattractive language. But as they
say, love is blind, and the truth of the matter is that I wasn’t even sure
what it was exactly that made Spanish so fascinating to me. The only
thing I knew was that I absolutely adored hearing its perfectly articu-
lated phrases, and trying to make sense of its sweet and tender words:
serenades to my innocent ear.
Spanish entered through my door on June 16th, 1994, when a man
from the local cable company came to connect our living room to theChapter 3: Academic Passion
27
rest of the world. That day, I was introduced to “Acasa,” a romanian
cable network dedicated to broadcasting Spanish language telenovelas
(soap operas) to romanian audiences. As I learned to read, I started as-
sociating the romanian subtitles with the Spanish dialogue, and little
by little, I began understanding the language. For a little girl who had
yet to discover new aspects of her own language, this was quite an ac-
complishment, but no one around me felt the same way. My father,
enraged at my apparent “obsession” with the language, scolded me in-
cessantly, declaring that:
“We are immigrating to the United States, not to Mexico! You should
spend your time learning English instead of watching that nonsense!”
Sadly, my family’s objection was only the first of many hardships
I was bound to encounter. When I was nine, my immigration to the
US forced me to say goodbye to what had become a huge and indis-
pensible part of me. I needed to hear Spanish, to listen to it daily, and
although Los Angeles could be considered a Spanish speaker’s paradise,
my largely romanian neighborhood allowed for little interaction with
the language. For six years, destiny kept us apart and the feelings that
Spanish had evoked in me soon faded away.
But high school brought about a new era in my life, an era in which
my love for Spanish was revived and greatly amplified. For an hour a
day, life was put on hold and I was able to speak and read Spanish more
actively than ever. After two years of Advanced Placement Spanish, I
not only understood the language to perfection, but spoke it flawlessly
as well.
There are no words that can describe how proud and greatly ac-
complished I feel today at my ability to speak Spanish. During a recent
trip to Mexico, I was mistaken more than once for one of the natives.
One man, after seeing my romanian last name, asked me if it was my
husband’s, for undoubtedly, he believed, I was Mexican. given to a
romanian girl, whose family members were oblivious to the language,
and who had learned it on her own despite their objections, this was
the greatest compliment of all. In the United States, Spanish is the sec-
ond most spoken language and a great asset for anyone who speaks
it. It is not “nonsense,” as my father had dubbed it, and being able to
prove this to him has made me even prouder for loving Spanish.
My love of Spanish has influenced much of who I am today. The
fight that I led against family objections and immigration to a new land28
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
has allowed me to develop an ambitious and aggressive spirit in the
face of adversity. It has made me stronger, and taught me that I must
always fight with unstoppable perseverance for all that is important to
me. I am determined to use my love and passion for Spanish to make
an impact on the world. Currently, Spanish is the primary language
of 21 nations around the globe, and one of the six official languages
of the Un. I want to be the link that connects these nations to the
United States, and to the 40 million Americans whose native language
is Spanish. I want to use my ability to speak Spanish to learn more
about the people of these nations, both on a professional and personal
level. no matter where the path of life takes me, I wish for Spanish to
always be a part of me.
Through the years, Spanish has evolved into one of my most re-
markable accomplishments. Today, I am prouder than ever of loving
Spanish-of having something that distinguishes me from the rest, some-
thing that makes me unique. It is not often the case for a romanian-
American girl living in Los Angeles to exhibit such passion and devo-
tion towards a language that is foreign to both her native and adoptive
countries. nevertheless, Spanish is a big part of whom I am today, and
an even bigger part of who I will be in the future.

“From Flaubert to Frisbee”
Aditya Kumar
Brown University
ThIS SUmmEr, I wENT To ThE governor’s Honors Program, also
known as gHP, a six-week intensive college-like experience where the
best and brightest students in georgia gather to learn and grow as in-
dividuals. It was the best thing that has ever happened to me. That
is something of a hackneyed phrase; people cheapen the extremes of
language by constantly using superlatives for everyday occurrences,
making it harder and harder to actually describe the few subtle and
transcendent moments of life. In Madame Bovary, Flaubert claims that30
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
language is but a cracked kettle on which we play music for the bears to
dance, while we dream of making the stars weep. The experiences we
have never fit within the too-close confines of language; but I will try
anyway. The classes that I attended were nothing like the classes that I
would take normally. nowhere else would the teachers encourage six-
teen and seventeen year-olds to look for sexual imagery in Shakespeare,
and then find even more than they did, without the exercise being
sordid instead of literary. I attended classes named anything from Dirty
Words: Clean Thoughts (a class on Profanity; the only course in which
the use of profane or vulgar language was prohibited) to Teenage Female
Angst: Beyond Holden Caulfield to Buffy the Vampire Slayer. All of them
opened my mind to a brand-new way of looking at the world, and pro-
cessing information. Thanks to the varying education that I received, I
know that valuable information about life is not only in the “classics,”
but even appears in seemingly mindless and trashy zombie films.
While I learned a lot in the classrooms of gHP, I feel that most of
my growth occurred outside of the classroom. I met the sort of people
who will change the world, who will go forth into the world and, with-
out making a big name, will do the things that make the world a better
place. My best friends there were people that I would never have met;
people I would never have known existed; people that I can now not
imagine life without. One was a math major, an excellent athlete in
every sport, and an accomplished singer; the running joke was that the
only thing that he was bad at was failing. The other was a phenomenal
writer, always ready to play an endearing trick on somebody, and the
former’s girl-friend. Both of them were fairly conservative Christians,
and yet totally accepting of me for whom I was, despite any of my
clashes with their beliefs. I did not limit myself though, and made it al-
most a mission to find and talk to as many of the people there, because
I was sure that each and every one of them would have an interesting
perspective on things. Once I was walking back from playing Frisbee,
and was stopped to discuss what the ethical framework for life ought
to be; just for fun. The experience that I had there has undeniably
changed me forever.31

“Raising the Bar”
Anonymous
MIT
ThIS pAST SUmmEr I hAd ThE opportunity to participate in a highly
rigorous academic program at MIT called MITES, Minority Introduction
to Engineering and Science. For six and a half weeks I lived with 68
other rising seniors and college undergrads. Though we were all warned
about how hard the program would be, we were all at the top of our
classes and refused to believe it- after all, who did they think we were?
The first day we sat together in a small auditorium, unaware of each
other and of what lay ahead. We were told that our confidence would
be shattered, our minds blown away, and our lives changed forever.
Still somewhat unmoved, we were not afraid.
By the second week of MITES valedictorians, nerds, bookworms,
and techies alike were leaning on each other’s shoulders at two in the
morning crying over problem sets they had imagined only in night-
mares. It is a well known fact that hard times bring friends closer to-
gether, but I would have never expected for these strangers to become
my best friends, my support system, or even my family. The 16 hours
days I was accustomed to at home did not last long. I was getting an
average of four hours of sleep per night, finishing a book per week,
zooming through subjects once foreign to me, and constructing a semi-
autonomous robot from drill motors all at the same time.
We were each enrolled in 5 classes, my schedule consisted of
Introductory Physics, Engineering Design, Chemistry, first year
Calculus, and Humanities. In the month and a half we completed a
semester of Physics and Chemistry each, a full year of Calculus, the ma-
terial equivalent to a semester in AP literature, and introductory level
engineering. The work was so intense that when I entered school in the33
fall I enrolled in second year Calculus, and maintained the only A in AP
Physics, having no physics experience prior to MITES.
Since this program I have not been satisfied with the regular course-
work given at my school. I am constantly on the lookout for new pro-
grams to enroll in and other teams, clubs, and groups to join. This
academic school year marks the peak of my involvement in educa-
tional opportunities. I have somehow managed to find time for the
Speech and Debate team, ACE mentoring team, swim team, Science
Bowl team, California Honors Society and Scholarship Federation, Play
Production, Jewish Student Union, gEAr-UP Mentoring Program, and
folklorico dancing.
MITES was the most challenging experience of my life. The pro-
gram is the single most pivotal point in my academic endeavors to date.
The assistants we had had all gone through the program and agreed
that even in college at Harvard, MIT, Caltech, and Princeton, nothing
came close. The motivation and encouragement I gained from MITES
has fueled my academic pursuits and pushed me to raise the bar.

“Rosencrantz and Guildenstern”
Fareez Giga
Stanford University
“roSENcrANTz ANd GUILdENSTErN ArE dEAd” IS an astound-
ing, intellectually challenging, and humorous concoction. Stoppard
cleverly captures the characters of Hamlet, written by Shakespeare, but
creates somewhat of a comic tragedy. Clearly an oxymoron, but pro-
foundly effective. The play focuses on the story of Hamlet, but from the
viewpoint of rosencrantz and guildenstern, and it also takes the theo-
ries proposed in Hamlet and presents them in a comic, rather than sul-
len, manner. One of the most humorous scenes is when rosencrantz,
or guildenstern, since the distinction is never truly made between
the two, is laying on a table and thinking to himself what it is like
to be “dead in a box.” This scene proves to be hilarious, despite its
deep meaning, and parallels the infamous “To be, or not to be” speech
in Hamlet. Life’s unanswerable questions are constantly being asked
throughout the play, but by inserting these dubious inquiries within
a comedy, Stoppard is able to captivate and preserve his audience’s at-
tention. In fact, the humor provides the wiring, which connects the
3536 messages of the play to our own chaotic existences. This brilliant liter-
ary work captures the essence of a tragedy within a comedy, something
only few authors can accomplish. It is able to provide profound, theo-
retical ideas that have long been questioned into a comic perspective,
and yet keep its integrity.


“Puzzles”
Anonymous
Harvard University
whEN mY GrANdmoThEr cAmE To VISIT five years ago, she
brought me a 3,000 piece jigsaw puzzle. To most, this would not sound
very exciting—it would be almost as bad as a shirt saying “My grand-
parents went to India, and all they bought me was this stupid shirt.”
My reaction to the puzzle was different. I cut open the cardboard box
as soon as I could, and poured the pieces out onto my puzzleboard.
I worked patiently on the puzzle for hours at a time, my excitement
building as more and more of the picture was revealed. I cut down my
sleep time until the image of a picturesque forest was complete. The
puzzle overshadowed all else in my life, if only for that short period of
time.
Working on puzzles has helped me gain focus, determination, and
patience. I have learned to apply these qualities to every task I face,
dealing with the outside world in the same fashion as I would a puzzle.
My love for science stems largely from this; science requires the same
logical and levelheaded approach that a puzzle does, and as evidenced
by the many puzzles decorating my house, this is an approach which
suits my skills and temperament. This intellectual stimulation, coupled
with a desire to discover more about life’s mysteries, compels me to
pursue a career in scientific research.
This summer, I worked in a cardiology laboratory at UCLA, look-
ing at proteins associated with HDL to understand how atherosclerosis
can be averted. After some experiments provided questionable results,
I was given the task of confirming that the viruses we were working
with had been packaged and identified correctly. I spent weeks running
DnA gels, looking for specific genes in each virus, but my results were
inconsistent. I was frustrated, but instead of giving up on my assign-
ment, I was even more determined to find an explanation. I considered
every aspect of the experiment, working backwards until I reached the
source—the primers I had used to amplify the DnA were nonspecific
and ineffective, and thus useless in distinguishing the three genes of
interest to us. Knowing this, I was able to alter my experiment accord-
ingly, looking at protein content instead of DnA sequences. I finally
showed that two of the three viruses were correct; the third, however,
needed to be repackaged. My work was crucial to the undergraduate
student I was working with, because he was able to redesign his experi-
ment to account for this third virus.
Working in a lab was an exhilarating experience for me. Even though
I gave up lying on the beach to instead play with viruses and chemicals,
the compulsion to understand these proteins inspired and motivated
me. I am tremendously proud of the piece I contributed to the athero-
sclerosis puzzle: a small piece, but integral nonetheless. The sense of
accomplishment I felt because of my work in the UCLA lab was much
the same as that which I felt upon completing the 3,000 piece puzzle
my grandmother gave me. This feeling is one I hope to experience
throughout my life, because the atherosclerosis puzzle is most assur-
edly not the last such puzzle I will work on.41

“Addressing injustices”
Mathew Griffin
Brown University
mY rEASoNS For wANTING To BE a doctor are very similar to why
most people choose their career path: I want to make things fairer.
People such as social workers are out to help make the world a little
less unjust. It’s not necessarily injustice from other people that I want to
fight as these people do, but injustice from other factors. Many people
who are close to me have been struck down from their future in ways
that it’s impossible for them to recover. My aunt was a great artist and
loving mother before she developed severe schizophrenia. She now
locks herself in her house for weeks at a time and remains isolated
from her family. My friend Eric, who was once in his school’s varsity
basketball league, cannot play his senior season because a car acci-
dent left him nearly paralyzed. Finally, my friend vince’s depression has
stripped him of his will to live, and despite attempts of over a dozen
psychiatrists and medications he still spends most of his days aimlessly
lying in bed. While I try very hard to cheer him up by talking to and
entertaining him I am deeply concerned about his future. This trend is
something that I’m seeing almost everywhere. More and more people
are becoming depressed and hopeless, and I want to be able to put life
and happiness back into them.
not only do I see these injustices in my life, when I’m volunteer-
ing at my local hospital my desire to help become even more embold-
ened by the people I meet. A new grandmother I met recently had
her spine shattered when she fell from a ladder back onto a table. As I
talked to her, I remembered how many times I’ve seen pictures of my
grandmother lifting me and my cousins and caring for us, and became
overcome with emotion. While I don’t believe her ability to care for her
grandchildren will be destroyed, I know that she won’t have the same
opportunities as other grandparents and the inequality of the situation
makes me extremely upset. I want nothing more than to give back her
ability to walk and lift her grandkids. I believe being a doctor can allow
me to bring this closer.43

“My Unpopular Decision”
Shiv M. Gaglani
Harvard University
SINcE I hAVE ALwAYS BEEN INTErESTEd in science and technolo-
gy, I subscribed to many research magazines, including Popular Science
and Scientific American. However, until 10th grade, I never had the op-
portunity to contribute to medical research—something that I had al-
ways wanted to do. Then, one day I read an article titled “Print Me a
Pancreas, Please” in Popular Science, which described novel tissue engi-
neering research involving modification of off-the-shelf inkjet printers
to print out living cells in a “bioink” solution. Having read much about
tissue engineering, I realized this “organ printing” approach could po-
tentially address problems of traditional tissue engineering methods,
such as the need to precisely place specific cell types in 3D scaffolds.
I was so excited that I came up with a few ideas of my own about ad-
vancing the printer capabilities. I was impelled to contact the research-
ers at the Medical University of South Carolina (MUSC) and Clemson
University (CU).
I corresponded with the professor at MUSC and visited his lab
multiple times, but realized that the actual printers were kept at CU.
Therefore, I contacted the researchers at CU, who did not reply to
about 50 of my e-mails. not the one to give up easily, I called the
Principal Investigator (PI) and expressed my eagerness to contribute
to the research. After seeing my resumé and computer-aided designs
(“roadmap to Organ Printing”), he invited me to meet him at his lab on
October 18th, which conflicted with my school’s Homecoming dance.
To my friends’ bewilderment I made the “unpopular” decision to miss
the dance. They could not understand why I preferred driving 26 hours
to meet a researcher and miss all the fun at the once-a-year dance. To
me, this was clearly the right choice. I was trading a great school expe-
rience to literally get my hands into cutting-edge medical research.
The PI was so impressed with my original CAD designs (“roadmap
to Organ Printing”) and my resume that he invited me to research at his
lab. Over Christmas and other school breaks, I learned many laboratory
techniques, conducted novel research, and independently succeeded
in “printing” the first functional 3D branching tube of smooth muscle
cells (a rudimentary blood vessel). This research helped me win many
science competitions and honors, including 2nd Place in Medicine
and Health at the Intel International Science and Engineering Fair and
become the Top Florida Presenter at the national Junior Science and
Humanities Symposium. My computer-aided designs were published
in Biomaterials Forum and the Journal of Thoracic and Cardiovascular
Surgery.
This remarkable experience inspired me to perform many addition-
al research projects and I consider it a turning point in my life. It has
increased my passion for research and my determination to be a phy-
sician and work on devices or pharmaceuticals that improve people’s
quality of life. I have also become more confident in my research ef-
forts and am able to contact any researcher to pursue a position in
their laboratory. I have realized that there are many opportunities for
students like myself to contribute to labs and brainstorm solutions for
current problems.

“Healing Beyond Borders”
Mathew Griffin
Brown University
whILE hEALING pEopLE wILL BE mY main priority as a doctor,
I don’t want to only help individuals overcome disease after disease.
For true change I must work on a much larger scale. I plan on be-
ing involved in research, and drawing ideas and information from my
patients and sharing it with researchers to find answers about the ail-
ments that plague the human mind. By being a voice from the front
lines I hope that I can catalyze the development of treatments and
cures. Additionally, I want to become an advocate for public health. If
a government is doing something that is detrimental to the health of its
citizens, someone needs to point it out, and fight for a better alterna-
tive. Unless I do this then the people I help will continue to get sick
regardless of how much I help.
Still, my main task as a doctor is to help patients, and I want to help
as many of them as I can. Seeing the reality of the health of the world
is very important to me if I am going to properly improve it. I have
been so fortunate to live in a place where medicine is so refined, and
I am even more blessed to know that I have the chance to help spread
this refinement. While issues such as world hunger are constantly
being improved, doctors in other countries are scarce and locals are47
still being trained in ancient ways and often hurting their patents more
than helping. I want to give back my blessings a hundred-fold and
spread better medicine. First, I want to see the health of our world as
I help it by joining Medecins Sans Frontieres as soon as I can. Only
after I help things first hand can I make a mature decision on how I
should try to help the world as a whole. I feel the experiences that I
get from my education and the experiences helping people across the
world will give me a very strong ability to know how to help to the
best of my abilities. Today I am already planning for this journey by
teaching myself foreign languages. I hope that by the time I am ready
to help people, knowing many languages will help me bond with my
patients and truly make me a doctor without borders. I plan on fighting
for health for as long as I can, and I want to help every person I can
regardless of background, money or stigma.

“scientific sparks”
Ariela Koehler
MIT
GrowING Up wITh SEpArATEd pArENTS hAS not been the easiest
life, but it has been my life. When I was younger, I’d hate going out to
eat with my dad and seeing a family of four happily enjoying a meal.
If my mother and father ever went out together to a restaurant, it was
with me, once a year for my birthday, and was usually interspersed
with various disagreements.
It was when I was in first grade that I began to realize that, although
my parents had their differences and no longer loved each other, I was
the one thing that united them. I had no basis to be envious of what I
thought of as “complete” families.
Both my mother and father, wanting the best for me, recognized
early on my love and fascination with all things scientific. They worked
to create opportunities for me to pursue my interest. My mother would
read at bedtime, at my request, nature field guides instead of nursery
rhymes. The two of us often made long journeys at 3:00 A.M. to witness
meteor showers in the clear skies of the mountains. She encouraged me
to set up experiments around the house, which I happily did—mea-
suring the growth of palm tree saplings and dissecting owl pellets to
extract the mouse bones inside. An environmental scientist, my father
could not wait to transfer all of his scientific knowledge into my young
head. needless to say, many of his spontaneous lectures were far above
my grasp—I still vaguely remember a quantum physics talk he gave me
when I was eight—but they inspired me to learn more on my own.
My thirst for scientific knowledge grew over the years, without
limits in any one specific area. Then, in January four years ago, my49
Chapter 5: Career
Aunt Diane died after a five-year battle with breast cancer. It was during
my aunt’s illness that I realized I could use my natural love of science to
benefit others facing similar challenges.
I have continually pushed myself closer to this goal by excelling in
my AP science classes, studying biotechnology at UC Davis through the
COSMOS program, and competing as a member of my school’s Science
Bowl Team. This past summer, I had the opportunity to intern at the
reijo Pera Lab at Stanford University through the Stanford Institutes of
Medicine Summer research Program. During this two-month intern-
ship, I worked with human embryonic stem cells to explore the func-
tion of PrDM1, a potentially-useful gene in the creation of regenerative
medicines.
The scientific spark my parents recognized years ago has shaped my
life, and with it, I wish to shape the lives of others. I aspire to become a
biomedical researcher, a career that harnesses my long-time fascination
of science and my commitment to improve the quality of life for those
facing medical challenges. It would be a privilege to work alongside
scientists, exploring new treatments and technologies to create exciting
new options for patients and their families.

“Researching Cancer”
Anonymous
Harvard University
I Trod ThE mUd IN ThE misty spring rain. It was Qing Ming, the
holiday in China when we honored our deceased ancestors. On the
ground of the cemetery, drenched flowers lay in my grandfather’s re-
membrance. That morning—a month before my sixth birthday—I
clung tightly to my mother’s sleeves and finally learned why he passed
away.
My grandfather had been a victim of cancer. Because the diagnosis
came too late, all treatment was futile. As my mother whispered this to
me with grief in her eyes, I stomped angrily in the mud. I blamed the
doctors who couldn’t find the tumor in time to save him. That rainy
morning launched my dream to help cure cancer—a common wish,
but one that fueled a life-changing pursuit. Knowing that the best pro-Chapter 5: Career
51
tection against cancer was to detect it as early as possible, I examined
the widely used methods of detection. I read about mammography and
was astounded to learn that it failed to detect a large percentage of
cases. As I wondered how to make detection more accurate, I heard
about a research internship program at ____ Cancer Center. I jumped
at the opportunity.
There, my mentors encouraged me to investigate cancer’s genetic
causes. I became intrigued by a gene suspected to play a role in the
onset of breast cancer. We examined a process of gene-silencing—
known as methylation—that changed DnA structure while keeping
the sequence itself intact. Through a series of assays, we pinpointed
the methylated sites in the gene sequence that distinguished cancerous
breast cells from healthy cells. These were markers of disease!
The thrill came from knowing the vast clinical applications of the
discovery. Finding such markers is a step toward the individualization
of cancer treatment. genomics-based diagnostics would detect cancer
earlier than traditional procedures. Also, since methylation does not
change the DnA sequence, it is reversible. Therapeutics could target
these sites and minimize harm to healthy tissue.
Personalized cancer diagnostics promise a new dawn, but they are
not yet reality. Many more genes need to be studied before we can fully
comprehend the roots of the disease. Awed by the complexity of can-
cer, I realized that my dream was much more intricate than I imagined.
However, my youthful passion in medicine did not dwindle. Instead,
it strengthened and matured into a strategy. As my vague goals shaped
into specific inquiries, my curiosity became insatiable. The joy of un-
covering the unknown affirmed my love for science. My generation will
keep pushing the boundaries of knowledge, and nothing would give
me more fulfillment than continuing to fight in the war on cancer.
I recall that rainy Qing Ming morning when I gazed at my grandfa-
ther’s gravesite. I wish I could tell him about the adventure he inspired.
This war will be arduous, but every little “eureka!” along the way is a
portent of victory.52

“The Computer Doctor”
Mathew Griffin
Brown University
EVErY TImE I drIVE INTo A client’s driveway, there’s always that mo-
ment. That moment where I must shed any doubt I have and become
adamant. That moment where I realize that, people are depending on
me, and I must do my best to help them. And that moment where, with
tool bag to my side, I must prepare to face whatever problem is waiting
for me in their house. This time is no different. As with the hundreds
of other problems I’ve faced, I must remember that every problem has
a solution, and I can find it.
When I am greeted by a middle-aged woman as I approach the
house, my remaining doubts evaporate. Once I see the individual I am
about to help I become saturated with resolve. However, all she will see
from me is a smile as I ask her how she is. I then ask her what the prob-
lem is, and she leads me to her computer. She tells me that her com-
puter is shutting down randomly, and then leaves as I begin to work.
With a simple push of the power button, the process begins.
Unfortunately, for this case, just as quickly as it starts—the computer
shuts off. never discouraged, I dismantle it to look for obvious signs
of damage. However, everything here appears normal: wires secure,
circuits shining.
But there’s another test that may work. Eyes focused on the inside
of the computer, I turn it on again. I have only a moment before it suc-
cumbs to its ailment again. Additionally, each time it starts could be
damaging, so I have to make this count. When the sound of electricity
surging through the computer begins, I immediately notice a vital fan
failing to twirl: the computer is simply overheating. With a quick pull
of the power I anesthetize the computer and operate. Using a replace-
ment and screwdriver from my bag, I give the computer a new fan.
Then, I start the computer nervously, but it starts perfectly.
My confidence and determination sweat off as accomplishment. I
quickly look for the woman. She can tell I solved her problem as I walk
towards her with a grin, and she smiles too.
This case is one of the hundreds I’ve solved over the past few years,
all without a single failure to find a practical solution. I started my
business because after seeing how grossly overcharged the community
was by corporate technicians, I believed it would be a practical and
great way for me to help the community and have a job. After fixing
computers for my school for a year, school officials quickly noticed and
spread word of my work, allowing my business to spread like wildfire
throughout the local communities. With determination (and some cre-
ativity) I’ve solved some very unordinary and strange problems. I’d like
to use this same willpower to help people in even better ways. no mat-
ter how impossible the problems I encounter may seem I will always
remember what I tell myself when I fix computers: every problem must
have a solution, and I can find it.

“Unshakable Worth”
Sarah Langberg
Princeton University
pArT oF mE IS mISSING. IT’S an identifiable, yet indescribable ab-
sence. It is odd how I can find more information about the initial sup-
posed creators, Adam and Eve, than I can about my own. I don’t know
my father, and I doubt that I ever will. He left two weeks after I was
born because I lacked a certain male member. Fidelity to personal con-
victions was more important to him than a life that he had just shep-
herded into this world. Because of his definitive choice, I will only be
able to associate with him as a support check number until I am eigh-
teen years of age. After that, who knows?
When I was eleven, my mother decided to call this long-gone man
in search of owed child support. After eleven years of nothingness,
financial distress caused my mother call this absolute last resource. In
my house, we had an early 90s telephone that had a speaker/mute
function. I can still see that outdated piece of technology in the corner
of my mind. That speaker/mute function granted me the only contact
with my father that I have ever known.
I was a mischievous child; I knew that day that my mother was
physically on the phone with my birthfather. I was naïve. I thought
that hearing my father’s voice would fill the void created by years of
absence. I thought that hearing his voice would allow me to place my
father on the same grand plateau as other fathers who had always been
there for their children, loved their children. I snuck into the room
with the technical phone and silently listened in on the conversation. I
felt smart and sly as I pressed the button that put the stranger’s voice on
the speakerphone. “Hah,” I thought, “he can’t hear me, but I can hear
him.” Maybe if he would have known the simple fact that his daughter
was listening, maybe then some shred of human decency would have
shined through.
Those few moments provided me with the only ounce of a man that
comprises half of my biology that I will ever know. Unfortunately, the
stranger didn’t know I was listening. Like my life before, he never knew
that I was there. As he yelled at my mother, I could hear the fear in her
voice as he responded to her pleas with such malice. My mother tried
to convey to my father that I was not just his incarnation to be provided
for, but rather, a spectacular human being. As I sat there, listening in-
tently to the conversation, I felt validated as a daughter by my mother’s
words, but shattered as a human being by my “father’s” insolence.
In the moments that followed, that little girl, initially so excited
at the prospect of finally being able to physically hear her creator,
was eternally crushed. “Just because she exists doesn’t mean I have
to love her; it doesn’t mean I have to know her. I don’t love her, and
I never will.” Crash. Is it possible for the strongest muscle in your
body to simply break in half? One of my genetic halves had declared
that he loathed my very existence. Those words succeeded to shatter
my heart into a million pieces. I didn’t know how to react. I turned
off the phone and slithered back to my room. How could someone
be so heartless? How could someone that heartless be a part of me?
no words.
I have been sobered by pain in a way that no psychological study
ever could attempt. I may never know my father because of his deci-
sion, and in turn, he will never know me. In the end, his loss will be
the greater one. My “father’s” shining example of misconduct ironically
guides me as a moral, ethical person. rather than searching for any
fault within myself, I use my father’s failure as a tool. I take an earnest59
and honest stance in life. I know my great worth. I have nothing to
prove to anyone, including myself.

“no longer invisible”
Angelica
University of Chicago
I wISh I wAS INVISIBLE. I wish I was invisible. I wish I was invisible.
One of my biggest fears has always been going to an unfamiliar place,
but each time I have had the satisfaction of knowing that at the end of
the day I can go home. I am a shy person, and it has always been dif-
ficult for me to adjust to a new environment. Transitioning from eighth
grade to high school was especially difficult for me because my high
school was, in fact, a boarding school, which meant that that feeling of
satisfaction was no longer present at the end of the day but postponed
to the end of the week. Living at LFA was a completely new world for
me and nothing I had experienced could have prepared me for it.
With confused eyes and nothing less than a nauseous sensation in
my stomach I entered my first day of high school. growing up, I had al-
ways gone to school with people who looked like me, sounded like me,
and dressed liked me, but here I quickly learned that I was the minor-
ity. I was not alone in this. Two of my friends came to LFA with me and,
with this in mind, my shyness and I did not think it necessary to make
new friends. Besides being one of the only schools with its own ice rink
and providing only the latest technology for its students, it suddenly
hit me that my new home had countless possibilities, but, before those
possibilities could be realized, I had to take initiative. I learned a very
important lesson at LFA: you will only get out of life as much as you
put into it. Stepping out of my comfort zone allowed me to discover an
interest and skill for volleyball and hidden leadership as the captain of
the Jv team. I became a tutor and friend for young Hispanic students Chapter 
at the nuestro Center, and they reminded me how important it is to
give back to the community. After numerous all nighters, I developed
a system where I could get all of my homework done and still be able
to get involved with sports and extracurriculars without having to sac-
rifice any sleep time.
Towards the end of my sophomore year a family member’s sickness
unfortunately forced me to leave my school and return home. I left LFA
and joined my new family, Mirta ramirez Computer Science Charter
High School. Containing a student body that was 99 percent Hispanic,
I was no longer the minority. I had unconsciously become accustomed
to the LFA way of life because, in my mind, this tiny mustard yellow
building with no more than four windows could not possibly compare
to my old home. I was right. no, my new home was not as big nor as
fancy, but I discovered that was not a setback. Although the resources
were not directly visible nor as easily accessible, I learned that obstacles
did not exist for students there. Most, if not all, of the students had the
same hunger for knowledge as I had.
This summer my school announced that the building which we had
been using had fire code violations and we could not return to our
building in the fall. Throughout the summer my school did not have
a building and did not find one until a few weeks after school started.
By that time I had already taken a decision to, once again, leave my
home and join yet another family. What I realized on my first day at
Josephinum Academy, was that my shyness had not tagged along and
I was eager to go to school. The nauseous feeling had left my stomach
and enthusiasm had entered. I had already gained and learned so much
from the people I had met in my two previous schools that I could not
wait to continue my journey and embark on yet another discovery.
The knowledge that I have gained from these three schools is some-
thing I will take with me far beyond college. My roommate, across-the-
hall mates, and classmates have influenced my life as much as I hope
to have impacted theirs. It is evident to me that they have helped me
develop into the very much visible person I am today. I have learned to
step outside of my comfort zone, and I have learned that diversity is so
much more than the tint of our skin. My small mustard colored school
taught me that opportunity and success only requires desire.
I would be an asset to your college because as I continue on my
journey to success, I will take advantage of every opportunity that is62
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
available to me and make sure to contribute as much as I can too.
now I am visible. now I am visible. now I am visible, and I want to
be seen.

“Power of People”
Suzanne Arrington
Columbia University
I BELIEVE IN pEopLE. ThIS coNVIcTIoN drives my action and am-
bitions, and defines me in a world of cynicism and doubt. I have seen
the power of people and their ability to come together in times of need
and joy and sorrow. I know that ultimately, humans strive for belong-
ing and community; thus, while loneliness and anger may always be
in existence, so will be togetherness and bliss. My strong faith in hu-
manity stems from my witnessing of the best in human qualities while
doing the MS150 and during Hurricane Ike, and pushes me to pursue
a career in helping others. Both of these events have allowed me to see
humanity at its best, performing selfless acts of benevolence.
For the past four years, I have participated in the BPMS150 bike
tour from Houston to Austin. This 175 mile ride raises funds for the
national MS Society, which sponsors medical research for multiple scle-
rosis and aids the families of its victims. I can say from experience, the
ride is grueling; enormous hills, headwinds, fatigue, and body aches
are prevalent throughout. Yet every year, over thirteen thousand riders
decide to put their minds and bodies through two days of torture so
that they can help those who live with it every day. I have raised, over
four years, more than eight thousand dollars to benefit the MS Society,
and have never regretted any of the painful training or the ride itself.
The view at the starting line is one of the most empowering I have ever
witnessed: thousands of people, all of them with their hands on their
handle bars, one foot poised on a pedal. All are ready to experience
exhaustion for the benefit of others, like my father. He was diagnosed
with MS when I was four, and is a constant motivator for me. I wit-
nessed him become blind in one eye, and struggle with a body that re-
fuses to function normally. I participate in this ride every year for him,
as do thirteen thousand others. The power of people will ultimately
help my father to receive better medical treatment, and maybe even
one day, be cured.
While writing this essay, I was also able to observe and be a part of
amazing human efforts. Hurricane Ike devastated Southeastern Texas,
particularly the Houston and galveston areas. Much of my extended
family lives in galveston, and so was forced to evacuate. Without hesi-
tation, my parents opened up our home to aunts, uncles, grandpar-
ents, cousins, and pets. This is the environment in which I have always
lived; our home is anyone’s shelter, our food is anyone’s nourishment.
Together, our entire family weathered the storm, and comforted one
another. My aunt’s home received electrical power prior to my home,
and so she eagerly welcomed us to stay with her. Large scale displays
of altruism could be seen in the hundreds of University of Houston
students handing out food and water to those affected by the hurri-
cane. During times of need, people band together for safety and solace.
Community is instinctual; dismiss the notions of survival of the fittest.
People truly desire closeness with one another.
In the future, I hope to pursue a career in public health. I love
studying science and math, and I would like to use this passion to
benefit large numbers of people. Many go without basic medical treat-
ment, and this causes a huge discrepancy in quality of life and health in
the population. Even if this problem can never completely be solved,
I want to help remedy this as much as possible. With small deeds and
cooperative effort, humans can accomplish immense good. I know this
because I believe in people, and I have seen them at their finest.

“self Mind”
Timothy Nguyen Le
Yale University
JULY 22 LAST YEAr wAS mEANT to be a typical Sunday. Just like every
Sunday, my mother and I were getting ready to visit my older brother at
his Waikiki apartment, where we would talk for a little while. But July
22nd was different. That chilly morning, we got a phone call from his
roommate telling us my brother was going to the emergency room. As
we drove to Queen’s Hospital, I didn’t know what to think. Although
I tried to assure myself that nothing serious could have happened to
him, anxiety clouded my mind.
My brother, Tyson, emigrated from vietnam with my mom and my
other older brother to the United States in 1990, with dreams of a new
life and fresh opportunities. He enrolled in high school with virtually
no knowledge of the English language. Even though he had to simulta-
neously manage a part-time job at McDonald’s, he excelled in academ-
ics and was the top of his class in calculus.
At 34 years old, he was the epitome of health: he ran marathons ev-
ery year, had a healthy diet, and never smoked or drank alcohol. When
I got to the Er and saw him lying in the hospital bed, he looked like
the Tyson that I always knew. nothing seemed wrong. He just seemed
tired, and he didn’t have the energy to speak.
However, coming back from an MrI scan, my brother seemed dif-
ferent. His eyes were unfocused and dazed, as if he didn’t see the room
in front of him. Uneasiness and fear rushed down my spine. I shouted
for help, just as my brother’s body started to spasm. I felt a profound
emotion surging up in me, one that I had never experienced before--a
wrenching sense of trepidation, laced with sickening adrenaline. The
seizure took control of his body, and he began to foam at the mouth.
His body seized up, but I was frozen still. I didn’t know what to do. I
felt useless and terrified.
Tyson told me, when I was just a kid, not to work while I was in
high school. I was young, though, and still wanted to work because I
wanted to make money, like him. During his high school years, he took
on a part-time job after school, even though it meant he had to come
home late every night. Often, he would stay up through the early hours
of the morning, determined to complete his schoolwork. He held downChapter
the job, despite its exhausting physical toll, because he had to: he had
to assist with the bills and support my mom, so that she could take
English classes at the local community college. Tyson said that I didn’t
have to work, because he would always be there to support me.
While my brother was in the hospital, my mother and I went there
every day from before dawn to late at night, when the streets were emp-
ty. Tyson had developed severe brain inflammation as a result of the
seizure. He had dozens of tests done: X-rays, MrIs, blood tests, spinal
taps, a bronchoscopy, and even a brain biopsy. A labyrinth of Iv tubes,
wires, and cables were hooked up to his body, monitoring his life signs
and feeding dozens of chemicals and solutions into his bloodstream.
The doctors kept him constantly sedated. His brain inflammation was
life-threatening, and he caught a case of severe pneumonia. His doc-
tors had to place him on life support. In three weeks, my brother had
gone from being in the best shape of his life, from being a veritable
Superman, to laying on his deathbed.
When I was a kid, I was a crybaby. I cried when I didn’t get the toy
I wanted. I cried when I didn’t get the food I wanted. However, at some
point during my childhood, around the age of six, I stopped crying.
no matter how much I was teased or pushed around, I never cried. no
matter how much I was mocked about my clothes, or my ethnicity, I
didn’t cry.
August 11 last year was the first time since childhood that I cried.
It was the day that my brother passed away. And it was the first time
that I ever saw my mom cry. It was a traumatizing experience, and for
a while I was depressed that such a tragedy could occur so arbitrarily
to someone like my brother: someone who was strong, someone who
was healthy, someone who lived by a strong moral code and never sac-
rificed his values for material rewards. But after a while, I realized that
the circumstances of his death were not a refutation of his beliefs, but
instead, a reminder of their importance. Even though we cannot con-
trol the twists and turns of life, we must deal with them as best we can.
My brother, even though he didn’t know English, enrolled in school
and ultimately excelled. And at the same time, to help our mother go to
school on the side, he took on a part-time job. Certainly he must have
wished that he hadn’t faced those disadvantages, but he didn’t com-
plain. rather, he faced the realities of his situation head-on, and suc-
ceeded. Tyson’s death was a tragic reflection of the cold, random chance68
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
of nature, but it was in no way any verdict on his philosophy: instead,
I realized, it served as a clear reminder to me that the worst can hap-
pen to even the best, and that the strength of an individual lies in his
ability to maintain his values when faced with such difficult situations.
Today, I still hold onto the lessons that my brother taught me through
his actions: to put the needs of your family first, to always persevere
in the face of adversity, and to never compromise your ideals for petty
desires. To lose heart in these values because of his death, then, would
be a harsh disservice to Tyson’s legacy.

“A summer of stem Cells”
Ariela Koehler
MIT
“IT AppEArS ALL YoUr cELLS ArE dEAd.”
Only shock prevented the tears from streaming down my face. My
cells were dead. After being accepted into the competitive Stanford
Institutes of Medicine Summer research Program (SIMr), and spend-
ing approximately 170 hours of the past month manipulating human
embryonic stem cells (hESCs), I was back to square one—with only
one month of my internship remaining. How in the world was I going
to make up for lost time?
As I asked myself the question, I thought back to exactly how I had
spent those 170 hours, working to develop the stem cells which now,
under the microscope, were hollow with the absence of life.
I started my internship a little overwhelmed by the fancy hoods,
automatic pipettes, and high-speed centrifuges. But by the first of the
170 hours, I had familiarized myself with the equipment and begun
my quest to find the function of PrDM1—a gene thought to control
replication in hESCs. First though, I needed to make a growth medium
for the hESCs. I painstakingly measured to the ten millionth of a liter,70
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
testing the accuracy of each measurement multiple times before finally
dispensing it into the medium solution. After I had plated the hESCs
on my new medium, I waited with bated breath for the results.
To my joy, two days later, my cells were thriving and even outgrow-
ing their new home. Known for their ability to quickly replicate, it was
logical they would need to be frequently transferred. The difficult part
was that, as part of my experiment to find the purpose of PrDM1, I
had different strains of hESCs (some serving as “control” strains) which
could not be mixed. Transferring hESCs is a process requiring great
concentration and coordination. It took me about three hours the first
time. By the end of the month, though, transferring was second nature
and my cells were doing well—I had inserted a fluorescent protein
into their DnA to verify the hESCs containing the resistant vector were
living, as hypothesized. I had successfully created hundreds of stable
hESC colonies of different strains. Everything seemed to be going so
well . . .
But now was not the time to reminiscence. I snapped out of my
daydream and refocused on the situation at hand.
“Ariela? I know taking the news the first time can be hard, but keep
in mind, you probably didn’t do anything wrong. You know how sensi-
tive they are . . . this sort of thing is common when working with stem
cells.”
“I know,” I said, smiling genuinely this time, “I’m ready to try
again.”
My project was not completed by the end of the summer, but
through hard work, I was able to replicate parts of the experiment to
produce valuable data. Although the experiment did not go as planned,
I am proud of myself for persevering. As Thomas Edison said, “Our
greatest weakness lies in giving up. The most certain way to succeed is
always to try just one more time.”

“All Worth it”
Anonymous
Cornell University
hE’S IN mY ArmS, ThE NEwEST addition to the family. I’m too over-
whelmed. “That’s why I wanted you to go to Bishop Loughlin,” she
says, preparing baby bottles. “But ma, I chose Tech because I wanted to
be challenged.” “Well, you’re going to have to deal with it,” she replies,
adding, “Your aunt watched you when she was in high school.” “But
ma, there are three of them. It’s hard!”
returning home from a summer program that cemented intellectual
and social independence to find a new baby was not exactly thrilling.
Add him to the toddler and seven year old sister I have and there’s no
wonder why I sing songs from Blue’s Clues and The Backyardigans
instead of sane seventeen year old activities. It’s never been simple; as
a female and the oldest, I’m to significantly rear the children and clean
up the shabby apartment before an ounce of pseudo freedom reaches
my hands. If I can manage to get my toddler brother onto the city bus
and take him home from day care without snot on my shoulder, and if I
can manage to take off his coat and sneakers without demonic scream-
ing for no apparent reason, then it’s a good day. Only, waking up at
three in the morning to work, the only free time I have, is not my cup
of Starbucks.
We were already different at age fourteen. She gave birth to me and
went to an alternative high school; I established closeness with new
friends in a competitive high school. She and my then present father
were taking care of me; I was studying the environmental effects on
the onset of schizophrenia. She took her daughter to preschool, and
I vowed to never let anything get in the way of my academics. Even
though I’m taking courses that prepare me for a career in the medical
field, a path I would not pursue even at risk of spontaneous combus-
tion of Earth, there is no excuse for me to fail. After all, my family has a
reputation for failure, and if I don’t push myself, no one else will. When
I think of me not choosing the effortless Bishop Loughlin High School
and traditional fun with friends and preferring the intense courses,
dedication to achievement, and overall feeling of self-worth, I cannot
believe my mother still can’t accept my choice.
One thing I’ve learned growing up in Brooklyn is that disappointment
happens often. The bike I rode to school in the morning wasn’t there73
Chapter 7: Challenges
when I went to get it in the afternoon. That’s Brooklyn. Instead of
seeing movies with friends on weekends, I work hard and attempt to
keep the little kids out of my mom’s hair. That’s Brooklyn. Instead of
going outside to my backyard, I remember I don’t have one, and settle
for the 12’ by 6’ concrete space in front of my house. That’s Brooklyn.
My Brooklyn doesn’t feature flowers of the freshest air or people who
smile and say hi. Instead, there’s what might have been Orbit gum on
the floor among the other thousand wads, a pool of strangely colored
vomit, and the monotonous working class boarding the subway to the
job it will complain about when it returns home.
If there’s anything that Brooklyn has taught me, it’s “just do it.” I owe
it to myself to keep trying, not because I have to, but because I want to
prove to myself that I can. I’ll have to endure the requirements of help-
ing to raise my siblings and other responsibilities. After the chaos and
traffic and noise have settled, I know I’ve made the right choice, even if
my mother hasn’t. And it’s all worth it.
AnAlysis
This essay opens with a conversation that abounds in conflict.
Though this unconventional opening poses a risk of being confusing
or unclear, it contains enough hints to pique the reader’s curiosity. We
wonder why the narrator feels overwhelmed. We sense the author’s
frustration at being encouraged to go to Bishop Loughlin instead of
Tech and wonder why her mother doesn’t agree with her. Finally, we
feel curious about the emotions and situations behind the outburst,
“It’s hard!”
Like Lisa’s essay, “Then and Now” (Chapter 12) and Jackie’s “The
House on Wellington Avenue,” (Chapter 15), the author does not com-
plain about the challenging circumstances surrounding her upbringing.
This essay is particularly striking because it doesn’t speak explicitly
about poverty or teen pregnancy in an abstract way, but the author
tells us the story of the direct lived experience: taming the “demonic
screaming” of a younger sibling, cleaning up a “shabby apartment,”
waking up at 3 a.m. to do schoolwork.
The paragraph that begins “We were already different at age four-
teen” could be more explicit about who comprises “we.” Eventually it
does become clear that the author is comparing herself to her mother.
The author uses striking visual language to render the stark contrasts
between her teenage years and her mother’s. While her mother spent
teenage years rearing children, the author chose “intense courses”
and dedicated herself to academic achievements. This essay resem-74
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
bles “Lessons from the Immigration Spectrum” (Chapter 9) in that the
author does not complacently accept the label of “underprivileged” but
rather rises above the limitations, refusing to fail. The author of this
essay highlights her determination when she writes, “. . . if I don’t push
myself, no one else will.” In the first half of the essay, we see why her
single mom does not push herself to succeed. In the fourth paragraph,
the author powerfully illustrates why the entire neighborhood she grew
up in did not foster success.
In describing how “disappointment happens often” in Brooklyn,
the author chooses small examples to illustrate larger problems in the
neighborhood. The disappearance of her bike hints at crime; her sacri-
fice of weekend outings indicates the intergenerational strains of teen
pregnancy; the wads of gum and “strangely colored vomit” show the
general state of disrepair. And “the monotonous working class/sub-
way” illustration further demonstrates the author’s general despair with
her surroundings. The repetition of the phrase “That’s Brooklyn” is a
unique and memorable way to separate the different observations that
the author makes about the dismal conditions of her neighborhood.
This phrase shows the author’s attitude of “just do it” even in circum-
stances where many would give up. The phrase also helps prevent
the paragraph from reading like a long litany of complaints. The varied
sentence lengths of this essay make it stylistically captivating. For in-
stance, the last sentence, “And it’s all worth it,” is surprising and direct,
capturing the author’s keen resolve to overcome challenges. This es-
say is exceptional in its ability to use small, personal details to illustrate
broader social issues that face a neighborhood full of disappointments.
The intimate personal stories that the author shares make this essay a
moving and compelling account of her strength and determination.8
coMMunit y sErv icE
“Music from the Heart”
Anonymous
Caltech
ThE GrEATEST JoY oF mUSIc IS to share it with others. Unfortunately,
the pleasure of performing is often forgotten when players become
more concerned with the technicalities and notes. I also once thought
that I knew all the important keys to successful piano playing: practice,
technique, dedication, and a love for what I do. Focused on the details,
I lost sight of my audience.
During my sophomore year, my friend invited me to join “Music
from the Heart,” a group that showcased its musical talents to senior
citizens. Although I accepted the invitation to support her, I began to
regret my choice as the first performance approached. not knowing
how the seniors would respond to my performance, especially when
I made a mistake, performing before the seniors became a terrifying
thought.
Although my first performance went smoothly, it was hard to know
whether the seniors enjoyed the pieces or the performance. While the
group performed, the seniors would talk to each other, pausing to clap
7576
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
at the end of each piece. Trying to impress the audience, I eventually
grew accustomed to preparing a showy piece as the monthly perfor-
mance approached.
So used to this monthly routine, I doubted that this performance
would be different from the previous ones when I was ready to perform
my favorite piece one summer day. While waiting for my turn, I glanced
around the room, noting with some uneasiness the growing number of
seniors gathered around the piano. Amidst the crowd of chattering se-
niors, one woman’s rapt attention to the performance caught my inter-
est. She greeted each performer with a wide toothy smile and made a
small comment about the composition. Uncertain of her expectations,
I watched for her reaction when I rose to introduce my piece, “Clair de
Lune” by Claude Debussy.
“Ooh, I love that song,” was all she said in response.
A smile crossed my face when I discovered that she shared my en-
thusiasm for the composition. To demonstrate to her how much I en-
joyed the song, I played my best to convey what made this moonlight
song so special to me. My minor concerns on technicalities slowly dis-
sipated as the song progressed. All that mattered then was playing the
song I loved as well as I could. For the first time, I felt contented with
my performance, undisturbed by mistakes.
The performance was far from perfect. However, none of the seniors
commented that the rhythm was too slow or the notes were wrong
like the audition judges would normally do. Although they still chat-
tered softly during the performance, they all smiled and clapped. A
few of them would say that the song was lovely. They appreciated my
efforts to entertain them and eagerly asked the group to return soon.
Just the delighted smile on the woman’s face made the performance
worthwhile.
It was the seniors’ appreciation for what I did that brought them
back to the piano each month, and my love for what I did that drew
me to it. The monthly performance was not just a musical showcase; it
was my chance to give back to the community and to help enrich the
seniors’ life. The true joy in my life is not just sharing music, but devot-
ing myself to community services as a volunteer.77
Chapter 8: Community Service
AnAlysis
This student’s introduction served its purpose. It probably made
the admissions officers curious. What happened when she made the
mistake of focusing on the technicalities of playing music rather than
the enjoyment of it? It probably made them want to read more to find
the answer.
As the author of this essay explains how she volunteered for Music
from the Heart, she also reveals her honest feelings—how she has
apprehension about performing and how she wasn’t sure if the seniors
were enjoying it because of their chatting during the performance. Many
students think that you need to present yourself in a light that makes
you appear almost perfect, but sharing these kinds of doubts actually
makes the essay more interesting, personable and honest. Being per-
fect is not very compelling, but letting the reader know that you have
minor insecurities adds some complexity. This also reveals a lot about
the way that you think and how you view your own personality.
During the crux of the story, we can see the student change from
focusing on how well she performs technically to sharing her enthusi-
asm for the music. She describes the internal dialogue that she has
with herself, trying to perform with as much enthusiasm as possible
when the seniors react to her playing. It’s easy to understand why she
enjoys playing for the seniors and how their smiles and thanks make it
worth the time that she spends each month.
For essays on community service, it’s critical to demonstrate that
you are not just doing community service because it looks good on
a resume or because a parent or your school is forcing you to, but
that you actually enjoy the work and put your whole self into it. From
this essay, the admissions officers could tell that this student gains as
much from the experience as her audience does, and that she’s likely
to continue such service in college and beyond.
“Precious Planet”
Pen-Yuan Hsing
Duke University
“hELLo! whAT’S YoUr NAmE?” “pEN-YUAN hSING.” I see The
Expression, then hear The response: “What?” Starting the first grade in
the US without knowing a single word of English, going back to Taiwan
three years later incapable of recognizing a single Chinese character is
not exactly an ideal circumstance for blending in. For many years, I78
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
was always the quiet one sitting in the corner, the one who few people
talked to, the one out of the loop. I was the “local alien.”
I opt to join the Earth Science Club during my first year in Lishan
High School, as I always had an interest in astronomy, which happened
to be the focus of that year’s club activities. I didn’t know the weekly
gathering time of our club was also an elective Earth Science course
that students from other high schools could attend. I certainly did not
realize what a big impact this arrangement would have on me.
near the end of the first semester, I was approached by a girl from a
neighboring school who attended this earth science course. She asked
if I wanted to join her on an environmental survey of Taiwan’s Keelung
coast conducted by an organization called Taipei Wetnet. For a mo-
ment I hesitated, I literally had no experience in responding to invita-
tions. What suddenly came out of my mouth surprised me, “Sure, what
time?”
For the next three years I spent in Taipei Wetnet, I gained not only
a close friend, knowledge about the problems our environment faced,
but perhaps most importantly found a group of people who shared the
same convictions, who are passionate about the same thing, the plight
of our precious planet. A year after being introduced to this organiza-
tion, I was its coordinator and presented my first academic paper at an
environmental education conference. I learned that I don’t always have
to be the quiet one in the corner, that I do and can have things to share
with everyone else. I don’t have to fear.
I often think about how I managed to say yes on that fateful day.
Was it just because of a pretty face? Or maybe there has always been a
special part of me that wanted to get out, and she was instrumental in
“flipping the switch.” This eye-opening experience and what I learned
from it is what I desperately want to share with the world.
Perhaps, somewhere out there is another quiet person in the corner
just waiting to be found. A switch waiting to be flipped. You just have
to find it, flip it, and make the world a brighter, warmer place.
AnAlysis
Pen-Yuan begins his essay with an apparent shortcoming—not
being about to blend in as the “local alien,” “the quiet one sitting in
the corner,” “the one out of the loop.” This introduction is reminiscent
of Angelica’s essay, “No Longer Invisible,” (Chapter 7), in which sheChapter 8: Community Service
describes her intense shyness. Like Angelica, Pen-Yuan chooses to
describe a weakness in order to demonstrate a gradual transformation
in personality from introvert to extrovert and leader.
There is a bit of an abrupt break between Pen-Yuan’s comment
about feeling like a “local alien” to joining the Earth Science Club. It
is often challenging to seamlessly transition between the introductory
paragraph in an essay to the first body paragraph. While it is not es-
sential to explicitly link these two paragraphs, being mindful of this
transition can make the essay read more smoothly and logically.
Pen-Yuan does a nice job of using short snippets of conversation
to add a lively tone to his essay as well as a means to highlight piv-
otal points. For instance, he opens the essay with, “Hello! What’s your
name?” and describes the confused “What?” that comes in response
to “Pen-Yuan Hsing,” a short exchange that underscores his feeling of
being a “local alien.” Later on, when he blurts out “Sure, what time?” in
response to the invitation to join Taipei WetNet, we see another crucial
turning point in Pen-Yuan’s life.
As we move from the third to the fourth paragraph, the story line
jumps from Pen-Yuan joining Taipei WetNet to his concluding three
years with the organization. This section could be more effective if
Pen-Yuan describes some of the events in which he participated dur-
ing the three years. This might give the reader a sense of his engage-
ment and involvement before he concludes, “I gained not only a close
friend, knowledge about the problems our environment faced, but per-
haps most importantly found a group of people who shared the same
convictions, who are passionate about the same thing, the plight of
our precious planet.” Examples might have helped more compellingly
demonstrate this passion for protecting the planet and his experiences
working with a group.
Pen-Yuan illustrates his transformation from a loner to an integral
member of the Taipei WetNet group when he writes, “I learned that I
don’t always have to be the quiet one in the corner, that I do and can
have things to share with everyone else. I don’t have to fear.” He con-
cludes his essay by urging us to reach out to “another quiet person in
the corner just waiting to be found” in order to “make the world a bright-
er, warmer place.” Because we know the personal story behind this
request, it appears more meaningful and sincere. Overall, Pen-Yuan’s
essay convincingly portrays the story of personal transformation from
shy student to fearless leader using the specific, memorable example
of his dedicated environmental work with Taipei WetNet.
7980
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
“Cuddle Buddies”
Anastasia Fullerton
Stanford University
ThE coLd mId-AUGUST SAN FrANcISco BAY fog was just begin-
ning to roll in over Piedmont as I snapped the cover shut on Jennings
Burch’s book “They Cage the Animals at night,” the most recent addi-
tion to my “get ready for 7th grade summer reading extravaganza.” It is
a story about a young boy who lives in various orphanages and foster
homes with only his stuffed animal, Doggie, for companionship. My
cousin from Connecticut had told me that it was a fabulous book, but
little did I know how it would touch my life and the lives of others.
As I gazed across my room at the pile of stuffed animals I had been
collecting since I was young, an idea came to me. I would collect stuffed
animals for children like Jennings. First, I contacted local agencies that
support children suffering from abuse and neglect and told them about
my idea. They said that the stuffed animals would be very helpful in
therapy and would certainly lift children’s spirits.
I decided to call my project “Cuddle Buddies.” now I actually had
to come up with the “buddies”! I wrote articles for the local and school
newspapers, telling Jennings’ story and asking for donations of stuffed
animals. My phone rang off the hook; schools, families, local business-
es and toy manufacturers all wanted to help. Much to my delight this
project took the Bay Area by storm. By the second week my living room
looked like a zoo with animals tucked in every corner and on top of
each chair. Every time my mom and I made deliveries to the agencies,
the kids would be waiting for their Cuddle Buddies with their eyes
down, too shy to look but shaking with excitement.
Six years after its launch, Cuddle Buddies continues to expand.
Each year I solicit from more toy companies and communities. now
over 25,000 stuffed animals have been donated to agencies in the Bay
Area and Connecticut, emergency units, two orphanages in Africa
and one in germany. At the Saidia Children’s Home in Kenya, Simon,
a seven year old, whose parents died from AIDS, couldn’t sleep at
night. When the Cuddle Buddies were laid out for him to choose
from, Simon selected a grey koala bear and soon after was sleeping
through the night. My heart ached when I learned that a young girl
in Oakland had stopped cutting herself so she could get the big black81
Chapter 8: Community Service
dog that she wanted so badly. I never dreamed that Cuddle Buddies
would be used in these ways.
Knowing that I would be going on to college and that others my
age could do what I have done, I decided to expand Cuddle Buddies.
To spread the word beyond the Bay Area I designed a website, www.
cuddlebuddies.net, and contacted newspapers and Tv stations across
the nation. The response was overwhelming. I heard from kids, par-
ents, agencies and even The girls Scouts. I am now helping to establish
two dozen Cuddle Buddies chapters from Utah to north Carolina.
This has been a great experience. I have learned how to follow
through on an idea, how to champion a cause and how to deal with
setbacks. But most importantly, I have learned how easy it is to posi-
tively impact a life and the joy that comes from it. I will go to college
with these lessons in mind and hope to continue my work with Cuddle
Buddies, even as I engage in a whole new set of exciting academic and
nonacademic pursuits.
AnAlysis
“Cuddle Buddies” chronicles Anastasia’s leading role in the de-
velopment of a social enterprise. This story is probably compelling for
admissions officers at Stanford, where there is a growing interest in
social entrepreneurship. Anastasia’s impressive story demonstrates
her creativity and commitment to growing a vision, a valuable asset
as a leader in whatever “exciting academic and nonacademic pursuits”
lie ahead for her.
The introduction draws us in with its careful attention to detail:
we can see the San Francisco fog, sense its chilliness, and witness
Anastasia’s passion for reading. The last sentence, “little did I know
how it would touch my life and the lives of others,” foreshadows the
creation of Cuddle Buddies. What is particularly remarkable about this
story is Anastasia’s young age—she is only in 7 th grade. It is quite
a dramatic jump from the small scene in the book, They Cage the
Animals at Night, and the decision to provide animals for therapy.
Anastasia could have added a few more sentences to explain how
she started the ball rolling on her project. In particular, it is surprising
that she contacted local agencies—here it may help to specify which
ones—as one imagines that most teenagers might simply tell their
friends an idea and never actually act to make the vision a reality.
The third paragraph uses vivid imagery and active language to
make the reader feel a part of the creation and expansion of “Cuddle
Buddies.” Anastasia does an excellent job of using lively phrases so82
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
that we feel we are also participants in the process as the phone “rang
off the hook,” the living room became “like a zoo” and the project “took
the Bay Area by storm.” It is impressive that this storm has hardly
abated six years later. Admissions officers often admire stories about
long-term commitment, especially when the author can demonstrate
continual growth throughout this process. As Anastasia’s third para-
graph shows, this growth has certainly occurred: personally, Anastasia
has learned management skills as her organization has expanded in-
ternationally, having donated 25,000 stuffed animals. Anastasia gives
a face to this statistic by relating the story of Simon with his gray koala
and the girl in Oakland who chooses the big black dog. This is con-
crete proof that this idea does “lift children’s spirits.”
The link to Anastasia’s website is an excellent way to distinguish
her from other prospective students. The website demonstrates her
professionalism, much as the business card in Jason’s story, “Birthing
a Business” (Chapter 14) shows his willingness to go above and be-
yond expectations. Anastasia wraps up her essay nicely by noting,
“I have learned how to follow through on an idea, how to champion
a cause and how to deal with setbacks,” skills she can apply as she
pursues her education after high school.
“Best Reader”
Manika
University of Pennsylvania
ThE GIANT BrowN BEAr wAS crEEpING quietly behind the bliss-
fully pink duck ready to wring his bare paws around her neck and
throw her into a pot of boiling stew.
We turned the page.
While I chuckled at the impracticality of a bear boiling water to eat
a duck, especially a pink duck, I lifted my head to find Matthew tip-
toeing about the room exhibiting the meanest, most ferocious look his
cute face could conjure. All the while, little Monica sat huddled next
to my arm honestly afraid to turn the page and find her favorite pink
creature in a bear’s “tummy.”
It was one of those moments of my hours spent reading with chil-
dren at the library when it dawned just how much, as a “grown up,” I
was missing.
I remembered the Thursday when victoria bounded into the reading
room showcasing in her small hands a golden certificate from school.Chapter 8: Community Service
83
“Best reader,” it glistened. A smile came across my face as I looked into
the eyes of the petite 7-year old who just last year had been held back
in first grade because her reading was not up to par.
It was the same smile that had filled my face six months prior, when
victoria joined the reading program and I saw the other volunteers
instantly point at me. Our supervisor had agreed with them, knowing
I would use my patient disposition and friendly way with children to
motivate our new student. I had nodded vigorously, smiling, not only
because I was proud of the confidence they had in me, but because
nothing would make me happier than taking on the challenge of help-
ing victoria improve her reading.
After spending the first session responding to an unrelenting stream
of questions, I recognized that victoria’s talkative nature and impa-
tience for answers overshadowed her desire to sit down and read. I
treasured her energy and insatiable curiosity and fueled it with my own
enthusiasm. Yet, for every interest she presented, I took her to scan the
library shelves in search of a related book. I watched her eyes grow
with excitement as I tirelessly helped her press through the stories, a
journey in search of her answers. Some of the books I chose were dif-
ficult for her, but we read through them together, challenging limits
and quenching the thirst for knowledge. In books, I told her time and
again, she would find all she wanted to know.
Taking her certificate in my hands, I couldn’t help but be proud that
part of this glittering piece of paper was likely my doing.
My thoughts were interrupted by victoria’s chant. “I got best reader!”
she exclaimed over and over jumping between feet as her arms waved
from side to side. Without hesitation, I followed. Holding her certifi-
cate up for all to see, I matched my footing with hers as we hopped the
length of the room giggling.
Whether it is victory celebrations or talking in different voices,
whenever I am with these kids, I find myself being pulled into their
childhood world—a world of simplicity, of undying curiosity, and of
pure innocence. It is a world in which if everything is not perfect, it
definitely can be. And with a simple “prayer to god” or “kiss on the
boo-boo” it will be.
Though I go in each week to be these kids’ teacher, I come out,
having been their student. They have introduced me to a side of me I
never realized existed.84
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
As I enter college, it is not only my intelligence or my accumulated
knowledge, but also the kid in me who will bring success. This child
will jump to try every new activity with an enthusiasm that cannot
fade. She will ask questions of everything she sees, of everything she
hears and of everything she reads. She will dream big and for every
step she stumbles upon towards that dream, she will get right back up
and step again, this time, a little more carefully. And she will do all this,
approach every life hurdle or triumph with a smile- a big contagious
smile.
AnAlysis
The unconventional first sentence of this essay grabs the reader’s
attention and creates a double-take effect with its absurd and comical
juxtaposition of giant bear, pink duck, and boiling stew.
“We turned the page,” the even shorter paragraph that follows, re-
veals the context of the first sentence—a children’s book. Such child-
like and active language makes us feel that we are in the room, read-
ing over Manika and Monica’s shoulders. These sentences create a
sense of whimsy and wonder that help us see the reading room from
the perspective of a child.
Manika next contrasts childhood curiosity with a young adult’s per-
spective on life. Observing Matthew and Monica, she reflects, “It was
one of those moments of my hours spent reading with children at the
library when it dawned just how much, as a ‘grown up,’ I was missing.”
This single sentence feels a little choppy, even after the first two short
paragraphs. While using short sentences to indicate a change in mood
or pace is often an effective writing tool, it is best to use it sparingly.
Manika draws upon this style several times, including the single-sen-
tence paragraph that begins “taking her certificate in my hands” that
is set off by yet another new paragraph with the note, “my thoughts
were interrupted by Victoria’s chant.” In some ways, the short sentence
structure has limited Manika’s avenue for sharing details. For example,
Manika writes about all she is missing out on as a “grown up.” She
might have used more complex sentences at this point to elaborate on
her feelings and to give us a better sense of what the significance of
that moment meant to her.
Manika does an excellent job of explaining her volunteer work in
this essay. She manages to include other people’s perceptions of her
through her supervisor’s knowledge that she had a “patient disposition
and friendly way with children.” She also includes her person reac-
tion: “I had nodded vigorously, smiling, not only because I was proud
of the confidence they had in me, but because nothing would makeChapter 8: Community Service
me happier than taking on the challenge of helping Victoria improve
her reading.” These sentences demonstrate Manika’s enthusiasm and
dedication to helping Victoria learn. The charming scene of dancing
with Victoria and her “best reader” certificate not only sweetly cel-
ebrates her only accomplishments as a tutor, but also provides the
reader with a glimpse of Manika’s unselfishness in acknowledging her
student’s hard work. Manika’s essay demonstrates an ability to empa-
thize with younger children and even learn from their “words of simplic-
ity” and “undying curiosity.” This essay is successful because Manika
describes a volunteer activity in a way that suffuses it with spirit and
energy, so that we not only learn about her volunteer job but also about
her ebullient personality.
859
FaMily
“Box of Chocolates”
Alex Volodarsky
The Wharton School, University of Pennsylvania
EVErY SUNdAY morNING, ThE LocAL STArBUcKS plays host to
what my mom likes to call “mother-son bonding time.” This Sunday is
no different. My mom and I sit down with our regular Chai Latte and
Caramel Frappuchino, and absorb the aroma of the coffee beans and
the gentle rays of the winter sun.
“So Alex, what are we going to do for dad’s 50th birthday?” When
my mom asks a question about upcoming plans, she doesn’t expect an
answer; she already has something in mind. Many years ago, my mom
started a family tradition of making gifts personal: poems, songs, skits.
At first I didn’t understand why we were wasting so much time when we
could just buy a gift card from the local mall. But my outlook changed
when I turned twelve. For my birthday, my parents gave me a poster, a
product of their many hours on Photoshop. With long hair, sideburns,
and a slim suit, I had become the fifth member of the Beatles crossing
Abbey road. Every morning when I wake up, this poster opposite my
bed is the first thing I see, and I start off the day with a smile. Since
8788
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
then, I have needed little persuasion to start working on the next gift
project. Actually, I even look forward to these times, when my parents
find their inner children, and the trivial worries of life simply whisk
away. My dad, both figuratively and literally, ditches his office suit and
proper manners, and dons a red woman’s wig and high heels to practice
a scene. My mom stops scolding my sister and me, and joins us in our
ruckus, doing the jitterbug and blowing on a harmonica. These are the
moments in my family when there are no children or adults, just four
people who give in to their creative urges.
“How about throwing Dad a party, and making him a movie?” my
mom asks as I use my straw to fish for any remaining coffee at the bot-
tom of the cup. “Just think of a movie you like and we’ll parody it.”
A big fan of “the-life-is-like-a-box-of-chocolates” theory, I suggest my
favorite movie, Forrest gump. She smiles. “OK, but only if you play
Forrest.”
When we come home, my mom takes down a box, heavy with the
dust of age, scribbled with messy russian lettering. I peer over her
shoulder as she empties onto the living room floor the contents: my
dad’s life story in black and white. Within minutes, I am completely im-
mersed in the photographs I have never seen before. As I gape at a pic-
ture of a bearded teenager laughing with his friends, I do a double take.
Is this the same clean-shaven man who helped me to prove the theorem
that all right angles are congruent and always tells me to tuck in my
shirt? I shake my head in disbelief as I thumb through some pictures of
my dad and his friends with guitars in the forest singing songs around a
camp fire. My mom explains that the Soviet government didn’t approve
of these songs, so the woods became their only refuge. I am now start-
ing to understand why my dad, limited in what he could sing or say
as a youth, pushes my sister and me to ask probing questions, survey
news from all sides of the political spectrum, and watch controversial
movies. Looking down at one of the pictures of my dad in the forest, it
just hits me: the movie should be called “Forest guy.”
With each picture comes its own story, and collectively, they create
a collage of my dad’s past that I had never known. But even more sur-
prises await me as I watch documentaries about russian leaders in the
20th century. To truly parody Forrest gump, some “great” Communist
leaders must be part of Forest guy’s life, just as Kennedy and nixon
were part of Forrest gump’s. Coming up with bizarre ideas of how89
Chapter 9: Family
my dad met the Communist leaders is the most entertaining part of
our moviemaking. My stomach throbs with laughter as I conceive the
impossible notion of my dad bullying gorbachev into destroying the
Berlin Wall.
Along with russian history, I also discover part of my family’s: while
discussing the horrors of Stalin’s reign with my mom, I am shocked
to hear that my father was born in exile, and one of his uncles died in
Stalin’s concentration camp for joking about Communists. It’s hard to
believe that someone can be killed for cracking a joke, when cracking
a safe will only get you a few years in jail. Luckily, when I am joking
about Lenin and Stalin in my film, my only worry is crowd response.
It is the day of the party, and as I look around at the apprehensive
crowd, my instincts yell, “run, Alex! run!” Soon, the lights dim, and
my anxiety grows. I am watching the viewers as intensely as they are
watching the screen. As each joke is met with uproarious laughter and
table slapping, my breaths become calmer and my fingers stop shaking.
Twenty-five minutes later, I hear the long awaited ovation. I gaze from
table to table at the sea of smiles, but one face catches my attention. It
is my dad’s, showing complete disbelief that something so grandiose
could be done about him and for him. All these weeks I had been so
focused on the guests’ reactions that I never thought about my dad’s.
Although he is trying hard to contain himself, I see a tear sneak from
the side of his eye. It is the first time I have seen my dad cry.
Yes, life is a box of chocolates. Some are delicious, some too bitter
for your taste. But the best are like the one I picked that day; they seem
like any other chocolate, but when you bite into them, they surprise
you with an unexpected flavor.
AnAlysis
In this extraordinarily creative essay, Alex reveals a gift for sto-
rytelling that jumps nimbly from seriousness to humor, cavorts from
one surprise to another, and weaves in vivid descriptions, evocative
metaphors and historical references. Many people might find it hard
to imagine an essay that begins in a Starbucks and takes us through
Forest Gump and Stalinist atrocities to end with a metaphor about a
box of chocolates. However, Alex’s ability to tie all these memorable
details together coherently makes this essay stand out.
Alex opens with an introduction that stimulates our senses: we can
smell the fragrant “aroma of the coffee beans” and feel the “gentle90
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
rays of the winter sun.” Effective descriptions detail not only the visual
scene, but also appeal more completely to our other senses. In de-
scribing his weekly Sunday “bonding time” with his mother, Alex gives
us a sense of the deep connection he has to his family. As the essay
unfolds, more clues reveal glimpses of Alex’s dedication and com-
mitment to his family. Touching and charming examples make Alex’s
family come alive for his readers. Instead of the nondescript labels of
“mother” and “father,” Alex provides tangible and memorable images
of these people—his father in a red wig and high heels, his mother
playing harmonica. These details perfectly illustrate “four people who
give in to their creative urges.” Though these family gatherings and gift
projects might not show up on a resume, Alex does a wonderful job
of showing us how they are central to his character. It’s important to
remember that a compelling personal essay may draw upon aspects
of your life that might not fall under standard ideas of academic ac-
complishments and extracurricular activities.
The paragraph in which Alex discovers elements of his dad’s past
in Soviet Russia is a creative way for Alex to show us an aspect of his
heritage. This paragraph could easily focus on Alex’s dad while leaving
out information about Alex himself. However, Alex wisely chooses to
discuss his dad’s relationship to himself: for example, we suspect that
Alex is someone who asks probing questions, surveys the news criti-
cally, and watches controversial movies. In this paragraph, Alex mas-
terfully weaves together elements of his own past and his dad’s past
while illustrating his personal interests and strengths. These seemingly
disparate pieces of information are brought together by the story of the
gift project, which itself is focused on film.
With rich detail, Alex describes the process of watching documen-
tary films and creating the “Forest Guy” film for his father. This section
is particularly interesting because Alex not only describes what hap-
pened, but also analyzes his own learning and emotional responses.
The range and authenticity of these emotional responses is impres-
sive (from stomach-throbbing laughter to tears on Alex’s dad’s face),
and makes for a varied and lively reading experience. The cultural ref-
erence to Forrest Gump is a clever one that helps Alex wrap up his
essay with a metaphor from the story. However, it is important to be
careful to use commonly known cultural references or explain their
context and not to assume that your reader will understand the refer-
ence. Jonathan Cross (Chapter 12) demonstrates this nicely when he
references John Nash.Chapter 9: Family
91
“Dear santa”
Anonymous
Princeton University
EVErY YEAr, mY chrISTmAS wISh LIST would read, “Dear Santa,
all I want for Christmas is a baby brother.” At age nine, I knew Santa had
to be real because, one day, my mom announced that she was pregnant.
After ten years of being an only child, I could not have anticipated how
much my life would change because of a little brother. I received the
honor of naming him, and I chose Jason. In retrospect, I should have
named my brother “Ivan the Terrible.”
Jason followed me everywhere like an irritating shadow. My griev-
ances to my mom were countless, especially after Jason drew all over
my bedroom walls and murdered my pet fish, goldie. My mom’s typi-
cal response was, “Well, isn’t this what you’ve always wished for?”
Jason’s mischief reached a new height one morning when I became
the victim of a five year old with scissors. I stared into the bathroom
mirror and dunked my head under cold water to make sure I was not
dreaming. What I saw enraged me! In the middle of the night, Michael
had cut off five inches of my long, black hair from one side of my
head. I stood in horror, and stormed to the kitchen where I found the
rest of my family calmly eating breakfast. I flashed a menacing stare at
my brother, who snickered across the table. “You’re going to pay for
this!” I screamed. Furious beyond words, I could not even begin to
describe my rage. Instead, I ran back to the bathroom and huddled on
the floor.
“What am I going to do?” I was irate and panicked at the same time.
As a freshman in high school, I was very sensitive about my appear-
ance. I had been hesitant to cut my hair past the “tips to take away the
split-ends” trim, because my hair had been the same length for seven
years. I agonized over the situation and concocted my swift counter-at-
tack. Instead of chopping off his hair, I found inspiration to appease my
anger in the pages of Teen magazine and considered trendy hairstyles.
My brother was stunned because I did not retaliate. victory was mine.
Because of experiences such as this, I have learned to adapt, to keep
my focus, and to solve problems with little or no resources. I approach
tough situations with objectivity and determination. Like many other
experiences with my brother and at school, I have dealt with difficult92
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
situations and turned them into positive opportunities for change. I am
flexible with the circumstances given to me, and I strive for the best
outcome. Despite the craziness Santa’s gift brings, Jason’s continuous
surprises provide laughter to my life. As for my hair, I did cut off the
five inches from the other side, and I actually cherished the new look
better. Thanks, Santa.
AnAlysis
The author’s wit shines through in this punchy, concise essay. In
fact, her humor is immediately evident in the first paragraph when
shining expectations for a long-wished-for baby brother are thwarted
by the blunt sentence, “In retrospect, I should have named my brother
‘Ivan the Terrible’.” She uses italics and exclamation points effectively
in her writing to punctuate key words and to express her mood. For
instance, from the statement “Jason followed me everywhere like an
irritating shadow,” the exaggeration of “everywhere” heightens our un-
derstanding of the intensity of her irritation. The exclamation point at
the end of “What I saw enraged me!” underscores the author’s anger.
Excessive use of word-stylization and punctuation can be distracting
in an essay, but thoughtful use can enhance writing. In her case, these
were particularly appropriate because her essay conveyed a more ca-
sual, informal tone.
Stylistically, the author also varies her sentence length to excellent
dramatic effect. In particular, the contrast between longer descriptions
of what was going on and short remarks such as “You’re going to
pay for this,” the thought of “What am I going to do?,” and the proud
conclusion, “Victory was mine” draw us into the immediacy of the
story. She chose to illustrate one very specific event from her many
“grievances” (from bedroom wall vandalism to goldfish murder)—her
brother cutting off her hair. This specific anecdote demonstrates how it
is possible to write an essay that doesn’t describe a transformation of
years or even a weeklong summer camp. Though the event the author
describes in this essay probably transpired in a matter of hours, she
still made this a meaningful topic for her paper. This shows us that
there’s really no “best” timeframe or topic for writing a personal essay.
The author’s essay takes a specific topic of a very short timeframe,
relates it to a longer timeframe (we know she has had long hair for
seven years and is sensitive about her appearance as many high
school freshmen are) and shows more generalized, almost “timeless”
if you will, aspects of her overall character. We can contrast this to
Jason Y. Shah’s approach in “Hurricane Transformations” (Chapter
15), in which he tells a story of change that occurs over many months.Chapter 9: Family
93
The writing styles are different; yet, both essays effectively show us
positive traits in the authors’ characters.
The strength of this author’s essay is that she conveys a specific
event with a lively narrative pace and snappy dialogue then ultimately
creates a broader conclusion that helps us understand how this spe-
cific incident illustrates that she has “learned to adapt, to keep [her]
focus, and to solve problems with little or no resources.” Though the
overall tone of her essay may seem to focus on annoyance and an-
ger at her brother, ultimately she demonstrates her resilience and her
capacity for forgiveness in noting, “despite the craziness Santa’s gift
brings, Jason’s continuous surprises provide laughter to my life.” Her
comment that she preferred her new hairstyle further demonstrates
how she turns difficult situations into advantageous opportunities.
“Thanks, Santa” is a catchy way to end the essay. It can be tempting
to end with a long “summary” sentence, but she shows how even two
words can make for a memorable and satisfying ending.
“lessons from the immigration spectrum”
Anonymous
MIT
mY FAmILY hAS TAKEN LIVING IN the big city as a reason for why
we should never give up. Here in Los Angeles there are countless indi-
viduals and families along all points on the immigration spectrum from
recent arrivals to recent citizenship. residing in this great city has pro-
vided me with diversity, opportunity, acceptance, and an abundance of
role models to follow through all troubles- big and small.
I always thought that I had it the worst out of all my family mem-
bers because I was never allowed to get anything lower than what my
brother or a cousin had gotten in a class. My parents figured if they
could do it, so could I, and if not on my own then with a little of their
help. It was not until recently that I realized the truth in this. In my
short life I have seen my father go from speaking no English, to excel-
ling in it. I have heard countless stories about migrant farmers such as
Cesar Chavez and my grandfather who had nearly nothing, yet per-
sisted and succeeded.
growing up hearing these stories of great injustices and misfortunes
has truly influenced my long term goals. I am going to go far because
there is no excuse for not doing my best, given all I have been blessed94
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
with. When I had trouble speaking Spanish and felt like abandoning
my native tongue I remembered my mother and how when she came
to the United States she was forced to wash her mouth out with soap
and endure beatings with a ruler by the nuns at her school for speak-
ing it. When I couldn’t figure out tangents, sines, and cosines I thought
about my father and how it took him nearly a year to learn long divi-
sion because he was forced to teach it to himself after dropping out and
starting to work in the 4th grade. And when I wanted to quit swimming
because I was tired I remembered my grandfather and how no mat-
ter how his muscles ached if he stopped digging, or picking fruit, or
plowing he risked not having enough food to feed his family. Pursuing
technical fields such as math and engineering first seemed like work for
men to me, but the times have changed. All these people, just from my
family have been strong role models for me.
I feel that being labeled “underprivileged” does not mean that I am
limited in what I can do. There is no reason for me to fail or give up,
and like my parents and grandparents have done, I’ve been able to pull
through a great deal. My environment has made me determined, hard
working, and high aiming. I would not like it any other way. This is
how my Hispanic heritage, family upbringing, and role models have
influenced my academic and personal long term goals.
AnAlysis
This essay, like “All Worth It,” (Chapter 7), describes the lessons
the author has learned from growing up in an “underprivileged” com-
munity of immigrants in LA. The author of “All Worth It” learned from
growing up in Brooklyn to “just do it,” never accepting failure as an op-
tion. This essay similarly shows how the author came to believe that
“we should never give up.” Both essays are compelling because they
provide specific examples from their personal lives to give us a sense
of the unique circumstances in which they grew up. However, the au-
thor of this essay focuses on the positive elements of her environ-
ment: “diversity, opportunity, acceptance, and an abundance of role
models.” Reading these two essays in conjunction shows that there
is no rule for how to write about coming from a disadvantaged back-
ground. While “All Worth It” notes more of the negative aspects of the
neighborhood and “Lessons from the Immigration Spectrum” focuses
on positive lessons, both authors are able to give us a strong sense of
their perseverance and strength.Chapter 9: Family
The author of “Lessons from the Immigration Spectrum” cites
success stories that are specific to her heritage as a Hispanic
immigrant. For example, she describes her father who went “from
speaking no English, to excelling in it” and places the story of her
grandfather’s migrant farm work in a broader historical context by
referencing Cesar Chavez. Historical references can be a powerful
way to frame one’s personal story or family history within a broader
ethnic, religious/spiritual, or social community.
This author shares specific examples that provide evidence of her
drive to succeed. She states, “. . . there is no excuse for not doing my
best, given all I have been blessed with.” Her essay shows that she
has come to recognize that her circumstances are relatively fortunate
compared to the hardships her parents faced. The power of these
experiences lies in the stark contrasts they present. We find that the
author “felt like abandoning [her] native tongue” while her mother was
physically punished for speaking Spanish. Learning about her father’s
year-long struggle to learn long division helps put her confusion about
tangents, sines and cosines into perspective. The contrast between
cosines and long division highlights the difference in education lev-
els between the author, who is on track to complete high school, and
her father, who did not complete fourth grade. The third example the
author provides is a narrative telling about her decision to continue
swimming when she is reminded of the hard labor that her grandfather
endured. These three examples give us a strong understanding of the
lessons the author has learned from growing up with the “immigration
spectrum” across multiple generations.
9510
hErit aGE and
idEntit y
“Heritage”
Anonymous
Yale University
“hErITAGE” IS ThE FIrST word IN my family dictionary, a noun
and adverb, for who we are and how we live. My parents taught me that
my heritage defines my identity. Through honorific speech towards my
elders and adherence to traditional values, I accepted Korean customs
as part of the duality that defines my life in America.
Yet, a turbulent disunity stormed under that surface of peaceful co-
existence. Though I outwardly represented the model Korean-American
son, I loathed fitting this stereotypical mold. My shell was so well-con-
structed, however, that others mistook me for a successful immigrant. I
felt as if I were ripped from the very fabric of my American birthplace,
and plunged into a vacuum between my ancestral home and the world
I lived in. I felt that my heritage was a short anchor against the relent-
lessly rising tide: I had to break free—or go under.
9798
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
While struggling with this chain, however, I came to appreciate what
my heritage offered. As a martial arts instructor, I supported students in
building discipline and character. As a bilingual tutor, I helped immi-
grant children adapt to life in America. Soon, I realized that my heritage
was an instrument for harmonizing personal development with service
to others.
When I was selected to serve in the HOBY World Leadership
Congress, my family’s financial circumstances did not cover the $1,350
required fee. By infusing my American entrepreneurial energy with
Asian medicine, I covered the cost by selling herbal products at my
martial arts studio. Though the novelty of my venture brought me to the
verge of bankruptcy, I persisted. By researching products, competitors
and clientele, I streamlined my inventory to best serve my customers.
Eventually, I created a business aimed at offering others a healthy
lifestyle. Sweaty students gulped green tea and chocolate-flavored
snacks, dropping dollars for the cause that lay within my cardboard
cashbox. Supported by outside donations, I became greater L.A.’s am-
bassador in Washington D.C. Infused with new inspiration, I returned
with a project grant to spread the martial arts lifestyle of discipline,
confidence, and respect.
As my heritage anchored itself to the bedrock of my battles, I in-
tegrated Korean tradition with my American identity. Fusing service
with civic duty, I entered the L.A. County Sheriff’s Explorer Academy.
Through the grueling training, I learned to work as part of a team.
Appointed as Drill Instructor a year later, I took command of training
the older recruits. Through a relationship of mutual respect, I prepared
my platoon to dutifully serve the community. Leading this racially
mixed group, I empathized beyond the duality of my own identity. I
soon discovered that my heritage must transcend my personal struggles
to truly embrace diversity.
Heritage is not a mere ethnic label—it is the honor and humanity
that I am inspired to uphold. Today, I am grateful to my parents for
endowing me with a spirit of dedication and determination. They be-
stowed a philosophy that speaks through my actions. This inheritance
forms the base of my integrity as an individual, and defines my dedica-
tion to strengthening the society that I live in.Chapter 10: Heritage and Identity
AnAlysis
What makes the writer’s essay interesting is that he writes about
the conflict between his ethnic heritage and his American life. We
immediately sense that it is not an easy amalgamation between his
Korean and American identities. It might have enhanced his introduc-
tion to have provided a specific example of how these two identities
clashed. However, his description of this conflict is very powerful and
visual, and as the reader, we can tell detect the authenticity of his
internal struggle. He writes, “I felt that my heritage was a short anchor
against the relentlessly rising tide: I had to break free—or go under.”
The writer aptly shows the connection between his achievements
and his appreciation for his heritage. When he describes his efforts
to raise funds to attend the HOBY World Leadership Congress, he
demonstrates ingenuity as a creative entrepreneur. The admissions
officers must have admired his self-initiated fundraising efforts and
his development of a new market. His experience shows his innova-
tion, persistence and ability to adapt his product line to his customers’
needs.
In his example of the L.A. County Sheriff’s Explorer Academy,
he again addresses his heritage when leading an ethnically diverse
group of students. While you may write an essay about a project that
you worked on as a team or an experience that you had as a team
member, it’s always helpful to highlight your individual contribution. In
the writer’s case, he reveals his full responsibility for selling the Asian
medicine and explains his role as a leader of his platoon. You may not
be the sole leader of the group, but writing about your personal input
makes a more powerful statement than presenting the contributions of
the group as a whole.
Throughout his essay, the writer makes connections that are not
obvious. At first glance, there doesn’t seem to be much that ties to-
gether attending a student leadership conference or volunteering with
the sheriff’s department and ethnic identity. But the writer is able to
form links among these topics that result in a single cohesive essay.
His writing is engaging because, as readers, we can tell that he tru-
ly cares about his topic matter and he shares specific examples of
what he has accomplished. But perhaps most importantly, he takes
us inside his mind so that at least for a brief time we understand his
thoughts, emotions, and reasoning. This is something that admissions
officers always desire—to learn something new about the applicant
and to understand his or her way of thinking.
99100
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
“Abuelo”
Angelica
University of Chicago
ThE TITLE oF ThIS pIcTUrE IS “Abuelo” which means grandfather
in Spanish. At first glance, it seems just a waste of a snapshot. Perhaps
just another struggling photographer trying to pay the rent or who sim-
ply had one more shot left in a roll of film and took a random picture.
It is an 8" by 11" color photograph of a man’s neck, more specifically
the back of his neck. It is quite wrinkled and brown and white hair has
invaded the scalp. At first I questioned why the photographer did not
simply take a picture of his grandfather’s face. A face would allow view-
ers to see what the grandfather looks like and tell some kind of story,
certainly more than what the back of his neck could possibly tell.
What I came to realize is that this is no random shot. What this pic-
ture wants is for me to imagine and to create a story. It does not neces-
sarily wish to be framed but the picture does not want to be overlooked
or neglected. It wants to be given a chance to prove itself as equally
worthy as any other photograph. I do not need the face of the Abuelo
to imagine the story of his life or personality. The back of his neck is
just as important as his face.
After spending some time with this Abuelo I learned that the back
of his neck is not just brown, it is tanned. not just a natural tan, that
some people are born with, but a particular shade of tan that can only
be attained after continuous exposure to the sun. Perhaps this man
does a lot of work outside. The distinguished wrinkles are more than
just lines. In between them there seems to be some kind of dust. I rec-
ognize this dust because it is the kind of dust my father gets when he is
working with joint compound.
After examining a little more closely I noticed the multiple scars
on his scalp which prevent his hair from growing. The tiny hole in his
earlobe reminds me that he was young once and had, like many young
teenage boys, pierced his ear. Around his neck I can see a glimpse of
a brown necklace. This necklace is very familiar to me because I own
one. It is a very thin string with a small rectangular cloth at both ends.
Many Catholics believe that it is something sacred.
In this case this picture is not measured by the thousands of words
it is worth, but it is measured by what I took from it. It should not beChapter 10: Heritage and Identity
101
criticized by what it does not have but should be valued for what it
does have. I have found something in common with this photograph.
All along what this picture wanted from me was to find something fa-
miliar. That familiarity sets this particular picture apart from all other
photographs I have encountered and what has kept it vividly visible
after having come across it years ago. This is exactly what this photo-
graph longed for: to be found familiar and remembered.
AnAlysis
Angelica takes an unconventional essay prompt, “Describe a pic-
ture and explore what it wants,” and writes a short and creative essay
that not only answers the prompt in an unexpected way but also dem-
onstrates Angelica’s dedication to learning more about her history. The
essay opens with the surprising sentence, “At first glance, it seems
just a waste of a snapshot.” The reader immediately wonders, why
write about this photo then? Angelica goes on to show an aptitude for
vivid description, which she uses to illustrate the picture for those of us
who aren’t able to see it. We are also drawn into the mystery in won-
dering what meaning a photo of the back of someone’s neck, wrinkled
with brown and white hair, could possibly have.
Angelica states her answer to the essay prompt directly: “What this
picture wants is for me to imagine and to create a story.” She goes on
to explain why this process of imagining and creating a story is impor-
tant: the photo will have a chance “to prove itself as equally worthy as
any other photograph.” Angelica goes on to breathe life into this mys-
terious photo through a combination of sleuthing and guesswork. The
amount of information she is about to extract from small details like the
color of Abuelo’s skin demonstrates Angelica’s impressive imaginative
capacity and thoughtful analysis. Even as fine a detail as dust in the
wrinkles of the skin does not escape Angelica. She relates this dust
to familiar (and familial) knowledge: “. . . it is the kind of dust my father
gets when he is working with joint compound.” Angelica might have
clarified “joint compound” for those who are unfamiliar with the term.
Still, her descriptions are intriguing. Angelica’s eye for detail leads her
to notice a hole in the earlobe from a former ear piercing, and part of
a necklace. By linking these details to her father’s life as a compound
worker and also to her Catholic faith, we learn about Angelica’s beliefs
and her family life, as well as about her heritage.
Angelica summarizes the point of her essay nicely in her
concluding paragraph, when she returns to the original question
and answers it in a slightly different way: “All along what this picture
wanted from me was to find something familiar . . . to be found familiar102
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
and remembered.” Angelica’s ability to form connections with the
photograph are reminiscent of her ability to turn an unfamiliar new
place into a “home” for learning and to transform unfamiliar faces
into influential friends, things that she described in her other essay
(Chapter 7), which chronicled her multiple school transfers.
“Anything Goes”
Jean Gan
Duke University
I hAVE ALwAYS BEEN comForTABLE wITh Tae Kwon Do, music,
art, and friends. However, as a horse in Chinese astrology, I also need
to explore different pursuits, and step outside of my comfort zone. This
summer, I ventured beyond the pasture of my comfort zone, and par-
ticipated onstage in the high school summer musical for the first time.
The biggest challenge of taking this leap was overcoming my own
mental barrier—the sign that read, Jean, you have never had a dance
lesson; you have no idea how to sing or act. Out of fear that I would
feel uncomfortable, I believed that playing violin in the pit orchestra
was my calling. However, after three years of pit orchestra experience, I
longed to shine in that coveted spotlight. I did not tell my friends about
how I wondered what it would feel like to act onstage in front of eight
hundred people. When I saw that the title of the musical for this past
summer was Anything goes, I knew that no one would think worse
of me for following my aspirations. Confident that my friends would
encourage me, I let go of my cautious Chinese approach to life, and let
the free-spirited horse within me escape.
Despite my decision to participate in the musical, I was terrified. I
wondered whether I would meet any friends and if I would be able to
learn to sing and dance well. My fears were intensified because I missed
the first week of rehearsals while at a leadership conference in new
York City. When I attended my first rehearsal, arriving directly from
new York City, my fortitude kept me steady. With confidence and new
York City memories in my heart, I joined the rest of the cast and reveled
in the excitement. I followed my new friends with a passion for an art
form that I hardly knew, but willingly embraced.
From that moment on, I was a horse freely cantering around an
open meadow. I had discovered a new point of view, and the grass wasChapter 10: Heritage and Identity
103
greener than it had ever seemed. Some days, I came home with new
dance steps to show my parents. On other days, I drew the designs of
my costumes when my descriptions at the dinner table would not suf-
fice. The make-up artist tried three times to find the right blush, while
the hair team created a different style for me each night. Having to
think up a new hairstyle each time was parallel to my shifting opinion
of my life and self. Although participating in the musical was initially
petrifying, I discovered that taking such a risk was the optimal way to
grow and change.
now, I will not shy away from being in a musical cast because my
comfort zone is expanding. Soon it will encompass the grand scope
of my interests: from singing and dancing to throwing a sales pitch
in front of judges; from learning how to execute precision front-flips
to building my favorite piano repertoire; from designing a webpage
to arranging chamber music, or developing optics technologies. Such
passions will continue to define who I am and what I hope to achieve.
My character is being shaped and reshaped by my learning experiences
because I am an impressionable human being. As I continue to explore,
I know that my interests will solidify into a cohesive whole. Until then,
I seek to enrich myself with new opportunities and never look back.
AnAlysis
Besides being the name of the musical in which she participated,
the title of Jean’s essay, “Anything Goes,” also captures the “free-spir-
ited horse” within her that “ventured beyond the pasture of [her] com-
fort zone, and participated onstage in the high school musical for the
first time.” The “horse” metaphor not only captures Jean’s adventurous
spirit, but also ties to her Chinese heritage, as seen in her reference to
the horse in Chinese astrology. Like Angelica’s references to her heri-
tage in “No Longer Invisible” (Chapter 7), Jean’s mention of her zodiac
sign is a creative and subtle way to introduce her culture to readers
without her ethnicity becoming the core focus of the paper. Jean al-
ludes to her heritage again at the end of the second paragraph, when
she decides to “let go of [her] cautious Chinese approach to life.” Some
readers might take offense to this cultural stereotype; when writing
about culture, it is important to be mindful of distinguishing between
personal beliefs and stereotypes.
Jean’s second paragraph gives us an excellent sense of her in-
ternal debates over whether or not she should take a risk and play in
the pit as she swings between fear and confidence. Many successful104
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
essays not only relate events but also one’s feelings and thoughts re-
garding the activity. Jean notes that she was “terrified” before the musi-
cal but shows her open-minded spirit when she “willingly embraced”
the new art form. She refers back to the mentions of horse and free-
dom when she writes, “I was a horse freely cantering around an open
meadow.” The specific examples that follow demonstrate the diversity
of new activities to which Jean is introduced and the eagerness with
which she embraces each one. Jean does a wonderful job of explain-
ing the horse-in-meadow simile with concrete, real-life examples such
as these: showing her parents dance steps, drawing costume designs,
and experimenting with new hairstyles.
In her concluding paragraph, Jean ties together the many ex-
amples she used in her essay to show us how her “comfort zone is
expanding.” She illustrates some of the contours of this comfort zone,
which she calls the “grand scope” of her interests: “from singing and
dancing to throwing a sales pitch in front of judges; from learning how
to execute precision front-flips to building my favorite piano repertoire;
from designing a webpage to arranging chamber music, or developing
optics technologies.” Illustrations like these can sometimes feel like
long lists. Jean might have chosen to list fewer activities so that what
she did choose to include could stand out more. The first line, which
contrasts singing and dancing with throwing a sales pitch, is most di-
rectly relevant to the essay since singing and dancing were new ex-
periences from the musical and throwing a sales pitch may have been
part of the leadership conference in New York City that she mentioned
briefly. In general, it is most compelling to use examples that are di-
rectly relevant to the essay to maintain a sense of focus. Bringing in
too many outside references—for instance, Jean’s comment on “de-
veloping optics technologies”—can seem incongruous and confuse
readers. Overall, however, Jean’s essay does a nice job of showing
the breadth of her interests as well as the depth of energy she is willing
to pour into creative pursuits such as the “Anything Goes” musical.
“strength from Family struggles”
Anonymous
University of Chicago
EVErY FAmILY hAS ThEIr STorY, ALL with aspects that brings them
together or drive them apart. I come from a Mexican family, where fam-
ily is the only thing we know. We share each other’s pain and misery
and we rejoice for our miracles. We learn and grow through each other.Chapter 10: Heritage and Identity
105
Even through the darkest days we survive as one. I witnessed those
dark days, but I also saw the bright and through it all I evolved into
who I am today.
I encountered one of my biggest obstructions when I was a child. I
was born into a family that had immigrated to America from Mexico.
Although my parents had been in the country for quite some time, they
never adapted to the American lifestyle. All I knew was Spanish and
my first year of school would soon come. I would sit at the end of my
driveway and listen to the variety of sounds that slowly crept into my
ear, triggered a reaction and sent confusion running through my mind.
Day after day, I would sit there trying to decode this puzzle word by
word and the day came when I’d be shipped off to school where I was
expected to know English. Kindergarten was one of the hardest years
in my life. I struggled tremendously. I was the last one to know my ad-
dress, I was the last one to know my phone number, and I was the one
who almost failed his first year of school. If it wasn’t for my father not
allowing the school to hold me back, I could have become a completely
different person. I struggled throughout my years in elementary school.
I went to resource and received help with my schoolwork until fourth
grade. I was given a big push forward and since then I have come to
realize that I may not be the only one in need. Others will need help
and I will be there with a helping hand.
Through the years, my family has undergone a variety of obstacles.
I saw my brother completely stumble and fall when he impregnated
his girlfriend at the age of sixteen. At the blink of an eye he became a
father to be and a husband. Everything came to a halt and he needed to
support another person. He worked during the night and finished high
school during the day. He struggled even while living at home. As if one
example in my house wasn’t enough, my sister was expecting a child
during her senior year. I remember the day when she told my parents, I
was in the room next door crying in pain because she fell into the same
trap my brother did. That was the end for her. She graduated from high
school and began to work. now she has two daughters and is trying to
make a living. It is hard to see the people you love make mistakes. It
is so hard, that it brings tears to my eyes, to know that you wish you
could say everything will be ok. They are stuck in a rut and I am put-
ting my best foot forward to give myself the future they don’t have.106
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
When my mother was a child she had suffered a great amount. She
had become deaf in her teenage years. She lost complete ability to hear
in her right ear and partially in the left and to add to all the confusion
she was bound by a language. She was living in America with 4 of 5
senses and a tongue that many could not speak. Many would see this
as a huge dent in her life, but she managed to start a family. I could not
be any more proud of her and thankful for what she has given me. Her
“disability” placed a tremendous amount of pressure on my shoulders.
She was not able to go to the deli or to place phone calls when she
needed to. All of a sudden, all of this had become my responsibility. My
father was too busy breaking his back in order to support our family.
My mother’s personal translator, doesn’t sound too shabby? Standing
in the middle of the store, making hand jesters, mouthing out words,
or even yelling, does attract attention. In those moments I would feel
a surge of heat rush from head to toe, goose bumps in every possible
crevice of my body, and to top it all off I’d be seven shades darker than a
ripe tomato. Shame and embarrassment, how could I feel this way? All
this had become routine and the pain and embarrassment finally start-
ed to subside, a whole new feeling started to emerge, pride. My mother
made me strong. She allowed me to become the man I am today. And
after all the pain there are still countless nights that I lie in bed, crying
due to the burden that was placed on her and the tremendous lesson I
learned. Every sound, every beat, every photon, every little everything
has been absorbed into me one way or another, yet these experiences,
although insignificant to others, mean to world to me. All these events
run through my veins and pump through my heart. I am the passion
that is rarely seen. I am the walking story of struggle.
AnAlysis
This student’s essay conveys his devotion to his family as well as
his independence from it. He shares honestly about the story of his
parents and siblings so that as readers we can catch a glimpse of the
“pain and misery” and the “miracles” that he has experienced. This
student recounts many adversities, beginning with his memories of be-
ing a kindergartener who did not know English. He notes, “I struggled
throughout my years in elementary school. I went to resource and re-
ceived help with my schoolwork until fourth grade.” Here, the essay
would be clearer had he described what “resource” was and related
specific ways in which it gave him that “big push forward.” It is impor-Chapter 10: Heritage and Identity
tant to remember to describe in greater detail those events that repre-
sent pivotal life experiences. For him, the support and direction that he
received seemed to have inspired him to understand that others would
also need help, something that he felt he could provide.
At the end of this first long paragraph, we are curious to learn
about how this student was able to manifest this desire to help oth-
ers. However, he returns to the story of his family and tells about the
“mistakes” of his siblings. While the content of this paragraph is cer-
tainly compelling, the writer must consider both content and structure
when designing the flow of an essay. Any content is enhanced by a
supportive structure with a logical progression and clear organization.
At the end of the second paragraph, he writes, “I am putting my best
foot forward to give myself the future [my siblings] don’t have.” This
sentence is enlightening and assists us in understanding the purpose
of his prolonged descriptions about his family’s suffering. Despite this
difficult environment, he maintained his motivation and worked hard
to complete his education, believing he must do so to avoid becoming
“stuck in a rut.”
In the final paragraph of this essay, this student writes about his
mother’s struggles as a deaf immigrant in America. Recounting his
role as his “mother’s personal translator,” he describes his feelings and
thoughts, demonstrating a capacity for astutely recognizing his own
emotions. He describes turning the shade of tomato with shame and
embarrassment, followed by the emergence of pride. His descriptions
about emotions are particularly powerful because he illustrates how
they feel in the body. Strong emotions typically elicit a profound bodily
reaction, and he captures this beautifully in the scenes at the store
where he translated for his mother. The focus on the body makes his
final statement, “I am the walking story of struggle,” all the more ap-
ropos because we see how “all these events run through [his] veins
and pump through [his] heart.” This student’s writing shows us that
essay reviewers do not require a perfect grasp of English—English is
obviously his second language. What makes this student’s essay com-
pelling is his ability to illustrate both vulnerability and strength in con-
fronting the many challenges he and his family have faced as Mexican
immigrants.
10711
huMor
“Exit Door”
Fareez Giga
Stanford University
I coNSIdEr mYSELF To BE mATUrE and focused in my life; I have
goals that I strive for and a strong commitment to my education.
However, I do have my more humorous moments, just as everyone
else. For instance, a few summers ago, my family and I were in Las
vegas on vacation. The over-the-top looking-by-night, eyesore-by-day
city was lighted everywhere, and masses of people were walking along
the Las vegas Strip. One night, we went out to dinner and were walk-
ing back to our hotel. When we got to the entrance of the hotel, which
had automatic sliding doors, there was a huge line waiting to get in,
yet there were many other doors to its side unoccupied. So, naturally,
I said aloud, “Why don’t we just go through those doors,” as I pointed
towards the unoccupied doors. My family just waited patiently, but I
decided to go by myself, so I did, and I walked straight into the EXIT
door. I am not sure who was more injured, myself, or my sister who
collapsed onto the floor in convulsive laughter. I still have not heard
the end of this story, but at least now I can laugh at myself. Many times
109110
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
people get discouraged in their hectic and stress-filled lives, but some-
times you just need a dim-witted accident to occur to put everything
in perspective.
AnAlysis
In this note to his future roommate, Fareez relates a humorous
anecdote to reveal the lighthearted side to his personality. This es-
say prompt gives students the unique opportunity to demonstrate how
they would relate to peers of their own age group, rather than an older
group of admissions officers. Fareez introduces himself as “mature
and focused” with “a strong commitment” to education, which at first
glance appears to be a rather hackneyed and unmemorable set of
statements. However, he quickly throws in an expected twist by allud-
ing to a humorous moment, thereby piquing our curiosity as he sets up
the scene in Las Vegas.
His anecdote not only shows us that Fareez “can laugh at [him]self,”
but also lets us see that he is close to his family, and especially his
sister. Fareez’s narrative is enjoyable to read because he includes
details to make the story more vivid, like mentioning his feelings to-
wards Las Vegas and describing his sister’s “convulsive” collapse from
laughter. Though hardly earth shattering, the “blooper” that Fareez
shares is nonetheless memorable—he walks headlong into an EXIT
door in front of a large crowd of people—and in particular his reaction
is noteworthy.
At the end of this short essay, Fareez ties the anecdote back to
college life when he alludes to “hectic and stress-filled” times. Fareez’s
ability to put things in perspective suggests that he will be able to cope
with the challenges of college life, and will bring joy and humor to
whoever is lucky enough to be his roommate. This essay strikes a nice
balance between a casual tone and a deeper analysis. Thus, the topic
and style of the essay are reflective of the content, which show us
both the silly and serious sides to Fareez’s personality. A short essay
such as this one is a wonderful opportunity to share a quirky story that
makes you stand out in the admissions officer’s huge stack of essays.Chapter 11: Humor
111
“Crime scene Report”
Lauren Sanders
Duke University
crImE ScENE rEporT
crime: Missing Person
Location: Duke University, 2138 Campus Drive, Box 90586, Durham,
north Carolina 27708-0586
Time: October 2, 2008, 11:00 A.M.
Investigated by: Admissions Officers of Duke University
cASE dEScrIpTIoN:
On the morning of October 2, 2008, at precisely 7:00 A.M., a Miss
Lauren Sanders began to worry. Her future-self entered the gates of a
prestigious university in the fall of 2009 and had not returned home.
Miss Sanders filed a missing person’s report, hoping someone could
help her to locate her future-self in a world of possibilities.
The case began with a grueling interrogation of Miss Lauren Sanders,
the person who knew most about her future-self. However, the ques-
tioning session yielded little information. Miss Sanders could not fully
describe herself in the future. Pressured, she stated that “she has the
ambition to fulfill all of her goals, is both stubborn and industrious,
and wants to experience University life.” Miss Sanders lacked a photo-
graph of her future-self, but remarked that “she has brown hair, likes to
describe herself as vertically-challenged, and is usually smiling.”
nOTE: While unable to describe her future-self, Miss Sanders be-
lieved that examination of past experiences could possibly assist the ad-
missions officers in the case. According to Miss Sanders, her future-self
has “volunteered in her community and traveled on a global scale.”
Physical evidence collected during a thorough search of Miss
Sander’s bedroom included a Dell laptop, a collection of Jane Austin
novels, worn textbooks, and an I-pod. Fingerprinting analysis and DnA
processing determined that these items belong to both Miss Sanders
and her future-self, and that they use these items frequently. Despite
biological traces of the future-self found within the home, laboratory
analysis concluded that Miss Sanders’ future-self does not reside within
her hometown.
With information gathered from the physical search of Miss Sanders’
home and Miss Sanders’ interrogation, a database search was conducted112
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
to determine possible universities in which Miss Sanders’ future-self
resided. Within minutes, Duke University appeared as a match.
With this lead, authorities conducted numerous searches at Duke
University in Durham, north Carolina, probing the dorms, library, and
classrooms. All searches yielded nothing, yet the possibility of finding
Miss Sanders’ future-self remains strong. Professors and students alike,
when questioned about Miss Sanders’ future-self, strongly believe that
many individuals like her come to the University to find their potential
paths.
Further examination will be needed to complete this investigation,
including a thorough inspection of Miss Sanders’ resume and letters of
recommendation. Hopefully, the leads that we have will direct us to the
whereabouts of her future-self.
nOTE: According to Miss Sanders, the future-self plans to travel
on a foreign-exchange student program and hopes to conduct research
in one of the many labs available to undergraduates. At present, these
areas have not been searched by professionals.
On the morning of October 2, 2009, at precisely 7:04 A.M., the
admissions officers found Miss Lauren Sanders’ future-self at Duke
University. She had hidden in the incoming student body.
AnAlysis
Lauren’s “Crime Scene Report” proves that there is no “standard”
format for a college admissions essay. This essay’s creative structure
completely breaks the mold. Not only is it written in letter format, it also
includes quirky NOTES in the body of the letter. While Lauren takes a
big risk in deviating from the standard introduction-body paragraphs-
conclusion structure, her essay is undeniably memorable. Lauren suc-
cessfully pulls off her caper—both in the fictional mystery story she
tells, and in her playful writing style.
The creativity of the “Crime Scene Report” probably attests to
Lauren’s personality. We see that she is not afraid to take bold risks in
her writing and stand out in a crowd. This unabashed attitude can be
seen in her audacious and hilarious ending: “She had hidden in the
incoming student body.” This is a completely unexpected yet confident
way to assert her strong belief that she deserves to be admitted to
Duke.
The clever way that Lauren infuses details about her interests
throughout her writing helps add more “serious” elements to the
mischievous format of her essay. For example, under the guise ofChapter 11: Humor
an “interrogation,” we learn that she is ambitious, “stubborn and
industrious” and curious about university life. Later on, we find more
specific data that is relevant to Lauren—that she hopes to study
abroad and conduct research in a lab. Perhaps Lauren could narrow
the scope of this research by describing the lab she sees in her future,
as this lab might be in biology, psychology, robotics, and endless
other possibilities. In addition to sharing her goals, Lauren reveals
past experiences that have shaped her life, specifically volunteerism
and international travel. This note piques our curiosity about these
experiences; ideally, Lauren would discuss these in more detail in
another essay. Lauren creatively uses this format to present not just
her future goals and past experiences, but also her appearance (we
envision a “vertically-challenged” smiling brunette) and some of the
things around her that hint at her interests (her laptop, Jane Austen
novels, textbooks, and I-Pod).
All these details present Lauren from a number of perspectives.
Overall, the specifics provide content to what would otherwise be a
fun and humorous, but perhaps not terribly substantial, piece of writ-
ing. Lauren may have considered combining the paragraphs that begin
“With this lead . . . ” and “Further examination . . . ” Though these two
paragraphs help move along the “plot” of the crime scene, they don’t
give us substantially more information about Lauren herself. Since
space is so precious in college essays, it is important to edit carefully.
Eliminating redundancy creates more space to add enriching and edi-
fying details that will more fully present the complex person that you
are.
11312
an inFlu Ential
PErson
“John nash”
Jonathan Cross
Duke University
AFTEr SpENdING A wEEK wITh JohN nash, I may have stumbled
upon a central purpose of my life. Well, not nobel Laureate John nash
himself, but whenever I describe Fred, their characteristics seem quite
parallel. Fred is unique, possessing an indomitable spirit to fulfill his
dreams without fear of failure. not only is he the most brilliant young
man I have ever met, he exhibits a genuinely compassionate heart. Sadly,
many people may never recognize Fred as the beautiful individual that
he is, or what he has to offer. While our society may call him “chal-
lenged,” I have come to recognize him as an unexpected role model.
For Fred, you see, is autistic. He does not interact well with people, and
is often unable to express his thoughts clearly or articulately. He doesn’t
understand why people laugh at him. Yet even so, Fred is blessed with
an acute sense of purpose and caring that is unmatched by most—in-
cluding perhaps even the most altruistic among us.
115116
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
Several years ago I traveled with a small group of Fairfax County
high school students to Portland, Oregon to compete as a Finalist in
the Intel International Science and Engineering Fair. I was excited at
what was certain to be an experience of a lifetime—having no clue that
the most valuable lesson would come not from the Science Fair itself,
but from Fred. Because of my prior experiences in working with spe-
cial needs children, the school administrators asked me to room with
Fred during the trip. I distinctly recall my initial anxiety and reluc-
tance about the prospect of taking care of another individual during the
stressful, high-pressure atmosphere of the competition. In retrospect,
though, this was the beginning of an incredible journey for both of
us—but especially for me.
Fred’s passion—actually more of an obsession—is theoretical math-
ematics. He eats, breathes, talks, and probably sleeps mathematics, to
the point where he annoys others by his constant chatter about it. His
idea of fun is solving differential equations on a napkin in a fancy res-
taurant, oblivious to others wanting to socialize or relax. That Fred is
brilliant is unquestioned, a fact that was clearly evidenced in his sci-
ence project where he solved a math problem previously believed by
experts to be insolvable. Yet in his own mind Fred firmly believed his
entire raison d’etre in life was the pursuit of math—and that he was
destined to use his incredible mathematical ability to help make the
world better.
However, Fred’s disabilities were only a fraction of the challenges
that faced him. growing up in a dysfunctional home, he suffered from a
lack of love and patient understanding. Still, Fred’s life revolved around
his relationships and mathematics. Although he has few close friends,
people are indescribably important to him, and he always treated them
with sensitivity and compassion. Unfortunately, some people—includ-
ing but not limited to his peers (who can sometimes be quite cruel)—
are unable to set aside their prejudices long enough to see his unique-
ness as the incredible gift that it is. His enthusiasm and his indomitable
spirit in the face of adversity taught me valuable lessons—lessons I will
carry with me for the rest of my life. He taught me to live for what you
truly cherish, to be passionate about your dreams, and to always smile
in both the service of others and adversity. He has shown me the truest
meaning of love for others, and the ability to understand and alwaysChapter 12: An Influential Person
117
live for what is important. A trip that started with me “taking care of
him” turned into a trip of substantial personal discovery.
Children with special needs have powerful talents, and if we could
only open our hearts to hear their voices, we would learn what it means
to live without conventional boundaries. I have lived a week with a
genius, not only of the mind, but more importantly, of the heart—and
my life has been permanently changed because of Fred.
AnAlysis
Jonathan begins his essay with a reference to a famous figure,
John Nash, but wisely doesn’t assume we know who he is and men-
tions that he is a Nobel laureate. Then, the essay hooks in the reader
by throwing in a twist: this essay is not about John Nash at all, but
about someone named Fred. It’s obvious that Jonathan holds Fred
in high esteem, but it is initially unclear just who Fred is. However, as
we read about Fred, we not only meet someone who has influenced
Jonathan, but we are also introduced to Jonathan’s admirable ability
to be open-minded towards an individual even when others might be
dismissive. As Jonathan notes, “While our society may call him ‘chal-
lenged,’ I have come to recognize him as an unexpected role model.”
This is certainly not the typical role model story, where one might
name a family member or famous person. The parallel between Fred
and John Nash underscores Jonathan’s respect for Fred, and this un-
usual and unexpected comparison show us how Jonathan stands out
from the rest of society.
Note that Jonathan is careful not to get on a “high horse,” making
much over himself. Instead, he writes, “Fred is blessed with an acute
sense of purpose and caring that is unmatched by most—including
perhaps even the most altruistic among us.” The last part of this state-
ment adds a sense of humility so that Jonathan does not seem to be
judgmental toward us for not accepting people with autism or other dis-
abilities in the way that he is able to do. Generally, taking a moralizing
or condescending tone is alienating for readers, who want to be invited
into your story, not estranged from it. Indeed, Jonathan further avoids
a high-minded tone by describing his “initial anxiety and reluctance” at
rooming with Fred, even in spite of his previous experience in working
with special needs children. Jonathan’s honesty is impressive: many
people might not admit to such seemingly taboo or even discrimina-
tory thoughts of not wanting to spend time with special needs children,
even if these thoughts are true. However, Jonathan’s honesty helps
us understand why he sums up his time in Portland as “an incredible
journey . . . especially for me.”118
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
Jonathan takes a risk in devoting the third paragraph and much of
the fourth paragraph of his essay to describing Fred’s story. However,
because we know that Fred does not interact easily with others, we
can surmise that Fred felt comfortable enough with Jonathan to share
so much of his life with him. We can also see that Jonathan is an
astute observer and compassionate listener. Though Jonathan may
have chosen to present fewer details about Fred, he does a good job
of bringing it back to himself when he writes, “[Fred’s] enthusiasm
and indomitable spirit in the face of adversity taught me valuable les-
sons—lessons I will carry with me for the rest of my life . . . A trip that
started with me ‘taking care of him’ turned into a trip of substantial
personal discovery.’” In essays about personal role models, it can be
tempting to write about the role model and lose sight of oneself. For a
college admissions essay, however, it is important to remember that
admissions officers ultimately want to learn more about you. If you are
writing about someone else, it is important to make explicit how this
person has influenced you, something that Jonathan does well in the
last sentences of his fourth paragraph.
The strength of Jonathan’s essay lies in its many unexpected
elements. Though attending the Intel International Science and
Engineering Fair is clearly a huge honor, the essay tells us about a
person. And this individual is hardly a famous person, but he is spoken
about with the highest reverence and respect. Thus, Jonathan demon-
strates the strength of his character; he is likely to be an asset to the
student body of any college because of his exemplary acceptance of
people from all backgrounds.
“Then and now: How the Perseverance of a Working,
single Mother Molded the Persona of her Chinese-
American Daughter”
Lisa Kapp
University of Pennsylvania
I GrEw Up IN A FoUr-room apartment in the middle of Beijing at
the turn of the twentieth century. Common household features such
as the existence of stairs within a house were thought of as decadent
luxuries representative of the incredibly wealthy. My life was simple. At
five years old, it was differentiated by two things, the times I was with
my mother and the times I was not.
My single mother was a chemist and professor at the University of
Beijing. Even at a young age, she distinguished herself from her peersChapter 12: An Influential Person
119
with her remarkable ambition and intense passion for learning. From
growing up in the frigid winds of northern Mongolia, to becoming one
of three students to earn a full scholarship to China’s most competitive
university, to working as a government-sponsored chemist in goslar,
germany, my mother accomplished more before I was born than most
people achieved in a lifetime.
Unfortunately, I would not learn of the fabulous successes and ardu-
ous trials of my mother until much, much later. All I could understand
or not understand at five years old was why my mother was rarely
home, why I did not see her for three months during the summer when
I lived with my grandparents, and why I was forced to go to a daycare
owned by a tyrannical monster who would tell ghost stories to make
me cry. Even now, much of my knowledge about my mother’s early life
is something I am still piecing together. As was the case then, my full
understanding of her brilliant yet ill-tempered persona is continually
hindered by the simple troubles of life. Although now, they are the is-
sues of an eighteen-year old teenager rather than those of a five-year
old child.
I remember nights we would spend together when she was busy
with her research and classes; I would sit in a desk next to her, draw-
ing pictures and imagine that I was her personal assistant. I also re-
member times when I had to stay home alone because she had a
lecture to give or errands to run; I would lean against the window sill
staring down into the bleak, concrete streets waiting and watching
for the return of a petite form in a bright red jacket. Yet despite the
forlorn days and the lonely nights, I feel neither regret nor resentment
towards those early years or my mother. On the contrary, I am incred-
ibly proud and grateful for all the difficulties she endured in order
to raise me properly. Had it not been for my childhood experiences,
I would not have matured at such an early age or developed such a
strong sense of independence.
We moved to America in the spring of 1997. The transition of cul-
tures was daunting yet it failed to dishearten my mother. Like every
other experience in her life, she treated the move as an opportunity.
However, even my mother was not immune to the overwhelming cul-
tural shock, and despite her perseverance and accomplishments, she
continually struggled with the language barrier and the difference in
societal values.120
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
While my mother was forced to labor against such changes, my
young age enabled me to adapt quickly to the new environment.
Unfortunately, my “Americanization” has caused a great deal of mysti-
fication and incomprehension in my mother. not only do our manners
of speaking differ, but we no longer view traditional beliefs the same
way. Her lack of encouragement for my participation in athletics and
her excessive emphasis on my grades have been both frustrating and
upsetting. From my gregarious nature and social outings to my obdu-
rate refusals to comply with her every long-established demand, she
has been forced to accept the evolution of her daughter from that of
Chinese doll to American teenager.
nevertheless, despite our various differences and my acute assimi-
lation into another culture, I have never lost sight of what mattered
most to me, nor forgotten the roots of my heritage and rigorous up-
bringing. My mother’s persistence and endurance are qualities which I
have proudly assumed and carried with me in every activity of my life.
From facing the ignorant racisms of elementary classmates to the mali-
cious jealousies of middle school peers, I have never doubted or second
guessed the work ethic and moral code that she instilled in me. Her re-
sourcefulness has also been highly influential and taught me of the im-
portance of seeking opportunities. Whether it was working along side
Philadelphia Inquirer journalists or researching marketing strategies for
a startup company, I have learned and developed with each success and
letdown encountered throughout my middle and high school years.
The difficulties of my mother and the difficulties that I faced in two
countries on two continents continue to define and shape my personal-
ity and character. As mother and daughter continue along the journey
of life, I hope that she can come to accept and embrace the daughter
whom she has so diligently raised while I hope to slowly unravel the
full mystery that is my mother and, one day, finally comprehend and
appreciate the entirety of her effect on my life.
AnAlysis
With an impressive vocabulary and keen sense of reflection, Lisa
has written an essay that conveys the story of her unique upbring-
ing across two very different cultures. This essay weaves together
Lisa’s history and personality with that of her mother. Like Timothy’s
essay “Self Mind,” (Chapter 7), Lisa balances information about herselfChapter 12: An Influential Person
with that of descriptions about her mother. Lisa’s essay is particularly
memorable because she traces the evolution of her thoughts and feel-
ings toward her mother as she grows up. Rather than being a typical
“role model” story, Lisa explains the difficulties and challenges she has
faced in America with her “brilliant yet ill-tempered” mother. Writing
about both strengths and weaknesses—whether about yourself or
other people—helps to humanize people in essays. This also contrib-
utes to a tone of honesty and authenticity. However, overemphasizing
weaknesses or negative emotions isn’t desirable since these essays
are first and foremost ways to present yourself and argue why you
should be accepted to a college. Essays are not forums for whining or
complaining.
Lisa exemplifies this non-complaining attitude in the first half of
her essay. One interpretation of her personal history is that she was
left home alone and neglected. However, Lisa asserts, “. . . despite the
forlorn days and the lonely nights, I feel neither regret nor resentment
towards those early years or my mother.” The concrete, evocative im-
ages that Lisa shares with us—pretending she is her mom’s personal
assistant, searching the “bleak, concrete streets” for a glimpse of “a
petite form in a bright red jacket”—help explain what “forlorn days” and
“lonely nights” looked like for Lisa. These images convey a powerful
mood without the distraction of harsh judgments.
In the second half of her essay, Lisa explains the tensions brought
about by her immigration and “Americanization” to the U.S. Lisa is
frank in her feelings towards her mother, noting, “Her lack of encour-
agement for my participation in athletics and her excessive empha-
sis on my grades have been both frustrating and upsetting.” However,
rather than dwelling on the negative aspects of such emotional issues,
Lisa presents the bigger lessons that these feelings represent: her
independence as well as her respect and appreciation for her “heri-
tage and rigorous upbringing.” Lisa’s essay nicely weaves together her
past experiences in Beijing, present activities in America, and future
hopes of unraveling the mysteries presented by the tensions between
American and Chinese culture.
12113
issu Es
“sustainable Development in south Africa”
Steve Schwartz
Columbia University
AS I SAT AT A TABLE in the corner of a cafe, hunched over a press re-
lease I was writing, I asked myself, “Why is a youth advocate from Long
Island, halfway around the world in South Africa this summer, debat-
ing issues of sustainable development at a United nations conference?”
I needed to meet a deadline for the Youth Caucus at the World Summit
on Sustainable Development (WSSD) after an exhausting but exhilarat-
ing day of lobbying. My goal was to help persuade world leaders at the
largest United nations conference in history that pursuing sustainable
development is essential for the future of our planet. Because I had at-
tended a previous Un conference about children’s rights, I understood
the importance of sustainable development in this context. Then, I was
chosen to represent SustainUS, a national network of American youth,
at the WSSD. I raised all of the money needed for my trip. I was thrilled
to witness the human spirit in its purest sense, taking collective action
to care for the less fortunate around the globe.
123124
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
It was one thing to debate language in the conference document
about goals set to provide people in developing nations with access to
water. It was quite another to visit Soweto, only a few kilometers away
from the conference, and to meet poor Africans living in shanties with
limited access to water. This observation embedded in my mind the
seriousness of my work in a way that no statistic could describe. The
challenge on paper seemed quite different from the harshness of Soweto
and Alexandria and the long-suffering faces and pleading eyes of the
beggars there. I reminded myself that I needed to work around the
clock while I was in South Africa to help these impoverished people.
After arriving in Johannesburg this past August, I traveled to the
International Youth Summit. I drafted the youth declaration which was
used for lobbying, and I helped to write a statement from the youth
delegates for government representatives to read and consider while
negotiating. While at the WSSD, aside from writing daily press releases
that became Associated Press and reuters articles, I drafted speeches
which were presented to the delegates, including over one hundred
heads of state. I experienced an adrenaline rush when I fielded ques-
tions from reporters during a press conference. These challenging situ-
ations were new learning opportunities for me and provided me with
knowledge much different from what one learns in high school. I want
to learn more about the histories of international financial institutions
and the ways they interact with national governments.
As a result of my attending the World Summit, I have gained a
new perspective on global politics and its effects on people’s lives. The
thought that people from around the world can join together to solve a
global issue never fails to impress and inspire me.
My participation in the WSSD has taught me more about the con-
vergence of politics, international relations and the environment than
I have learned in any other activity or in the classroom. Working with
others to reveal the crucial need for sustainable development is essen-
tial to our world’s successful future. All of my experiences have helped
me to understand how international meetings operate and to accept the
responsibility that comes with the privilege to attend and contribute to
the solution.125
Chapter 13: Issues
AnAlysis
Steve’s essay gives us insight into his experiences as a youth ad-
vocate in South Africa and youth representative for the WSSD. This
unique opportunity is obviously a great honor. Steve does a good job
presenting specific examples of his summer experiences and relating
the larger lessons he learned from them.
In his introduction, Steve might have helped contextualize the situ-
ation by explaining what it means to be a “youth delegate,” how long
the WSSD was going to last, why he needed to write a press release,
and what kind of lobbying he was doing. While impressive, the first
paragraph in this essay is almost overwhelming because it contains
so much information with limited explanation. Additionally, the refer-
ence to the SustainUS conference is confusing. It is unclear whether
the next two sentences about fundraising for the trip and witnessing
“the human spirit in its purest sense” refer to the SustainUS confer-
ence or the South Africa conference. Avoid the temptation to inundate
readers with information and make sure that what you do write is clear
and concise. Think of your college application as a package where
you can include information about yourself through many different av-
enues—the essays are just one channel for introducing yourself to the
admissions officers.
The second paragraph of the essay is strong because it focuses
specifically on Steve’s experiences in Soweto. The contrast between
the conference and the shantytowns is striking. Steve might have elab-
orated more on his experiences of meeting “poor Africans living in
shanties with limited access to water” to further demonstrate why “this
observation embedded in [his] mind the seriousness of [his] work in a
way that no statistic could describe.” Steve demonstrates his commit-
ment to helping others in his assertion, “I needed to work around the
clock while I was in South Africa to help these impoverished people.”
His essay would be even stronger if he could more explicitly relate
this lesson to what he learned from the International Youth Summit.
Clarifying the distinctions between the Youth Caucus at the WSSD, the
International Youth Summit, and the World Summit would help read-
ers be on the same page as Steve. The ease with which Steve uses
these terms clearly demonstrates his familiarity with government and
politics. However, it is important to remember that college admissions
essays are typically written for the general reader, rather than a spe-
cialist reader. Exceptions to this include essays that ask about specific
career paths.
The conclusion of the essay cleanly ties together Steve’s diverse
experiences and looks towards the future, where one suspects that
Steve will consider working towards sustainable development, both in126
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
and out of the classroom. Had Steve applied to a school with a strong
international development or political science program, he might have
also referenced these specific university assets to tailor his essay for
that specific university.
“A young Voice for seniors”
Ariela Koehler
MIT
NoVEmBEr 23, Two YEArS AGo: ThANKSGIVING. My mom and
I celebrated the holiday as we had done for the last three years—by
delivering turkey dinners to homebound senior citizens. After carrying
the food to their kitchens, our brief visits with them were filled with
laughter, hugs, and the sharing of family photo albums. In the midst of
all the warmth and vitality, though, I couldn’t help noticing the signs of
loneliness and isolation: the windows with dust suggesting they hadn’t
been open in ages, the faded Christmas cards from 1995, and the tables
with a single place setting. It was during these visits that I committed to
find a way to better connect with the seniors in my community.
I discussed my desire with the mayor of Fremont in December two
years ago. He agreed that a younger voice could prove to be beneficial
and mentioned the Senior Citizen Commission for the City of Fremont
(an advisory board to City Council that worked to directly address the
needs of local seniors). I formally applied to the Commission and was
unanimously appointed by City Council in February last year, becom-
ing the youngest Commissioner in Fremont’s history.
Although I was initially met with skepticism from my fellow Senior
Citizen Commissioners, I was committed to sharing my vision of the
benefits of intergenerational interactions. For the next two months, my
after-school hours were devoted to calling nursing homes, negotiat-
ing with movie theater managers, and recruiting teen volunteers. The
resulting event was the Senior Movie Outing, which paired teenagers
with wheelchair-bound seniors for a fun afternoon at the movies.
As a result of my hard work on the successful outing and the rave
reviews from all who participated, my fellow Commissioners became
more respectful of my contributions and open to my input. During the
annual grant-reviewing period (when the Commission decides which127
Chapter 13: Issues
non-profit organizations will receive City funding), I advocated to fund
Lavender Seniors, an organization which supports gay and lesbian se-
niors. While it had not previously been funded by the City, I strongly
believed it fell within the Commission’s charter of “serving the needs of
all seniors.” After sharing my rationale for proposing to fund Lavender
Seniors, I was proud that the Commissioners kept an open mind and
the majority voted to grant the organization funding.
In the two years since my appointment, I have cherished the unique
opportunities I have had to learn from people with different perspec-
tives and backgrounds. My time on the Commission has taught me to
be more confident when expressing my ideas, and to be more open to
hearing others’ thoughts. I am proud to be a trusted voice for seniors
in my community.
AnAlysis
Ariela takes advantage of this optional essay to illustrate a unique
perspective on her life. While her other two essays focused on her
passion for science, this essay helps create a “thorough impression”
of other aspects of Ariela’s life, namely her commitment to public ser-
vice and experiences in local government leadership. This essay is
reminiscent of Anastasia’s “Cuddle Buddies” (Chapter 8) in presenting
an example of going above and beyond an assigned service task. In
Ariela’s case, she is delivering turkey dinners to homebound senior
citizens. Her compassion shines through when she notes, “. . . our brief
visits with them were filled with laughter, hugs, and the sharing of fam-
ily photo albums.” However, it is Ariela’s keen sense of observation that
helps her to notice “signs of loneliness and isolation”: dusty windows,
faded Christmas cards, single place settings. These evocative details
show that she recognizes a community need—“a way to better con-
nect with the seniors.” The contrast to the joy and laughter and the indi-
cations of loneliness make this first paragraph emotionally compelling
and clearly demonstrate the issue that Ariela hopes to address.
What makes Ariela’s story unique is that she is not content to rest
with this observation. Instead, she takes her concern to someone who
can help facilitate the change she envisions. By providing the dates
in her essay, Ariela shows us the compressed time frame in which
all of the actions and changes she created took place. This highlights
her ability to act quickly and suggests that she will be a mover and a
shaker in her college setting.
Ariela’s essay also stands out because she describes the chal-
lenges she encounters in the process of creating change. First, she128
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
faces skepticism from fellow Senior Citizen Commissioners. However,
she overcomes this resistance by staying committed to a shared “vi-
sion of the benefits of intergenerational interactions.” Ariela’s ability
to work on a team is all the more remarkable because the team isn’t
comprised of her peers at school. Thus, her position on the Senior
Citizen Commission shows us that she is diplomatic in her ability to
work with others. Through her hard work, the Senior Movie Outing was
created, a success that helped garner her more respect from her fel-
low commissioners.
Not only did Ariela help create more opportunities for intergen-
erational interaction, but her efforts also facilitated progressive social
change by convincing the commissioners to fund Lavender Seniors.
As the end of Ariela’s essay makes clear, her two-year personal in-
volvement on the commission is more than just an impressive title; it is
a role that has helped her learn confidence and hone listening skills in
representing her community.14
lEad Ershi P
“Birthing a Business”
Jason Y. S hah
Harvard University
AT mY AGE, FEw pEopLE cAN genuinely claim that they have had
a life-changing experience. After attending Leadership in the Business
World (LBW) at the Wharton School last summer, I became one of
those fortunate people to have experienced a life-changing academic
program. Four weeks of meeting business executives, working with
teammates through the night perfecting our professional business plan,
experiencing the independence and responsibility that will come with
college . . . none of this was advertised in the brochure for LBW, but all
of this is what made it uniquely meaningful to me.
The business leadership program centered on one culminating ac-
tivity: the prestigious LBW Business Plan Competition. As we prepared
for this, we heard from Wharton faculty members and many corporate
heavyweights including Brian roberts, CEO of Comcast Corporation.
Meeting educators, executives and entrepreneurs broadened my
knowledge of business, created a strategic network of connections and
proved profoundly inspiring; nothing motivates me more than see-
129130
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
ing hard work and sharp thinking reach fruition. I vividly remember
when a managing director of a venture capital firm singled me out for
a networking demonstration. Expecting me merely to pretend to hand
him a fake business card, he was dumbfounded by impressed when he
glanced back as he accepted an actual business card from my tutoring
business. As my business card now rested in Mr. Kimmel’s rolodex
next to elegant cards from established businesspeople, a lesson was
ingrained in my mind about acting uniquely in order to distinguish
myself in a field of equally qualified and eager peers.
Despite the inherently competitive nature of LBW, I established
enduring friendships with students from far-reaching places, such as
Shanghai and Accra. We shared stories over meals in Houston Hall
about life at home and engaged in heated discussions about business
ethics. regardless of the origin of our passports, we became a family
while learning about each other’s cultures and future business aspira-
tions. The lessons of compassion and hard work from the business
plan competition also heightened my experience. Once when a fellow
marketing officer was struggling with determining channels of distribu-
tion for our product, I disregarded trying to seem individually superior,
and we cooperatively tackled the problem. Putting the team before the
individual was a concept that materialized itself during my experience.
The bonds between all of the students and advisors spurred my entre-
preneurial spirit as I experienced how friendship supports business.
I knew this experience had changed me forever when I triumphant-
ly concluded our team’s business presentation, confidently promoting
our product and connecting with a crowd of peers and venture capital-
ists. During the evening following the presentations, my fellow team-
mates and I beamed with boundless relief and pride when the vCs
announced our team, EnTECH LLC, as the first place winners of the
competition. Exploring and honing my business and entrepreneurial
skills was intimidating initially, yet with creativity, hard work and an
unparalleled group dynamic of cooperation, this experience cemented
my passion for business and opened grand doors of opportunity.131
Chapter 14: Leadership
AnAlysis
This essay of Jason’s helps us appreciate the “entrepreneurial
and philanthropic endeavors” that Jason refers to at the end of his
Common Application personal essay “Hurricane Transformations,”
(Chapter 15). This type of cross-referencing or linking can be an ex-
cellent strategy for presenting yourself as well rounded without try-
ing to cram too much information into a single essay. After reading
“Hurricane Transformations,” college admissions officers are likely to
be curious about what Jason’s projects as a community leader are;
and this essay is the perfect answer to that question.
While the first sentence of this essay, “At my age, few people
can genuinely claim that they have had a life-changing experience”
may sound slightly patronizing and condescending, it does succeed
in piquing our curiosity as readers and hints at Jason’s maturity and
confidence. It is important to think about the tone that the overall es-
say communicates. Jason conveys a confident tone in his writing by
telling us about the “uniquely meaningful” experience he had through
the LBW program, one he clearly fashioned for himself. This contrasts
to the more contemplative tone in “Hurricane Transformations.” Varying
the tone between essays is a method to show different sides of your
personality.
Jason gave a brief description of the highlights of LBW’s event-
packed four weeks (“meeting business executives, working with team-
mates through the night perfecting our professional business plan,
experiencing the independence and responsibility that will come with
college”) without reading like a brochure. Then he wisely chose to fo-
cus on the culminating activity. Indeed, Jason shares how he learned
the lesson to act “uniquely in order to distinguish [him]self in a field of
equally qualified and eager peers.” This sentence shows us that Jason
is willing to go above and beyond what is expected and to leave his
comfort zone in the process, yet also demonstrates consideration and
respect for his peers. The anecdote about meeting Mr. Kimmel is also
an artful way to let us know that Jason has started a tutoring business
for which he even has a business card, a testament to his thoughtful-
ness and professionalism.
This mix of pride and humility is particularly fitting in the team-
work that Jason describes: “we became a family,” “we cooperatively
tackled the problem.” Jason is probably interested in studying busi-
ness and entrepreneurship in college, and the story of EnTECH LLC’s
creation through dedicated hard work demonstrates his ability to be
both a leader and a team member, highly valued traits when working
on a business team. What is striking about Jason’s essay is that it lets
us in on the journey that created EnTECH; indeed, even if his team132
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
hadn’t won first place in the competition, we would still be impressed.
Jason’s story could have looked like “1 st place in LBW business com-
petition” and “works well on a team” in a resume; but the tone of the
essay helped the award/trait come alive and stick vividly in the reader’s
mind.
Jason Y. Shah is the founder of INeedAPencil.com, a free online SAT prepara-
tion program. The site has 60 lessons and two free practice tests.
“Beyond Dictionary Definitions of leadership”
Victoria Tomaka
University of Chicago
“All I know about leadership I learned from . . .” What items could a person
use to describe leadership qualities?
Inspired by the student council advisors at my high school.
STUdENT coUNcIL wAS A BIG pArT of my life in high school. I
have participated in it since my first year of high school. When I first
joined, I was quiet, naïve, and unwilling to participate in many activi-
ties. I was scared to meet new people and afraid to apply myself. This
all began to change. Half way through my first year in student council,
one of the advisors can up to me and asked why I did not participate
that much. I did not have an answer for her and did not know how to
respond. After this, I began to think of an answer. I became frustrated
and decided to change. I started to show up at events and had a great
time. I realized I loved this and wanted to start leading these activities.
In my sophomore, junior, and now my senior year of high school, I as-
serted myself and took on a strong leadership role in student council.
I did not figure out the answer to why I was so reserved until this year
with the help of this question.
When I looked up leadership in the dictionary, it said that it was the
capacity to lead and the act or instance of leading. These are two very
broad definitions of leadership. Many people have different notions of
what this word actually means. When I was challenged to use different
items to describe what leadership actually is, I thought this was going
to be a hard and obnoxious task. What could I learn from compar-
ing leadership to a stuffed animal or a rubber chicken? But when I satChapter 14: Leadership
133
down to come up with a couple of answers, I realized that leadership
could be compared to almost anything a person wants.
All I know about leadership I learned from a calculator. A calculator
can add everything together to come up with the best answer. It can
delete what is unnecessary and only include what is important. It can
solve any type of problem. These are all important equalities a leader
has to have. A leader has to be able to add all of the ideas together to
make the best possible plan. Leaders have to know how to decipher the
good and the bad out of an idea. They have to be versatile and know
how to deal with different types of issues.
All I know about leadership I learned from a ball. A ball is able to
bounce back up after it is dropped. It is round and has no creases. A
ball can be thrown back and forth to different people. All of these quali-
ties are also leadership qualities. A leader has to be ready for every situ-
ation that is thrown at him or her. He or she has to be able to bounce
back from any setbacks and never dwell on the past. Leaders have to
exhibit many qualities and never be closed-minded about a situation.
A leader must be able to delegate when he or she cannot get the work
done. They have to trust everyone they lead to be able to “catch the
ball” and keep a project rolling.
This activity made me realize that being a leader is so much more
than just having authority and having the ability to take control of a
situation. A leader has to be trusting of all the people he or she leads
and, leaders must be able to combine ideas into one encompassing
idea. They cannot sit in the background and watch events happen; they
have to jump in and be involved. They should not delegate all their
responsibilities away.
Leadership is more than what the dictionary says it is.
I learned through all of this that I have many of these qualities.
I have the ability to solve problems, lead through adversity, and be
versatile. From answering this question, I realized that I could lead ef-
fectively, even if my leadership style is different from other individuals.
When I joined student council in my first year of high school, I did
not have these qualities because I was never put into a situation where
I had to lead. I was too reserved to try. When I tried, I learned that I
could succeed in this. I did not realize until I answered this question
about leadership. I was never able to see that being a leader is not just
about taking control of a group and telling everyone what to do. When134
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
I was a freshman, I thought leadership was this. I did not know that I
did not have to be forceful and strict. I stereotyped a leader then. This
is where I went wrong. A leader is about being yourself and never let-
ting anyone change you. I thought I had to change to be a good leader.
Only when I expanded my comfort zone did I realize this was not true.
It only took three years and a silly question/game to figure this out.
AnAlysis
Vicky’s essay combines both playful metaphors and an honest ap-
praisal of her experiences in Student Council to demonstrate the evo-
lution of her thinking about leadership. Vicky begins by revealing some
of her weaknesses in Student Council: “I was quiet, naïve, and unwill-
ing to participate in many activities. I was scared to meet new people
and afraid to apply myself.” Vicky takes a similar tactic to Angelica in
“No Longer Invisible” (Chapter 7) by presenting an image of herself
before her transformative decision to take on “a strong leadership role
in student council.” This first paragraph could be strengthened by a
more detailed description of what Student Council is and what stu-
dents’ roles are. It’s best not to assume that admissions officers will
know about the groups and activities you reference in your essay, so
contextualizing clues are always helpful. Vicky could have explained
how many people were members of student council.
The most memorable part of Vicky’s essay is her act of looking up
leadership in the dictionary and not feeling satisfied with the definition
she found: “the capacity to lead and the act or instance of leading.”
This unclear definition, combined with a challenging question/game
to compare leadership to things like stuffed animals and rubber chick-
ens, compelled Vicky to discover that “leadership could be compared
to almost anything a person wants.” Another contextualizing clue that
could provide more clarity for this essay is to know the origin of this
game. Who assigned Vicky this “hard and obnoxious task”? One of the
key strengths in Vicky’s essay is her honesty about her thoughts and
emotions. You may be tempted to romanticize the truth in an admis-
sions essay, but writing honestly is not only ethical, it also allows your
authentic voice to shine through.
The third and four paragraphs provide creative comparisons be-
tween leadership and two unexpected objects: a calculator and a ball.
Vicky writes clearly how attributes of calculators and balls are also
qualities of effective leaders. Vicky does a good job of summarizing
the lessons she learned from this comparative exercise: “This activity
made me realize that being a leader is so much more than just hav-
ing authority and having the ability to take control of a situation . . .
Leadership is more than what the dictionary says it is.” In the finalChapter 14: Leadership
paragraph, Vicky relates the conversation about leadership qualities in
general to her own leadership duties. This is an effective way to dem-
onstrate her ability to apply abstract principles directly to her life and it
makes the essay feel relevant. It is important to keep in mind that these
essays are ultimately personal statements, not philosophical treatises.
It is always prudent to reveal enough about yourself that your essay
reader will know more about you—not just a philosophy or an idea—
after reading your essay. In Vicky’s case, we understand more about
her thoughts on leadership as well as her own responsible, but not
overly strict, leadership style.
13515
PErsonal Gr owth
“Beauty”
Anonymous
Yale University
pEopLE SAY ThAT INNEr BEAUTY mATTErS more than outer beau-
ty. But when I looked into the mirror and saw my face covered with
unsightly blemishes, it was hard to tell myself that and believe it. By
the time I entered high school, my acne had gotten worse, and my
self-esteem was at an all-time low. So in the summer of ninth grade, I
embarked on an unexpectedly difficult and emotionally trying quest
for clear skin, an experience that culminated in one of my proudest
achievements.
My typical daily diet consisted of sugary cereal for breakfast; salty
turkey sandwiches, soda, and chips for lunch; a candy bar for snack;
and rice and fried noodles for dinner. I never thought that my diet
would be a cause of my acne, but the possibility first came to me when
I was reading a skincare article. Desperate for a cure, I searched “clear
skin diet” on the Internet. The websites that turned up all echoed the
same message: a balanced and healthy diet is crucial for beautiful skin.
The recommended foods listed included large portions of fruits, veg-
137138
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
etables, grains, nuts, and fish; 8 glasses of water daily and only small
amounts of high-sodium, high-fat, and high-sugar foods. I researched
further and found out that the expensive chemical cleansers that I
had been using were not the answer—gentle face washes and a coat
of sunblock were inexpensive products that could reduce breakouts. I
knew that changing my entire diet and skincare routine would require
a tremendous amount of commitment and willpower. But determined
to improve my skin and my self-confidence, I began to transform my
lifestyle. I started by incorporating fruits and vegetables into my meals
and replacing sugary cereal with whole grains, chips with carrots, and
fried noodles with salmon. For a long, painful week, I stuck to this diet
and restrained myself from any junk food. My skin condition changed
gradually but substantially. By the end of the week, my skin was no-
ticeably smoother, clearer, and brighter. Yet I found myself relapsing,
unable to continue for long without indulging myself, unable to swal-
low the horribly plain salads and chewy carrots. Every time I stopped,
the acne came back. It came to the point where I despised the acne and
coveted the clear skin enough to force myself back on track. It became
an excruciating pattern of cravings and self-restraint. I struggled with
these two impulses until I became used to healthy eating, even enjoy-
ing it. now, two years later, my skin is better than ever and I have never
gone back to eating the way I had before.
I have no awards or medals to show for my particular achievement.
But no academic distinction in the world can match what I gained from
my experience with changing my diet: healthier skin, self-confidence,
and newfound mental strength. Above all, I realized that by improving
my outer appearance, I had enriched my inner appearance.
AnAlysis
“Beauty” provides an intimate portrayal of the author’s struggle
against acne. Most admissions essays tend to focus on resume-worthy
activities. As the author admits, “I have no awards or medals to show
for my particular achievement.” But this essay shows that accomplish-
ments in one’s personal life can also be just as successful as essays
focused on more prominent or recognizable activities. Other essays in
this book also use personal topics not obviously related to academics
or typical extracurriculars to give us a stronger sense of the author’s
personality, such as Alex’s “Box of Chocolates” (Chapter 9).Chapter 15: Personal Growth
This essay stands out for its candor about the author’s feelings of
low self-esteem when she saw the “unsightly blemishes” she faced
each time that she looked in the mirror. The exacting details of the
essay help show us the ups and downs in the author’s “unexpectedly
difficult and emotionally trying quest for clear skin.” After sharing the
results of her extensive research, the author concludes, “I knew that
changing my entire diet and skincare routine would require a tremen-
dous amount of commitment and willpower.” The essay then goes on to
show the waxing and waning of the strength of this commitment. Like
other essays that share about weaknesses and strengths, this account
humanizes the experience, allowing us as readers to relate to the pro-
cess. For instance, we can admire the author for her restraint during “a
long, painful week” of a completely different diet. Anyone who has ever
failed to keep a New Year’s Resolution or other lifestyle transforma-
tion vow can sympathize with the statement, “I found myself relapsing,
unable to continue for long without indulging myself.” The author’s un-
savory descriptions of “horribly plain salads and chewy carrots” add a
humorous touch of detail to the essay while also underscoring the dif-
ficulty the author experienced in changing her diet. Rather than pres-
ent an easy problem-solution setup, the author frankly shows us the
cyclical nature of this journey by sharing such statements as this one:
“It became an excruciating pattern of cravings and self-restraint.” This
essay shows that essays need not describe rapid changes and eureka
moments; stories about gradual transformations and processes with
many setbacks or retrogressions can also be quite compelling. In the
case of this author, she struggled with cravings and self-restraint until
she “became used to healthy eating, even enjoying it.”
The conclusion nicely sums up the key lessons found in this essay.
Besides the obvious benefit of healthy skin, the author also gained
“self-confidence, and newfound mental strength.” The reference to
the classic expression about inner and outer beauty helps introduce
and conclude the essay. This creates a nice wrapped-up effect. The
author’s changing attitudes towards the belief that “inner beauty mat-
ters more than outer beauty” shows her transformation. At first, she
doubted both her outer and inner beauty; but after her two years of
determined lifestyle modification, she found her inner life enriched by
her improved outer appearance.
139140
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
“Keeping up with the Beat of the Drum”
Shreyans C. Parekh
University of Pennsylvania
ThE hINdU God, BrAhmA, SEEING ThE plight of a society tainted
by envy and greed, presents a boy with a drum that he can only hear,
not see. This instrument, which is supposed to bring patience and dis-
cipline to humanity, is the foundation of Indian classical music. The
boy has yet to discover that musicians use this tool to speak, allow-
ing their minds to transmit messages through the vibrant pulsations of
their notes.
My guru told me this story when I began learning the tabla, a north
Indian classical drum. Though he never revealed the ending, he offered
one clue. “It doesn’t matter how fast your hands can beat the drum if
your mind cannot keep up with them.”
A typical American teenager, I had always yearned for raw strength
and speed on the tabla. I thought those were the qualities that made the
perfect percussionist. During concerts, I saw musicians’ fingers gliding
across the head of the drum producing the extraordinary impression of
force, immediacy of genius and intensity of passion that left audiences
spellbound. I knew that to become the best at tabla, I needed to display
my talent in a similar way. I wanted to play equally as fast and force-
fully, even if it meant sacrificing precision for power.
I asked my guru to train me to play like the maestros, but he said I
lacked mental focus; I didn’t listen to or enjoy my music. He believed
the mind and body must be in sync in order to master the instrument.
I never fully understood this concept until the imagination of one visu-
ally handicapped child attuned my mind to the beat of the drum.
As a summer volunteer at the Braille Institute in Anaheim, I devel-
oped the musical talents of blind elementary school children through
teaching the tabla. My friends and I bought instruments and music
with the money that we made during a summer recycling program in
our neighborhood. During our first class, the children jumped into ac-
tion, thumping erratically on their instruments. I chuckled at the sight
of nine jubilant youngsters producing musical mayhem.
Chaandni was different. Shy and reserved, she felt the drum’s
smooth texture and stroked the soft middle portion of the drum head.
I stood astonished as she performed her ritual. Tap. Listen. Smile. Tap.141
Chapter 15: Personal Growth
Listen. Smile. I could see her contemplating the emerging rhythm and
resonance of each successive pulse. Watching a budding musician feel
the delicate timbre of each drumbeat is a thrilling sensation.
I learned more from observing than I did through years of erratic
practice. Chaandni would eagerly listen to a musical piece, then strike
incessantly until she produced a matching pitch. When she stumbled,
she would sit patiently pinpointing her mistake. She didn’t speak; her
insight and emotion glowed through her music. For the first time in
my life I felt the depth of the drums. For the first time, I truly compre-
hended and loved the instrument.
She was indeed a special soul. Her curiosity was insatiable; her re-
gard for the drum was incomparable; her smile was inspiring. Her joy-
ful progress inspired me to perform in London this summer with my
guru. Driven by the spirit of a young girl who never let her disability
impede her innate talent, I played gracefully in front of hundreds of
spectators and cherished the inner triumph.
I am a living example of Brahma’s story. The combination of grace
and force on the tabla is my channel for communicating emotions. My
tale ends with the appreciation that the mind is a beautiful vehicle for
the drum.
AnAlysis
Using the drum story as an introduction, the writer draws in his
reader. Shreyans provides just enough detail to pique our curiosity as
we strive to understand the message; yet the plot is simple enough
that the story doesn’t overwhelm us. Many students make the mistake
of focusing too much on a related story and not enough on the main
purpose of the essay. Shreyans has just the right balance, ensnaring
the interest of the reader right from the beginning and then moving
quickly to the main body of the essay.
In the next three paragraphs, Shreyans sets up the main conflict
in the essay. The clever quote from his guru, “It doesn’t matter how
fast your hands can beat the drum if your mind cannot keep up with
them,” foreshadows the importance of thought as a part of musician-
ship. Shreyans explains that at first, he wanted to just play the tabla
with as much force as possible, without regard to the contemplation
that should empower the performance. By introducing us to the begin-
ning point of his process, he is able to set up the rest of the essay to
show us his growth.142
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
The visual description of those playing the tabla in concert is very
powerful and helps us understand the instrument better even if we
aren’t quite sure what it looks like or how it sounds. We can almost see
the performers’ fingers “gliding” and the “spellbound” audience mem-
bers. Details like these bring the essay to life and help the admissions
officers relate to the story being told.
Using the purchase of instruments to transition from the musical
part of the essay to the volunteer work at the Braille Institute provides
a nice connection between the stories. This is a great way to work in
how he and his friend raised funds to buy the instruments and then
took the initiative to volunteer at the institute. Again, the details that
he provides about Chaandni help us to see what he sees. We can
visualize her tapping, listening and smiling. We can feel his thrill from
watching her.
Through his observations of Chaandni and her contemplative
playing of the tabla, Shreyans demonstrates that he has undergone a
transformation. We can see that he is now ready both physically and
intellectually to perform. The conclusion has a meaningful tie to the
introductory story.
When you write an essay about an activity, it’s more powerful to
describe the thinking that goes into the event rather than just the ac-
tivity itself. This will allow the admissions officers to understand why
you have committed yourself to the activity and what you gain from it.
The essay that Shreyans wrote wouldn’t have been nearly as effective
had he just described his playing. What makes it compelling is that he
tells a story through his learning to play the instrument and that he
describes the mental aspect of playing. He also demonstrates how he
evolved in his attitude toward playing the tabla.
Shreyans C. Parekh is an MBA student at The Wharton School of the University
of Pennsylvania. He is the vice president of Koyal Wholesale, an online whole-
sale discount supplier of wedding, party, and event supplies (www.koyal.com).
He can be reached at shreyans.c.parekh@gmail.com.
“Hurricane Transformations”
Jason Y. S hah
Harvard University
I USEd To SpENd ENdLESS NIGhTS wide-eyed, anxiously dread-
ing a high school life teeming with harsh peers and hollow hallways,
immersed in a cold atmosphere eternally void of familiarity’s warm
embrace. I’ll admit that this is not a hopeful vision; nevertheless, I cer-Chapter 15: Personal Growth
143
tainly risked accepting this ugly reality when I supported my family’s
decision to uproot itself and move from new Jersey to Florida after my
freshman year.
Somewhat flexible, my parents gave me a significant voice in the
decision as I would be most profoundly affected. Yet, I had spent my
entire life in the same cozy center-hall colonial in the same new Jersey
suburb. I had known my friends since youth, when we had snowball
fights during the icy winter and ran through lawn sprinklers during
the summer. Teachers knew my family and cordially greeted me in the
halls. I could never move. In my mind, I was set!
Or was I? Instinct tugged at my heart, something was missing in
my life because life is not about being “set.” Lured by the concept of a
fresh start, I yearned for the chance to write my own story. As the son of
Indian immigrants, I had adventure in my blood; the time had come to
venture beyond my comfort zone and stake a unique claim in Florida.
The first few months were trying; only birds joined me during lunch
and I spend weekends alone writing introspective poetry. My fifteenth
birthday centered on a family discussion about our affection for our
new home while Hurricane Charley pounded the life out of Florida.
I regretted moving. By fortuitous research, however, I learned more
about innovative entrepreneurs who were shaping our world. I have
not looked back since.
My self-inflicted adversity finally evoked personal growth. I con-
stantly introduced myself to strangers and pursued my passions in
different activities. By launching and supporting community organiza-
tions, I transformed into a proactive leader as I overcame difficulties
in varied contexts. Continuously seeking challenges in the community
and IB Program, I teamed up with other motivated citizens and stu-
dents to thrive and contribute to my new home.
Today I am highly involved in my community with many friends
and mentors. nobody knows me for my family or childhood, just for
who I am today. The results of my own decisions and actions mean
much more than what has been bestowed upon me. I would risk it
all again because I know that I can only enjoy what I have earned.
Breaking away from the risk-averse crowd that holds an exaggerated
fear for what can be lost has been refreshing. I have gained trust in my-
self to defy odds because I never would have dreamt of the happiness
and accomplishments that I have been honored to achieve in Florida.144
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
College will certainly thrust a fiercer Hurricane Charley at me, but I
will stare it straight in the eye and exceed expectations, eventually leav-
ing an enduring legacy for the world through my entrepreneurial and
philanthropic endeavors.
AnAlysis
Jason’s essay provides a powerful story of self-transformation
from an introverted person to a community leader. The metaphor of the
hurricane—a catastrophic event that requires rebuilding afterwards—
makes this essay memorable, as we see how hurricanes related both
literally and metaphorically to Jason’s life. The hurricane provides a
vivid image that reminds us of the force of the challenges Jason faced,
both in witnessing Hurricane Charley and also in shouldering the “self-
inflicted adversity” of moving to Florida.
Self-transformation is an ambitious topic to write a single essay
on—after all, this is often the topic of entire biographies. Jason does
a good job of reigning in the vastness of this topic by providing spe-
cific details and identifying concrete events. For example, he paints
the image of a “cozy center-hall colonial” and shows us the “snowball
fights” and “lawn sprinklers” of his youth. Descriptions like these create
an evocative sense of the comfort and familiarity of Jason’s suburban
New Jersey home. This is much more memorable than simply stat-
ing that he has an emotional attachment to New Jersey. The contrast
between the cheerful scene in New Jersey and the “hollow hallways”
Jason imagines in his new school help us appreciate how challenging
the prospect of moving was to Jason.
In the third paragraph, Jason reveals an adventurous and risk-tak-
ing part of his personality that he connects to his heritage as the son
of Indian immigrants. As the narrative unfolds, Jason shows us how his
decision to move is hardly easy at first, but that his willingness to con-
front a challenge in order to generate personal growth demonstrates
courage and a commitment to learning. “I yearned for the chance to
write my own story,” writes Jason, who goes on to demonstrate how
he steps into that bold dream. “By fortuitous research,” he continues,
“. . . I learned more about innovative entrepreneurs who were shaping
our world. I have not looked back since.” Jason may have chosen to
elaborate more on what the nature of the “fortuitous research” was and
who some of these “innovative entrepreneurs” were, especially since
he refers back to entrepreneurship and philanthropy at the end of his
essay. While descriptions are helpful to set the context and scene, it is
important to spend time elaborating in pivotal moments, since these
are so critical to a narrative essay.Chapter 15: Personal Growth
145
In his last paragraph, Jason reflects on what he has learned.
Particularly relevant for a college admissions essay, he anticipates
even fiercer challenges in college, but makes it clear that he is willing
to embrace these. As readers, we are impressed by his willingness to
rise up to meet challenges, while also appreciative of the vulnerabili-
ties Jason has shared by telling us his fears before moving to Florida
and his lonely lunches before he began to transform into a proactive
leader.
“The House on Wellington Avenue”
Jackie Liao
Stanford University
A ThIN ShArd oF SUNLIGhT SLIcEd through the vent of the win-
dowless, cold, and cramped one bedroom basement apartment. The
apartment stood three stories high with its weight suffocating the base-
ment. I sat on the stained carpet, alone, playing with my one and only
prized Hot Wheels car. My mother was working her ten-hour shift as a
minimum wage waitress and my father was nowhere to be found. My
father left our family when I turned three-years old. He also left the
burden of his reckless gambling debt to my mother and left us to fend
for ourselves. At the time, my mother barely spoke any English, yet she
had to find work in order to support us. She became occupied with
work, so I was frequently isolated at home. The house on Wellington
Avenue in Daly City evolved to represent all the suppression my moth-
er and I endured. As a child, wherever I could go to be away from the
cell, I went.
A few days after my eleventh birthday, I trudged home on an af-
ternoon to discover our house robbed again, this time of my mother’s
savings for the following month’s rent and my new “Stingray 5000”
water gun. I burst into tears and cried in my mother’s fragile arms. It
was that moment I vowed to do something about our situation. I was
tired living in that horrid house, being deprived of my mother because
of her demanding work schedule, and feeling like the whole world was
constantly against us. Early in my childhood, I realized that our family
was financially poor, because of that, I wanted to be rich in knowledge.
Every day after school, I would take the transit to the Daly City Public
Library where I could be away from the miserable house and focus on146
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
my studies. It was there that I would max out my library card to read
Harry Potter novels and sit at the wide tables with my head in textbooks
and magazines, searching for a better life. My mother knew the anger
I had for the house, as a result, she would indirectly encourage me to
channel out my negative feelings for the house into positive ones for
learning by dropping by the library after work with apple juice for me.
My appreciation for my mother is great because she still managed to set
time aside from her work to attend to my needs. My objective was to
gain all the knowledge I could, in hope of devising a plan to get us out
of the Wellington Black Hole. At one point, I spent a whole Saturday
looking for some sort of mathematical equation that would cure our
blight. Enriching my knowledge was my naïve way of trying to improve
and control our bleak situation. Fortunately, my mother’s relentless ef-
fort for work allowed us to move to a better part of Daly City.
When I finally got my driver’s license at the age of sixteen, after a
vigorous curriculum of driver’s education, driving lessons, and a driv-
ing test, the first place I drove my mother’s old Toyota Camry was to
the house on Wellington Avenue. The freedom of driving allowed me to
explore a place where I had been trapped in for so long. Crouched on
the warm cement, I glanced pass the faded wooden walls and peered
through the constricting vent to see the three year old that once sat on
the cold floor. As I stood with the sun shining on my back, I acknowl-
edged that my mother and I were given a situation that we did not
choose, but we ultimately became the ones who changed the course of
our lives. A photo of the Wellington house sits on my bedroom window
edge, casting a small shadow when sun light beams in. It serves as a
painful reminder of my background, and an inspiration to continue
excelling in life, even when unfavorable conditions dominate.
AnAlysis
Jackie’s essay is similar to Sarah’s “Unshakable Worth,” (Chapter
7) and Timothy’s “Self Mind,” (Chapter 7) in that it takes a family diffi-
culty—growing up in poverty with an absentee father—and transforms
it into a story of growth and personal strength. The beginning of the
essay conveys an oppressive and stifling mood with its description
of “The House on Wellington Avenue,” a title that in itself alludes to
the rich themes of immigration, coming of age, and poverty present in
Sandra Cisneros’ famous The House on Mango Street. Jackie’s details
are vivid and carefully chosen to evoke a sense of loneliness: the “thinChapter 15: Personal Growth
shard of sunlight,” the “windowless, cold, and cramped” room, the “suf-
focating” basement, the “stained carpet,” her single toy as she is home
alone. The comparison of this room to a “cell,” as in a prison cell, is
the pinnacle of this austere representation of her childhood life. Jackie
continues this sense of darkness when she later describes the apart-
ment as the “Wellington Black Hole.” These differing but consistent de-
scriptions bolster our understanding of Jackie’s feelings towards her
childhood home.
However, Jackie doesn’t spend the rest of her essay complaining
about this dire situation. Instead, in the second paragraph, we learn
about a moment where she makes a vow to improve her situation after
being robbed. Her mom’s “fragile arms” contrasted with Jackie’s deter-
mination make such a vow all the more impressive when the reader
realizes that it is an 11-year-old child who decides to become “rich in
knowledge” as an antidote to her family’s poverty.
In describing this quest for knowledge, Jackie demonstrates a
gift for choosing small but evocative details: Harry Potter, the apple
juice her mother brought her, a day spent “looking for some sort of
mathematical equation to cure [her family’s] blight.” Jackie writes,
“Fortunately, my mother’s relentless effort for work allowed us to move
to a better part of Daly City,” but she might also have given herself
more credit for supporting her mother.
The final paragraph strikes a balance between the victory of hav-
ing moved away from Wellington Avenue and the emotional scars that
remain in Jackie’s mind. Again, her keen eye for description evokes a
haunting, nostalgic mood when she writes, “Crouched on the warm
cement, I glanced past the faded wooden walls and peered through
the constricting vent to see the three year old that once sat on the
cold floor.” The sentence alludes to Jackie’s indomitable spirit, one
that will undoubtedly serve her well when she faces new challenges
in college.
14716
talEnt
“A Dramatic Coup”
Fareez Giga
Stanford University
I SAT ThErE, STUNNEd For AN instant, and then jumped as high as
I could and screamed as loud as my voice would allow. Blood rushed
through my entire body, while the butterflies in my stomach finally
flew away. I had just received my LAMDA Diploma with Honors, a task
that has only been done by one person before me. LAMDA, the London
Academy of Music and Dramatic Arts, comes to my high school, as
well as others in the states, and gives what are essentially acting ex-
ams. In these exams, you must perform a series of monologues, and to
receive the Diploma you must perform four five-minute monologues,
one pre-1910, one post-1980, one Shakespearean, and one of your
choice. I had worked for weeks on my monologues, perfecting them as
much as I could, staying after school, working at lunch, even at home,
despite the shouting by my sister for me to stop. When it came time
to perform, I was incredibly nervous; however, after I came out of my
performance, I lingered outside the theater, waiting upon my results,
and when they came, I was astounded. not only was I able to pass my
149150
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
exam, but also I came out of it with greater knowledge of theater than
I had when I started. I learned a great deal from taking these various
exams, most notably the age old lesson that hard work does pay off.
The personal splendor I felt was one that I had never felt before, and I
live to feel it again.
AnAlysis
Fareez shares a meaningful accomplishment in a small space.
He effectively explains the significance of the LAMDA Diploma with
Honors—an award that only one other person had received before
him—and portrays a sense of jubilation which reveals to the reader
his excitement. Fareez then describes how much work went into pre-
paring the four monologues, each from different time periods. Plus he
adds detail on how much he worked to perfect them, even humorously
revealing that his sister begged him to stop. He concludes with the
greater meaning that he learned from the experience, that hard work
pays off.
In this limited part of the application, Fareez accomplishes a lot
and touches on all the elements that highlight the achievement as well
as positive aspects of his personality. It’s important to remember that
admissions officers will not know the significance of most awards un-
less you tell them. Describe how few people receive the award or how
selective the competition is. Briefly explain the amount of work that
was involved or how difficult it was to prepare. Then, put the award
into perspective. What did you learn from winning? How can you apply
what you learned to your future endeavors? Why was winning impor-
tant to you? If you write about receiving an award, it’s important to do
more than just state that you did. You should also give context to the
honor.
“Music as My second language”
Jean Gan
Duke University
mUSIc hAS ShApEd mY pErSoNAL ANd intellectual life in many
ways. Music is a common language that connects me to others who
share my enthusiasm for creating it. Furthermore, I learn about my
own preferences and personality through the pieces that intrigue me.
As I expose myself to a wider array of styles and eras, my musical tastes151
Chapter 16: Talent
grow more complex. Through music, I welcome opportunities to ex-
pand my friendships as well as my instrumental horizons.
I began studying piano at age six. For the next five years, my mother
lived vicariously through my musical education, which her family had
not been able to afford. In fifth grade, as I was becoming an earnest
piano student, I was selected to commence violin lessons and play in
my elementary school orchestra. From that day on, I saw life from a
violinist’s point of view.
Although I am a seasoned pianist, an ambitious solo violinist, and a
fledgling cellist, I am, above all, a passionate chamber musician. My ex-
perience in a chamber quartet has had a strong impact on my character.
When I was the second violinist, I simply enjoyed making music with
my friends. Only after I became the first violinist did I feel the responsi-
bility of leadership settling uncomfortably on my shoulders. However,
the burden soon became a part of me and transformed into enthusiasm.
now, as the quartet leader, I use the small group setting to channel each
of our individual creative instincts. Each member of the quartet shares
her musical interests, bringing favorite repertoire to the table, so that
we each participate in the learning and playing experience. The quar-
tet is also an outlet for my musical fancy. Ever since I discovered the
Finale music writing software, I have delighted in arranging works for
our quartet to play and perform. This year, my goal is to arrange and
perform the Ferrante and Teicher version of the love theme from The
Godfather for a piano duet and orchestra.
As my aspirations grow, I aim to arrange music for a greater vari-
ety of instruments and to explore jazz, pop, and other styles of music
on the piano. I desire to join others with similar talent and passion at
Duke. However, before I leave my high school, I hope my appreciation
for music will leave a mark on my community.
AnAlysis
In “Music as My Second Language,” Jean writes about how “music
is a common language that connects [her] to others who share [her]
enthusiasm for creating it.” Jean packs a lot of information into a short
essay while keeping the topic tightly focused. The language metaphor
helps tie this essay together: Jean’s assertion that “musical tastes
grow more complex” parallels the growth of someone learning new
vocabulary when studying a foreign language. And just as learning a152
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
language expands ones possibilities for connecting with people, so too
does Jean note that music helps her connect with others and expand
her friendships.
In relating her childhood history of exploring “instrumental hori-
zons,” Jean not only tells about her lessons in piano and violin but
also draws in the history of her parents, who were not able to afford
a musical education. Jean demonstrates a nice balance between her
personal history and the story of those who shaped this history—in
this case, her parents. When writing about past events, focusing solely
on oneself can create a distorted sense of self-as-center-of-the-uni-
verse. Of course, it is appropriate to focus mainly on oneself—these
are, after all, personal statements—but it can be useful to describe the
people around you in setting the stage for telling your story. This not
only helps readers contextualize your situation but also shows your
ability to connect your own experience to the experiences of people
with whom you interact.
This short essay connects to Jean’s longer essay, “Anything Goes”
(Chapter 10) in continuing the theme of expanding horizons and build-
ing upon her current knowledge. In both essays, Jean does an excel-
lent job of balancing descriptions of her personal drive and motivation
with illustrations of her ability to work collaboratively. For example, in
this essay, we see that though she is “a seasoned pianist, an ambitious
solo violinist, and a fledgling cellist,” Jean is “above all, a passionate
chamber musician.” Throughout the panoply of her musical experienc-
es, Jean wisely chooses to hone in on her experience as the leader
of her chamber quartet. She demonstrates her egalitarian leadership
style when she notes, “I use the small group setting to channel each
of our individual creative instincts.” Her passion for acquiring new skills
can be seen by her discovery of Finale music writing software. Jean’s
creativity and motivation can be defined in her very goals, for example,
her desire “to arrange and perform the Ferrante and Teicher version
of the love theme from The Godfather for a piano duet and orchestra.”
Writing about these future aspirations gives Jean an excellent seg-
ue into discussing why she hopes to join Duke’s musical community.
Here, Jean might have chosen to write a little more about “why Duke”
specifically. When writing reasons you want to attend a college, it is
important to do research on the school and to write in a way that the
college name is not interchangeable with that of any other university.
Jean could have made her ending even stronger, had she mentioned
a specific group at Duke so that this essay would have been noticeably
specific to that university.Chapter 16: Talent
153
“My Bedroom”
Fareez Giga
Stanford University
I rAN AroUNd NErVoUSLY, YELLING AT my parents to wait down-
stairs; I did not want them to see anything that was going on. I rushed
as fast as I could to make my bed, something most teenagers do not
usually do. I made sure everything was in proper order as I called my
parents up to my room. As I placed the last pillow on the bed, I ac-
quired a sense of completion and achievement. I had done it; I de-
signed and redecorated my bedroom. It was at this point when I, in my
heart, became an interior designer.
This picture represents more than just a bedroom to me; it is my
first step on a path that I hope directs me to fulfillment. Designing
my bedroom allowed me to explore the creative aspect of my life, and
I was, and still am, able to appreciate the amount of creative talent I
possess. It has become an intense passion in my life and I value this a
great deal. This process illustrated the creative potential that I possess
within myself, and I know that I can apply this promise in any aspect
of my life.
One of the greatest features of this project I took on is that I was able
to see the results of my actions immediately. It was a hands-on experi-
ence that I enjoyed to its fullest, and I was exultant with the outcome.
Overall, this project was a great success in my eyes, and even in the
eyes of my family and friends who are amazed at my capabilities with
design. However, as the designer, I do get frustrated with infinitesi-
mal flaws. On the wall to the left of my bed there are two shelves and
framed artwork that I created myself. In the process of the installation, I
centered these shelves and artwork on the wall; however, the palm tree
that I placed in the corner covers up one of the frames. I now know that
it probably would have been better if I moved the shelves and artwork
to the left of the wall. The importance of this is not the flaw itself, but in
the fact that I learned from what I had done and know how to improve
myself the next time. Overall, I feel the room came out beautifully and
it symbolizes my first true triumph with design.
Though this project meant a great deal to me emblematically, I
also just had fun with it. Utilizing my imagination, and figuring out
how I was going to make things work within the room was simply154
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
enjoyable. not only was the design process pleasurable, but also the
actual painting, nailing, and organizing itself was satisfying. I was also
able to bond with my father through the project. He joined me in my
most successful achievement of the room—the design and creation of
the headboard. This venture and this picture epitomize my success. I
consider my bedroom to be an elegant, contemporary work of art, and
this picture embodies all the work I put into my design as well as the
sense of achievement I received after its completion.
AnAlysis
Fareez’s introduction creates mystery in the very first of his sen-
tences that draws the reader in. We want answers. Why is he making
the bed? Why is he in such a rush? What is he hiding from his parents?
We want to find out what engages him in such totality.
In the second paragraph, Fareez explains the point of the es-
say—his creativity. This paragraph is a little general, and it could have
been strengthened with the use of details. He might have shared more
about the roots of his creativity, how he discovered and developed his
talent, or how he hopes to use his inventive nature and unique ideas in
the future. Still, we learn about a meaningful talent that he has, and we
can tell that he is incredibly passionate about having a creative outlet.
In the third paragraph, Fareez shares a specific example of how
he gets frustrated by a small defect. By describing how the palm tree
covers one of the pictures, he gives us a visual image and shows how
meticulous he is with his work. He keeps the tone positive by explain-
ing how he will use this as a lesson “the next time.” It is always best to
use a specific example rather than general terms.
In the last paragraph, Fareez illustrates the strong connection he
has with his father and how he enjoyed the physical work that went
into the project. This gives an additional dimension to Fareez’s work
by pointing out his ability to work with another person as well as his
obvious enjoyment in actually implementing his designs in a hands-on
way.
The strength of Fareez’s essay is that it presents an aspect of his
personality that is not easily shown in the rest of the application. There
is no place on the application to detail that he is creative, and he did
not receive any honors or awards for this project. His essay shows that
you can write about a topic that is not connected to an official activity,
award, or honor. Sharing something that you’ve done on your personal
time can give the admissions officers a glimpse into who you are.Chapter 16: Talent
155
“A special Performance”
Anonymous
Harvard University
I STood BEhINd ThE cUrTAINS LISTENING to the applause to the
previous act. I exhaled, realizing that this was a moment that fulfilled
my childhood wish. Tonight was special because instead of an alto aria
or a jazz lick, I had prepared a song unique to my identity. I curled my
fingers around the microphone and waited impatiently as the curtains
opened.
My love for performance stemmed from my appreciation of music
as a child. In the city in China where I spent the first ten years of my
life, I never found a choir to join and never laid eyes on a grand piano.
nonetheless, I treasured my passion for song and sought ways to bring
music into my life. I sang with our old record player when I was barely
tall enough to reach it. On certain afternoons, my best friend and I
would tape bed sheets to the ceiling as curtains and invite neighbors to
come listen. There, we sang in duet, danced, and bowed while clasping
each other’s hands. Captured in our own musical sanctuary, we never
noticed the hours that passed by.
Music evokes in me the emotions that words and pictures cannot.
I also revel in the intellectual challenges that music offers. I find it
thrilling to tackle difficult, delicious repertoire, and I enjoy composing
my own melodies. Through music, I can share and celebrate my past.
When I was asked to share my cultural talents at my high school, I
looked for a song that my mother sang when I was young, but I could
not find the sheet music. A week before tonight, I sat down by the old
piano in the practice room at school. With only the old tune ringing
faintly in my mind, my hands soon took a life of their own and experi-
mented with chords, arpeggios, and trills. I superimposed these on the
original melody and composed variations. My voice, too, frolicked with
the piano as I sang the tune repeatedly. I was lost in another musical
paradise. I felt like a child again, tucked under the covers, listening to
my mother’s song as I drifted away to dreams.
now, dressed in an old Chinese dress that my mother had worn
in her youth, I stepped onto the empty stage illuminated by pale blue
light. I held the microphone up to my lips and smiled before starting.
Then, I brought to life the beautiful ballad that had brightened my156
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
childhood in China. My mind overflowed with warm memories of that
faraway city as I lulled the audience with my melody. When I caught
my mother’s face in the audience, I knew she nestled in the same air of
nostalgia.
Music allows me to present my native culture and contribute to the
diversity in my community. It has stimulated my mind and provided an
outlet for my creativity. To me, nothing is more pleasurable than being
imaginative. Carrying my childhood love of music through my teenage
years has been a gratifying experience, and I look forward to continu-
ing in my undergraduate years.
AnAlysis
The beauty of this student’s essay is that she opens herself up
to us, the readers. She starts with a catchy opening, explaining in
rich detail how she is standing behind the curtain and why the night
is especially meaningful to her. We can feel what she feels as she
stands there. She gives a detailed visual description and explains her
thoughts as well.
The author then explains the roots of her interest in music. By shar-
ing her childhood experience, she demonstrates how this has been a
lifelong passion for her. We can imagine her as a child with her friend,
putting on performances for the neighbors. Knowing how an author’s
interest in a given field of study began can add depth and dimension
to the reader’s overall characterization of the student.
In the third paragraph, our musician shares what goes through her
mind. This is valuable to admissions officers because they can see her
ability to analyze her thoughts and her level of self awareness. Self
reflection demonstrates maturity and the capability to take a step back
from a situation and see the deeper meaning of it. She explains why
she is so tied to music and why it is an intellectual experience for her to
recall her childhood song from memory and slowly piece it together.
Through her essay, we understand why this specific performance
holds such great meaning. We see the connection to her past and
to her mother. She makes several accomplishments through her writ-
ing—sharing an extracurricular interest, touching on her childhood
growing up in China, revealing the intellectual side of her talent, and
showing the connection that she has to her heritage and her family.
After reading this essay, the admissions officers probably felt that they
had a deeper understanding of who this student was and that she was
someone they’d like to get to know better.17
trav El
“Extra Page”
Lauren Horton
Stanford University
YoU’VE GIVEN mE oNE morE pAGE to tell you about myself. Just
one. There are only eight boxes for extra-curricular activities, only three
lines to tell about my summers, just over two inches to write a note to
my future roommate, and only one page to fill in all the holes, to color
in all the blank space. Unfortunately both for me and for you, entire
lives don’t fit into boxes and personalities can’t be completely sketched
on paper. I have to do my best to show you who I am, and you have to
do your best to find me in all this black ink. So, best of luck to you. As
for me, I will write just one more page and hope it gives you a clearer
image of who I really am.
You have noticed, I’m sure, my list of extra-curricular activities.
What you can’t see is the struggle that went into compiling that list.
For one thing, my practice list was comprised of far more than eight
activities, so I was forced to group things together and to leave things
out. Every summer and winter, I travel with my youth group on a ser-
vice trip, sometimes within this country, other times around the world.
157158
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
The summer before my freshman year and again two years later, we
spent two weeks in Costa rica, living with families there and working
both helping build a renovation on a church there and playing with
children in a refugee settlement called Pavas. The year in between, we
ran a day camp for underprivileged children in San Antonio, Texas, and
the summer before my junior year, we did various kinds of service in
Columbus, Ohio. For our winter trips, we have done urban outreach
in new York City and in Miami, trying to use those experiences to help
our downtown church improve its outreach ministries. My service ex-
perience with church goes beyond these trips twice a year, though. I
spend several evenings each year volunteering in the homeless shelter
in my church’s gym both with youth group and with my family. We also
go as a family each year early on Christmas morning to serve breakfast
at the shelter and celebrate the holiday with the guests. These are pieces
of the categories I call “Central Presbyterian Church youth group” and
“Community Service” that I didn’t have space for in the box, but that
mean a lot to me and play huge roles in my life.
Another experience that I haven’t found a space for is the Maine
Coast Semester, the four months I spent on Chewonki neck in Maine
during the fall of my junior year. Although my essay provides one snap-
shot of the experience, it cannot possibly speak to everything the se-
mester meant to me. Moving out of my family’s house and into a cabin
with six girls my own age was extremely exciting for me, and what
I found when I got there was even better than what I had expected.
It was a place I could relate to. In science class, we would learn to
identify the trees and wildlife that were living just outside our cabins.
In the afternoon, working on the farm, we would lovingly tend the
animals and plants that we would then harvest, prepare in the kitchen,
and eat. Each of us realized our connection to every other member
of the Chewonki community and to the land itself, and learned to be
responsible with that connection. When I was assigned to collect re-
cyclables before breakfast for my morning chore, I showed up just as
promptly and with just as much energy as when my chore was to milk
the cows or to clean the bathrooms. Similarly, when a teacher asked me
to read an assignment for homework, I got it done, not simply because
I wanted to keep a good grade, but because the entire class depended
on each person’s individual preparation in order to have rich, meaning-
ful discussion.159
Chapter 17: Travel
Coming home, I realized that here, too, I was connected to my com-
munity. Although it is larger than the one in Maine, I still have the same
responsibility to those around me, and will have that responsibility to
whatever community I am part of for the rest of my life. In my daily life,
just like on my service trips, I try to look for chances to benefit some-
thing greater than myself. In college, I look forward to becoming part
of a new community, and figuring out how to find my niche, so that I
can serve that community as well as be served by it.
AnAlysis
Lauren makes perfect use of the extra page offered on the Stanford
application by addressing topics that weren’t fully fleshed out else-
where. The first paragraph is a little risky because there is such limited
space and often it doesn’t work to write about something not related to
the main topic of the essay. For many students, a seemingly unrelated
topic can become a tangent that doesn’t add much and that consumes
valuable real estate. However, because Lauren is a skilled writer, she
pulls it off, and she demonstrates her personality through the introduc-
tion. She uses creative phrasing such as, “Entire lives don’t fit into
boxes and personalities can’t be completely sketched on paper.” She
also demonstrates her sense of humor writing, “So, best of luck to you.”
The humor isn’t over the top but comes across as a friendly, slightly
irreverent challenge.
As Lauren progresses into describing her activities, she smartly
focuses on those that she was not able to fully explain elsewhere in
the application. In her synopsis of the Central Presbyterian Church
youth group, she writes about specific contributions she made with the
homeless shelter. It always helps to give examples with details of de-
fined individual contributions. This fills out her experiences and gives
context to what she’s done. Another approach might have been to pro-
vide greater detail about one specific activity rather than list the many
community service projects that she worked on through the church.
When writing about living on Chewonki Neck in Maine, Lauren de-
scribes not just what she did, but the greater knowledge she gained
from the experience. As the reader, you can easily detect her genuine
interest in learning and you can almost feel her excitement in studying
the wildlife and trees outside their cabins or growing her own food. This
authentic passion for learning is one that admissions officers admire
and want to see in students who are admitted, and the way that Lauren
presents this seems natural and not forced.
Finally, Lauren draws a connection between her experience with the
church and the Chewonki community by explaining how one allowed160
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
her to serve the community and the other allowed her to form a bond
with it. She then applies this connection to her future plans. This is an
effective way to conclude the essay because Lauren illustrates her
ability to analyze her accomplishments and further explains how she
will apply what she’s learned to future opportunities.
“looking Beyond the Castle”
Brian Aguado
Stanford University
One of Stanford’s essay prompts is to provide a photo and explain its
significance.
I oNcE BELoNGEd To roYALTY, STroLLING along the lush pastures
of grass and enormous spires of renaissance structure. Unfortunately,
I was not given a crown on my voyage, even though I felt the crown
when visiting the grand castle in Spain. The picture shown is important
to me not only because of the spectacular view, but it also represents
my passions for the study of Spain’s cul-
tural history and literature as well as how
those subjects offer clues to discovering
my individuality.
Traveling to Spain gave me the
chance of a lifetime to explore its his-
tory with respect to my personality. In
the photograph, the castle in the back-
ground once belonged to the great royal
unifiers of Spain named Ferdinand and
Isabella. With their process of uni-
fication came the exploration of the
Americas. Explorers such as Christopher
Columbus established Spanish territories in the new World, such as
Colombia, which is the country my parents are from, and I was born.
From this chain of causality, Spain’s history essentially created my ex-
istence. Pondering about my historical background from Spain, per-
haps I would have never been born if the king and queen never uni-
fied Spain. I could be speaking Arabic if the expulsion of the Moors
never occurred under the hands of the Spanish monarchs. Curiously,Chapter 17: Travel
161
I could have been born as an Indian native, because the new World
would have never been explored. Perhaps, I wouldn’t be looking at
the same photo, explaining its significance! Frankly, exploring Spain’s
history has enabled me to discover my origins. When viewing the
picture through my point of view, I see myself returning the roots of
my creation.
Spain also offers a vibrant history of literary works and significant
innovations in Hispanic literature. Similar to the exploration of history
leading to a clue for learning about myself, I have the ability to explore
the literature the Hispanic culture has to offer. Knowing two languag-
es allows me to discover the essence of ideas authors such as gabriel
garcía Márquez, Jorge Luis Borges, and Cervantes wanted to convey
to their audience. Since language is to a code for ideas, I can decipher
two different kinds of codes, English and Spanish, to understand the
author’s emotions placed into his or her literature. Spanish literature
also enhances Hispanic culture as a positive influence in the world.
reading literature in Spanish and English consequently has allowed
me to further search for clues about my cultural origins, since Spanish
literature is considered a voice among the people.
Perhaps my interest in these two subjects came from knowing I
come from a Colombian family. I am the first in our family to be born
in the United States, and as a result, I represent two different cultures.
Knowing I come from a culturally different family, I feel passionate
about exploring my family’s cultural roots because it is a method to
discover clues about my individuality, as well as the origins of my fam-
ily. In the USA, the last names of Aguado or granados are rarely found
among common Americans. When I traveled to Spain, I purchased
wooden plaques showing the coat of arms from my ancestors bearing
the Aguado and granados names. When I found these plaques com-
memorating my family, I had felt I found yet another clue to my per-
sonality, since my last names were found from Spain (similar to finding
a needle in a haystack). Finding my coat of arms on my trip proves my
origins lie within the history and culture of Spain. The trip to Spain
gave me the opportunity to explore my existence as a human being, as
well as knowing from where I came.
Based on my perceptions, my picture represents to me the complex
evolution of my personality, since I am constantly finding new clues
leading to the understanding of who I am. This picture is a part of my162
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
constant search for my individuality and is a reminder of the beginning
of my personal exploration. This is my crown.
AnAlysis
Brian’s essay opens with a sentence that piques our curiosity, a
trend seen in several other essays, including Oana’s “A Different Kind
of Love” (Chapter 3) and Sarah’s “Unshakable Worth” (Chapter 7). A
first sentence that invokes a question in the reader—in Brian’s case,
the question is “How does Brian belong to royalty?”—is an effective
way to engage your audience right from the beginning.
Brian reveals the key to this mystery in the second paragraph
by tracing the history of Spain back to his family’s origins. As he ex-
plores the “chain of causality,” Brian demonstrates his “passion for the
study of Spain’s cultural history” by making references to Christopher
Columbus and the expulsion of the Moors. He also shows his skills in
imaging: “I could be speaking Arabic . . . I could have been born as
an Indian native” and, playfully, “Perhaps I wouldn’t be looking at the
same photo, explaining its significance!”
These details also relate to Brian’s interest in finding “clues to dis-
covering [his own] individuality.” The term individuality can have several
possible meanings. Brian might have shared his personal interpreta-
tion of the term in order to give us a better sense of what the “constant
search for [his] individuality” means to him. Remember to define the
key terms in essays if they are potentially ambiguous. Clarifying im-
portant terms brings personal interpretation to the written words and
also helps reduce redundancy. For example, Brian writes several sen-
tences that seem related to discovering his individuality and heritage.
“Frankly,” he explains, “exploring Spain’s history has enabled me to
discover my origins.” We gain other clues in these sentences: “Reading
literature in Spanish and English consequently has allowed me to fur-
ther search for clues about my cultural origins” and “I feel passion-
ate about exploring my family’s cultural roots because it is a method
to discover clues about my individuality, as well as the origins of my
family.” These might be more powerfully condensed into one concise
statement placed at the beginning of the essay.
Brian’s essay provides strong examples of his passion for Spanish
history and literature using the memorable metaphor of royalty, find-
ing his coat of arms, and discovering his metaphorical “crown.” Using
a single photograph, Brian was able to share about his heritage and
his personal passions. Many strong essays highlight one’s individual
interests and talents within the broader framing of a group. In Brian’s
case, his passion is Spanish history and literature, and the “group” is
comprised of his ancestors and the Spanish culture they represent.18
viGnEtt E
“Polar Bears”
Lauren Horton
Stanford University
ThE BUzzING oF ThE ALArm cLocK suddenly stops and, to my
surprise, I am awakened not by the noise but by the silence, rudely
jerked from my sleep. Six forty-five, the numbers read. I pull my com-
forter tighter under my chin and close my eyes, fully intending to get
up in a few minutes. I’m sure I’ll wake back up in a few minutes, but
not yet. I can’t do it yet.
“Lolo!” someone’s whispering to me, in my dreams I’m sure. “Lolo,
get up! Aren’t you coming?” Coming where? One instant of confusion.
Only one blissful instant, and then it all makes sense. It’s Saturday.
“Yeah, I’m coming.” The listlessness of my voice surprises me. I groan
and fold the thick layers of blankets off of me. The frigid December air
pounces. As I watch, thousands of tiny bumps germinate on my arms,
and the fine hairs stand alarmingly straight. After getting out of bed and
pulling on my bathing suit, I eagerly throw my winter coat around my
arms and shoulders. I debate crawling back in my bed. no one said I
had to do it.
163164
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
I look at my cabinmates, and I push that thought from my mind.
Although Lucy and Tuna stay nestled in their beds, Cara is pulling a
sweatshirt over her head. Emily and Constanza are standing quietly,
fully dressed, and Sarah is duct-taping a pair of flip-flops on her bare
feet. Shoes. I had almost forgotten. I open the door, and look down at
our tiny porch. My tennis shoes are indeed there, frozen solid. I force
the unyielding layers of ice around my feet, wincing. The laces crunch,
and small crystals of ice fall gently to the floor as I tie a bow on each
shoe. Everyone is ready. It’s time to go.
I wrap my arm through Constanza’s as we step off the last wooden
step from the cabin. The air isn’t so bad out here--probably a few de-
grees above zero. My feet begin to tingle and then to burn. We trudge
through the snow as quickly as possible, and I’m sure my excitement
is visible on my face.
Soon, we can see the water of the Sheepscot river, stained with thin
sheets of ice. Most people would say we’re out of our minds. My friends
back in Atlanta will call me crazy. I grin. Squeezing Constanza’s hand
on one side and Emily’s on the other, I stumble through the mud left
by the receding tide.
“One, two, three!” We count together and sprint into the icy water,
diving under the surface just for an instant. As we clamber out of the
water and toward our chilled towels, our semester-mates cheer wildly.
The next threesome heads toward the water.
Later in the morning, the thirty-six students at Maine Coast Semester
file into the dining hall for breakfast, about twenty of us dripping wet
and beaming. Five of us sport shorts and sunglasses in a foolish attempt
to defy the cold. I follow my friends to a table where a large book stands
open, and sign my name under the heading “Polar Bears: December
7.” As I sit eating my bagel, I catch the eye of a wet-headed polar bear
across the room and we smile together.
AnAlysis
Many students think that their essays need to be about a serious
topic such as a current event, revelation about themselves or remark-
able achievement. Lauren takes a different route. While she describes
an accomplishment, it’s not a traditional one that culminates with a tro-
phy or hours of community service and not one with an easy-to-sum-
marize lesson learned. What makes her essay work, rather, is that sheChapter 18: Vignette
165
presents an experience with memorable details that allows us as the
readers to draw our own conclusions about what she’s gained from it.
The introduction attracts attention and is very relatable, as we’ve
all had mornings in which we’ve ignored the beeping alarm clock and
pulled the covers tighter. Lauren summons a little bit of mystery with
the introduction because we don’t know what’s ahead of her. When
she reveals that it is a Saturday morning, we wonder why she would
want to wake up so early on a weekend.
The descriptions are extremely vivid, from the goosebumps
(“Thousands of tiny bumps germinate on my arms, and the fine hairs
stand alarmingly straight”) to putting on her shoes (“. . . small crystals
of ice fall gently to the floor as I tie a bow on each shoe”). We can
almost feel the chill of the air, see her tired cabinmates getting ready
and hear the crunch of her shoe laces. Details such as these draw us
as the readers into the essay and make us feel like we’re not just wit-
nesses but active participants.
Then Lauren builds on the mystery of the story. Why would she put
her winter coat on top of her bathing suit? When she writes, “No one
said I had to do it,” we as the reader wonder what “it” is.
After the plunge, it is notable that Lauren doesn’t conclude with a
moral or overriding message, but we’ve still discovered much about
her. We’ve learned that she is a writer who can describe a scene vi-
brantly, a storyteller who can draw us in with details that touch our
senses and develop a mystery and a person who forms meaningful
friendships through actions not words. Lauren’s essay is memorable
and gives the admissions officers something to latch onto. They’ll re-
member her as the student who took the frigid plunge in the water.
It’s not a requirement to write an essay about a serious topic or
one with a serious lesson learned. Sometimes it’s just right to write
a story in a memorable way. After reading this essay, the admissions
officers probably felt that Lauren was a student they wanted to meet,
one who had something to add to the prospective class.
“Moving”
Laura V. Mesa
Stanford University
ThE qUIcK rIppING oF ThIcK TApE and the heavy thuds of card-
board boxes echo throughout an empty, unfamiliar, and lonely house.
As the heavy boxes are slowly opened and their contents revealed, my
young heart jumps for joy. There, within that scant and unexpectedly166
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
durable shell of cardboard, lie my invaluable possessions. After remov-
ing the bubbly layer of protection from my valuables, I begin to place
them, one by one, onto my familiar, yet strangely new shelf.
I first lift out my ragged and faithful stuffed animal Mr. Teddy.
Though torn, dirty and missing his left eye, he reminds me of my
youth and the one constant friendship in my life. He has traveled with
me thousands upon thousands of miles to and from each of the seven
vastly different living experiences that have defined my life. Mr. Teddy
has been there with me throughout the difficulty of every one of the
transitions in my life.
next, I pull out a small, fragile lamp decorated with blue and white
pinstripes. A small yellow duck lives at the bottom of the glass com-
partment. As I fumble with the rotating switch, I see that only two of
the three different settings are properly working. now, after years of
travel, only the nightlight and brightest setting work. I leave the light
on at its brightest setting and place it on my night table. The brightness
comforts me.
I return to the box to pull out my thick, denim blue journal and
my favorite ink pen. I flip through the pages, pausing to glance at my
informal collection of favorite pictures of friends, articles, and tidbits
of memories that I have compiled through the stages in my life. I open
to the last section of the book and glance at my favorite quotations al-
phabetically sorted by subject and author. I look up Woody Allen and
smile at his ridiculously funny honesty and place my journal on the
ledge next to my window.
After refueling my ink pen I scoop up my carefully packaged rosary
and Bible. As I crack open the case, the pearl white beads of my rosary
glint in the sunlight and my ivory covered Bible, given to me on my
First Communion, opens to the front page. There, written in my aunt’s
handwriting, is a greeting written in Spanish and signed by my now
deceased grandparents. These two items represent one of my only con-
nections to my relatives and the history of my family in Colombia: a
common religion and a belief in Providence.
After saying a quick prayer of thanksgiving I pull out my final and
most necessary possession. The dust flies off the glass as I blow across
the surface. There, under the grime of travel, lies my own face fixed in
time. Enclosed within a light maple frame, a color photograph captures
my eleven year old self clothed in bright purple soccer shorts and a167
Chapter 18: Vignette
white sleeveless uniform shirt. My hair is tightly pulled back in the
quintessential ponytail, sweat dripping off my skin and dirt covering
my socks. My face is frozen in an expression of relief, domination, and
triumph after scoring the game-winning goal in the merciless sun of
a Houston summer. I study the image and wipe a single tear from my
eye. My knee aches sympathetically, and I prepare to hang the picture.
As I pick up the hammer, I realize that although soccer is no longer a
part of my life, I have filled the vacancy in my heart with other chal-
lenging and significant activities that I have grown to love with the
same fervor. That picture, though simple, encompasses the passion that
is my life. It will forever symbolize for me the love and dedication I
have for everything I do.
With a last glance, I hang the heavy frame on the wall. The box
is empty, unlike the room. Although the room is only filled by a few
items, it is occupied by the only items I will ever need for the rest of my
life: friendship, humility, self-expression, family, god, and passion.
AnAlysis
The framework for this essay provides a way to tie together a num-
ber of things that are important to Laura. She covers five different sets
of objects; and through each of these, she reveals a part of herself.
What makes this essay especially effective is that Laura works her
thoughts into the descriptions of the items. For example, she writes, “I
begin to place them, one by one, onto my familiar, yet strangely new
shelf.” By describing the shelf as “strangely new,” she reflects her ap-
prehension about having her possessions in a new setting.
Through Mr. Teddy we learn that Laura has moved many times.
Relocating is always difficult and requires acclimating to new sur-
roundings, choosing different friends, and perhaps even adjusting to
an unfamiliar culture. The admissions officers can conclude that Laura
is probably someone who is flexible in new situations, adept at making
friends, and willing to establish roots.
Laura shows her sentimentality when describing the lamp. We
can imagine that at one point, all the settings worked. Her description
makes us wonder for what adventures the lamp has provided light as
Laura worked to see her way through them.
As someone who keeps a journal, Laura shows that she is self
reflective. She is a person who is introspective and has a sense of
humor, mentioning Woody Allen. These are qualities that probably
piqued the interest of the admissions officers. They like to see students168
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
who can take a step back to reflect on their actions and who can laugh
about life.
Through the Rosary and Bible, Laura shows her connection to reli-
gion and her family. We learn about her family ties to Colombia.
The heart of the essay is the soccer photo. Through the photo, she
introduces her background with the sport and how an injury stopped
her from playing. But she also reveals that when she did play, she
played hard and was good at it. Laura then shares that other activities
have filled the void of soccer. What makes this part of the essay work
is that she shares her feelings in an unguarded and honest way.
The flow of Laura’s writing is just right. She covers many aspects
of herself and highlights her values by providing enough detail in her
description of each item that it emphasizes its meaning.
Through this essay, the admissions officers learned a lot about
Laura—that she has made many transitions throughout her life, she is
sentimental about her past, she is introspective, she has strong con-
nections to her family and religion, and she is a person who commits
herself with passion. As you are writing your essay, keep in mind that
you have a similar goal—to reveal something about yourself or your
values to the admissions officers. They want to know what makes you
the person who you are.19
why our col lEGE
“Exploring life’s intricacies”
Mathew Griffin
Brown University
BEcAUSE I FINd LIFE’S INTrIcAcY So amazing, biology and its re-
lated subjects are the most enjoyable topics for me. Within biology our
brains interest me the most, which—with their countless neurons and
chemicals—give us unmatched emotion, uniqueness, and potential.
Due to the possibilities of understanding emotions and mental prob-
lems from their source, I’d like to develop a great understanding of
neuroscience, and use it to help people overcome diseases and mental
barriers as a doctor, allowing them to achieve the highest possible qual-
ity of life.
Brown University would also give me the greatest ability to help
people. With their deep community involvement and famous neuro-
science department, I would have an outstanding opportunity to help
people as I develop the utmost understanding of neurology. The open
curriculum will also bring me more benefits. The ability to study mul-
tiple languages and social sciences will help me interact and exchange
ideas with fewer limits. Moreover, the curriculum will allow me to be-
169170
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
come an outstanding scientist. The way in which this could help me
scientifically is best summarized in the words of my biology professor
at Kent State University: “One of our major inhibiting factors in ad-
dressing more complicated issues of science is that scientists need to
have a sweeping grasp of multiple disciplines such as psychology, biol-
ogy, convention physics, and quantum physics. And if that wasn’t bad
enough, you’re going to need amazing writing skills to convey your
ideas to other people and seem credible.” I don’t necessarily expect
to achieve full mastery in the four or five years I spend as an under-
graduate, but I believe Brown is where I’ll have the best opportunity
to advance in these areas. To expand even more, the open curriculum
would allow me to surround myself with individuals that are just as
passionate about languages and sciences as I am. With these classmates
I would love to have great conversations and even participate in re-
search. Attending Brown University will bring me all of these things,
which will aid me in becoming the best doctor and scientist I can pos-
sibly be.
AnAlysis
Mathew’s short essay directly addresses the proposed question in
a way that provides plenty of supporting evidence without extraneous
details. The opening paragraph shows Mathew’s curiosity and knowl-
edge about neuroscience. He describes his higher goal for studying
neuroscience: “to help people overcome diseases and mental barriers
as a doctor, allowing them to achieve the highest possible quality of
life.” This sentence shows that Mathew is not only interested in acquir-
ing knowledge, but applying it as well.
The second paragraph begins with the comment, “Brown University
would also give me the greatest ability to help people.” It is not clear
what the “also” refers to in this sentence; a better transition sentence
might have provided a tighter logical structure. However, the subse-
quent sentence does an excellent job of conveying a specific reason
and explanation for choosing Brown. “With their deep community in-
volvement and famous neuroscience department, I would have an
outstanding opportunity to help people as I develop the utmost un-
derstanding of neurology.” To demonstrate greater familiarity with the
program, Mathew might have included names of particular faculty from
whom he was interested to learn, or aspects of the famous depart-
ment. Since most Ivy Leagues are high profile, it is usually a good idea
to cite more than just fame in explaining one’s reasons for applying to
a school. Mathew’s description of the “open curriculum” is an excellentChapter 19: Why Our College
171
example of a more specific aspect of Brown University. Being able to
use the university’s terminology demonstrates a level of familiarity with
the school that admissions officers are likely to appreciate.
Mathew quotes his biology professor at Kent State University
in support of the benefits of the interdisciplinary opportunities that
Brown’s open curriculum offers. This quote is one of the most com-
pelling aspects of Mathew’s essay. Not only does the quote convey
a strong opinion, but it also tells us that Mathew is a precocious high
school student who is already attending classes at the university level,
and that he has listened carefully to his professor, whose words have
served a mentoring role. Mathew might have chosen to explain his
relationship to this professor in greater depth—especially if he knew
the professor on a personal level—since this would also demonstrate
that he listens during lectures and also takes the initiative to meet his
teachers.
Mathew’s hope that the open curriculum would allow him to sur-
round himself with “individuals that are just as passionate about lan-
guages and sciences as [he is]” clearly highlights two aspects of the
open curriculum he is particularly interested in: languages and sci-
ence. Though his enthusiasm for science is evident from his open-
ing paragraph, he might elaborate on why languages interest him. In
general, it is best not to introduce major interests or themes at the end
of essays, since this may leave readers with lingering questions and a
sense of dissatisfaction that these were not answered.
“leveraging Potential”
Cameron McConkey
Cornell University
ThE FAmoUS GrEEK mAThEmATIcIAN ArchImEdES oNcE said,
“give me a lever long enough and a fulcrum on which to place it, and I
shall move the world.” The basic principle of a lever is that as the length
of a lever increases, the effort needed to be exerted to accomplish a task
decreases. This fundamental law can also apply to life. Life’s levers are
experiences and opportunities that combine to motivate the individual
to succeed. However, a lever is useless when forced upon an incorrectly
placed fulcrum. Fulfilling oneself with passion and values is to build
and place a strong and stable fulcrum. Without a passion for success,
these opportunities and experiences become obsolete. Few find the
correct balance between these variables and thus fail to reach their full
potential. I, however, plan to be someone who finds that balance.172
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
In an effort to build a successful lever for myself, I have searched
for these experiences and opportunities all of my life. I have always
had a passion for learning and a natural drive to succeed. At the be-
ginning of my sophomore year in high school, I began to volunteer
at a local, family owned zoo. This idea came from an innate passion
for animals and an ongoing interest in science. At first, it was simply
to complete a community service graduation requirement, but soon
thereafter, I realized it was so much more. Work there was not like
what most zoo volunteers experience. When other volunteers were
following zookeepers and watching animals through cages at larger
commercial zoos, I was spending nights “monkeysitting” my super-
visor’s newborn Japanese snow macaque. However, calling it work
solely alludes to labor. It was more of a life-altering, unique opportu-
nity and provided me with the experience that clenched my decision
to major in animal science.
Along with my passion for animals, I am also always looking for
ways to challenge myself intellectually. I am an active member of my
school’s Envirothon and Math teams and a Science Olympiad competi-
tor. After high school, it has always been a goal of mine to attend an
academically competitive university. A few years of researching brought
me to Cornell’s College of Agriculture and Life Sciences (CALS). After
attending the CALS open house and information lecture on the animal
science department, I knew it was the perfect fit. One of the reoccur-
ring themes of my conversations with students and professors alike was
CALS dedication to shaping students into leaders.
With the experience I have gained in working at the zoo, I see my-
self emerging as a natural leader. Leaders are those few who do manage
to balance the use of their “lever and fulcrum.” In high school, I also
have worked my way to positions such as; nHS President, Steel Drums
Ensemble President, and Student representative to the School Board.
Leadership roles like these are not something I plan to make the past
after high school. In a school like CALS that has so many extracurricu-
lar activities to get involved in, I am sure obtaining positions similar to
the ones I hold now would not be difficult. One of the clubs that I have
seriously explored is the Pre-vet Society. veterinary School is some-
thing that I plan to pursue after college and hope to get involved in at
the undergraduate level.
The building of a successful lever has only just begun for me. There
is still so much that I have not seen or done. Life is full of opportunities173
Chapter 19: Why Our College
that can lead to great experiences, one of my greatest being volunteer-
ing at the Woodland Zoo. With all of the opportunities CALS has to
offer, if given the chance to attend, I am certain that I would utilize
every one; becoming not only an active member of the university, but
a leader of tomorrow.
AnAlysis
Cameron’s essay revolves around the theme of a lever and ful-
crum, which he references numerous times in order to demonstrate
the balance that he strives to find in building a successful life. He intro-
duces the lever and fulcrum with a memorable quote by Archimedes
and then goes on to explain it in his own words. When using quotes
from famous people in an essay, it is best to explicate the quote using
one’s own words, or explain why this quote is personally meaningful.
Cameron does an excellent job of clearly explaining how the lever and
fulcrum provide a metaphor for his life: “Fulfilling oneself with passion
and values is to build and place a strong and stable fulcrum.”
This metaphor makes for a clear life vision, which Cameron cap-
tures in his statement, “In an effort to build a successful lever for my-
self, I have searched for these experiences and opportunities all of my
life.” He then describes a number of these experiences and opportuni-
ties. The transition between the fulcrum/lever metaphor to the second
paragraph in which he describes his experiences volunteering at a
local zoo may seem a bit abrupt. Even so, Cameron’s description of
the zoo and his “monkeysitting” story are unusual and memorable, and
they show us that Cameron is passionate about animal science.
The third paragraph begins to list numerous experiences in which
Cameron has participated. This is appropriate for a resume or CV; but
in essays, it is best not to list activities unless they are crucial to illus-
trating a bigger point. Compared to bullet-point lists, it is much harder
in the essay narrative to remember activities when they lack the tie to
a story line. In Cameron’s essay, the Japanese snow macaque is more
memorable than the list of accomplishments such as “NHS President,
Steel Drums Ensemble President, and Student Representative to the
School Board” because it is presented in a story-like way so that you
can almost visualize Cameron as he “monkeysits” for his boss.
One theme that appears throughout Cameron’s activities is his
dedication to science; however, he unexpectedly emphasizes the
leadership aspect of these experiences. The penultimate paragraph
lists examples of Cameron’s leadership experience, where again,
highlighting a single activity might have been more effective. As a tie-
in, Cameron refers back to his original metaphor in noting, “Leaders
are those few who do manage to balance the use of their ‘lever and174
50 Successful Ivy League Application Essays
fulcrum’.” He skillfully weaves in his experience at CALS, which shows
Cornell University specifically why he has chosen their university.
The last paragraph in particular brings together the lever meta-
phor, the zoo experience, and Cameron’s experience at CALS to
show his commitment to Cornell. Cameron’s essay could have been
strengthened by using the lever/fulcrum metaphor less and introduc-
ing leadership earlier on. Though it may be tempting to save big revela-
tions for the end of an essay, often mentioning or at least alluding to
these points will help readers frame your topic. One challenge for short
essays is to fight the temptation to write everything you can about
yourself. As Lauren notes in her essay (Chapter 17), we can hardly fit
ourselves into one measly page! It is more effective to highlight spe-
cific aspects of your life.
“inspiration from an Energy Conversion Machine”
Anonymous
Caltech
EVErYoNE KNowS ThAT IT TAKES BoTh hard work and a good
understanding of the subject in order to complete a project. However,
I never appreciated the other academic strengths and personal qualities
needed until my 11th grade physics final. The task was to create an
energy conversion machine that would undergo a minimum of five en-
ergy conversions. The construction of the machine piqued my interest
in pursuing an engineering career and later became the pivotal factor in
my decision to apply to Caltech.
I knew from the beginning that it would be a challenge to com-
plete just the minimum requirements for the project. Believing that my
teammates and I had the ability and potential to do better, as the team
leader, I made it our goal to cover the conversions of all eight energy
types that were taught in class. I also strived to add into the machine
a bonus feature of breaking an egg. Struggling to find a solution for
breaking the egg, I reflected upon the force of gravity we had learned.
This idea led to a trap-door mechanism that would allow the egg to fall
under gravity and break upon impact.
In addition to excelling in math and the sciences, I am also a strong
visual art student. Enjoying drawing and designing, I gained a differ-
ent perspective that I may not have had as just a science student. The
creativity and imagination from the visual arts allowed me to use toilet175
Chapter 19: Why Our College
paper rolls, Styrofoam, and Popsicle sticks as the primary materials to
construct the machine in a limited space within limited time. Together
with good planning, coordination, and the ability to work in a team, my
innovative perspective from visual arts made this project a success.
On the due date, I watched with a prideful glee as the machine
operated smoothly. For going beyond the minimum requirements, the
machine was very well received. Beyond earning an excellent grade, the
challenge of completing this project intrigued my increasing interest in
engineering. My expectations and goals as a future college student were
also evolved during the process.
Certain that I wanted to become a professional in the engineering
field, I began searching for a college that would provide me with an ex-
cellent academic and hands-on experience. While I knew that Caltech
is a prestigious science and engineering school, it wasn’t until I received
the Caltech Signature Award that I developed a stronger interest in be-
coming a Techer. Upon further research, I realized that Caltech is the
college for me.
At Caltech, my engineering aspirations will be realized in this chal-
lenging, research-integrated environment. The rigorous coursework
and the generous research opportunities at Caltech will provide the
challenge I need to achieve my goal of becoming an engineer. In re-
turn, I believe the combination of my academic strength and creative
personal characteristics will definitely contribute to Caltech and help to
add to the interdisciplinary atmosphere of the school.
It takes more than just hard work to succeed as an engineering pro-
fessional. However, it can be achieved with the outstanding educational
opportunity at Caltech and with my other academic strengths and per-
sonal qualities.
